

Cecil was Elizabeth's spy master for awhile, then Francis Walsingham



http://www.bbc.co.uk/history/british/tudors/spying_01.shtml


they were obsessed with catholic v protestant and kept telling Elizabeth Mary Queen of Scots was trying to assassinate her, eventually entrapped Mary (and framed her?) then convinced Elizabeth to have her executed.

Mary expressed a dislike of spies in general at her trial



https://www.cnn.com/2018/04/10/europe/catholic-church-most-controversial-popes/index.html

https://www.gutenberg.org/files/1232/1232-h/1232-h.htm
	 Machiavelli's public life was largely occupied with events arising out of the ambitions of Pope Alexander VI and his son, Cesare Borgia, the Duke Valentino, and these characters fill a large space of "The Prince." Machiavelli never hesitates to cite the actions of the duke for the benefit of usurpers who wish to keep the states they have seized; he can, indeed, find no precepts to offer so good as the pattern of Cesare Borgia's conduct, insomuch that Cesare is acclaimed by some critics as the "hero" of "The Prince." Yet in "The Prince" the duke is in point of fact cited as a type of the man who rises on the fortune of others, and falls with them; who takes every course that might be expected from a prudent man but the course which will save him; who is prepared for all eventualities but the one which happens; and who, when all his abilities fail to carry him through, exclaims that it was not his fault, but an extraordinary and unforeseen fatality. 

	 ...If he could not have made Pope him whom he wished, at least the one whom he did not wish would not have been elected. 

	 ...Alexander the Sixth arose afterwards, who of all the pontiffs that have ever been showed how a pope with both money and arms was able to prevail


papcy already hijacked by machiavellians by then, so might be protestent reformation stirred some shit

Elizabeth's reign was contemporary with both protestant reformation and start of British empire, so maybe that backdrop important


noteworthy that protestant reformation became Church of England under Elizabeth, institutionalized state religion not so different from Catholic church. Church of England would go on to promote/argue for slavery.



------


https://www.history.com/topics/reformation
	The Protestant Reformation was the 16th-century religious, political, intellectual and cultural upheaval that splintered Catholic Europe, setting in place the structures and beliefs that would define the continent in the modern era. In northern and central Europe, reformers like Martin Luther, John Calvin and Henry VIII challenged papal authority and questioned the Catholic Church’s ability to define Christian practice. They argued for a religious and political redistribution of power into the hands of Bible- and pamphlet-reading pastors and princes. The disruption triggered wars, persecutions and the so-called Counter-Reformation, the Catholic Church’s delayed but forceful response to the Protestants.


reformation called for decentralization of power in religious authority 


	Historians usually date the start of the Protestant Reformation to the 1517 publication of Martin Luther’s “95 Theses.” Its ending can be placed anywhere from the 1555 Peace of Augsburg, which allowed for the coexistence of Catholicism and Lutheranism in Germany, to the 1648 Treaty of Westphalia, which ended the Thirty Years’ War. The key ideas of the Reformation—a call to purify the church and a belief that the Bible, not tradition, should be the sole source of spiritual authority—were not themselves novel. However, Luther and the other reformers became the first to skillfully use the power of the printing press to give their ideas a wide audience.


reformation went on for 40-140 years, a lot of war fought over it


	Martin Luther (1483-1546) was an Augustinian monk and university lecturer in Wittenberg when he composed his “95 Theses,” which protested the pope’s sale of reprieves from penance, or indulgences. Although he had hoped to spur renewal from within the church, in 1521 he was summoned before the Diet of Worms and excommunicated. Sheltered by Friedrich, elector of Saxony, Luther translated the Bible into German and continued his output of vernacular pamphlets.


pope probably went too far with sale of indulgences and this pissed people off, easy to call him out for it. iirc they also kept bible in Latin and only certain people could learn it and read it for common person. So could be like read the primary source vs. what they were reporting and this pissed people off, maybe a common theme for opposition to these kinds of people.


printing press a new things, probably helped ignite a heap of lies like wildfire, set themselves up for this


	In England, the Reformation began with Henry VIII’s quest for a male heir. When Pope Clement VII refused to annul Henry’s marriage to Catherine of Aragon so he could remarry, the English king declared in 1534 that he alone should be the final authority in matters relating to the English church. Henry dissolved England’s monasteries to confiscate their wealth and worked to place the Bible in the hands of the people. Beginning in 1536, every parish was required to have a copy.

	After Henry’s death, England tilted toward Calvinist-infused Protestantism during Edward VI’s six-year reign and then endured five years of reactionary Catholicism under Mary I. In 1559 Elizabeth I took the throne and, during her 44-year reign, cast the Church of England as a “middle way” between Calvinism and Catholicism, with vernacular worship and a revised Book of Common Prayer.


did Henry 8 adopt protestentism because he didn't like the pope messing with his politics?

https://www.history.com/topics/british-history/mary-i Mary I ("bloody mary") not to be confused with Mary Queen of Scots

got her nickname from burning 300 English protests at stake for herasy, apparently inflamed vitriol between protestants and catholics

some reagents changed order of succession in favor of protestnts and Lady Jane Grey (would have been Mary after Edward VI died), then Mary took throne in counter-coup with public support

Mary executed some conspirators, had Cathloic and Protetent subjects but became more and more fervent in desire to restore English Catholicism over time (how?)

went on to revive English herasy laws and violently purge protestant religious authorities. Killed 300 including father advisor archbishop of Cantebury and 800 fled to Germany and Geneva. She died and country quickly rallied behind Elizabeth I

Eliabeth I cast Church of England as "middle way" between protestants and Catholics


	The Counter-Reformation 

	The Catholic Church was slow to respond systematically to the theological and publicity innovations of Luther and the other reformers. The Council of Trent, which met off and on from 1545 through 1563, articulated the Church’s answer to the problems that triggered the Reformation and to the reformers themselves.

	The Catholic Church of the Counter-Reformation era grew more spiritual, more literate and more educated. New religious orders, notably the Jesuits, combined rigorous spirituality with a globally minded intellectualism, while mystics such as Teresa of Avila injected new passion into the older orders. Inquisitions, both in Spain and in Rome, were reorganized to fight the threat of Protestant heresy.


catholic church was "slow to respond" to reformation, had answer in council of Trent.

in council of trent declared portesent beliefs herasy and firmed-up their doctrine

said to have kicked off counter-reformation which is where Spanish Inquisition came from. Excommunication of Elizabeth I also said to be part of this. New religious orders like Jesuits and Tersa of Avila mystical stuff came out of this.

Teresa seems crazy she told everyone she saw Jesus visit her or something

Jesuits were secret Jesus underground society organized like military, seem sketchy but said to do good things and particularly stop slavery in American colonies. Got a mention in protocols of elders of zion. Jesuits went all over the world doing Christian things, getting involved in political intrigue and later fighting Nazis


pope who convened council of Trent a good guy? he put out Bull saying slavery was satan trying to destroy human race, called out using catholicism as pretext: https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Sublimis_Deus

		
	The Reformation’s Legacy

	Along with the religious consequences of the Reformation and Counter-Reformation came deep and lasting political changes. Northern Europe’s new religious and political freedoms came at a great cost, with decades of rebellions, wars and bloody persecutions. The Thirty Years’ War alone may have cost Germany 40 percent of its population.

	But the Reformation’s positive repercussions can be seen in the intellectual and cultural flourishing it inspired on all sides of the schism—in the strengthened universities of Europe, the Lutheran church music of J.S. Bach, the baroque altarpieces of Pieter Paul Rubens and even the capitalism of Dutch Calvinist merchants.


reformation vs. counter-reformation in northern europe led to religious and political freedoms at great cost, decades of war, rebellion, bloody persecution. Thirty years war cost Germany 40% of population.

ended up inspiring cultural flourishing which led to good things


------


what was catholic church doing before reformation?


https://study.com/academy/lesson/the-catholic-church-before-the-reformation-beliefs-and-practices.html


https://www.historylearningsite.co.uk/the-counter-reformation/the-roman-catholic-church-in-1500/
	The “rotteness” of the Roman Catholic Church was at the heart of Martin Luther’sattack on it in 1517 when he wrote the “95 Theses” thus sparking off the German Reformation. 

	In 1500 the Roman Catholic Church was all powerful in western Europe. There was no legal alternative. The Catholic Church jealously guarded its position and anybody who was deemed to have gone against the Catholic Church was labelled a heretic and burnt at the stake. The Catholic Church did not tolerate any deviance from its teachings as any appearance of ‘going soft’ might have been interpreted as a sign of weakness which would be exploited.


catholic church "all powerful" in Western Europe by 1500. "no legal alternative"

would label people who opposed them "heretics" and burn them at the stake


	Why was the Roman Catholic Church so powerful?

	Its power had been built up over the centuries and relied on ignorance and superstition on the part of the populace. It had been indoctrinated into the people that they could only get to heaven via the church.

	This gave a priest enormous power at a local level on behalf of the Catholic Church. The local population viewed the local priest as their ‘passport’ to heaven as they knew no different and had been taught this from birth by the local priest. Such a message was constantly being repeated to ignorant people in church service after church service. Hence keeping your priest happy was seen as a prerequisite to going to heaven.


power built up over centuries, relied on ignorance, superstition, and indoctrination of public. Constant message in church was that priest was passport to heaven, and this gave priests enormous power.


	This relationship between people and church was essentially based on money – hence the huge wealth of the Catholic Church. Rich families could buy high positions for their sons in the Catholic Church and this satisfied their belief that they would go to heaven and attain salvation. However, a peasant had to pay for a child to be christened (this had to be done as a first step to getting to heaven as the people were told that a non-baptised child could not go to heaven); you had to pay to get married and you had to pay to bury someone from your family in holy ground.

 
	To go with this, you would be expected to give to the church via the collection at the end of each service (as God was omnipresent he would see if anyone cheated on him), you had to pay tithes (a tenth of your annual income had to be paid to the church which could be either in money or in kind such as seed, animals etc.) and you were expected to work on church land for free for a specified number of days per week. The days required varied from region to region but if you were working on church land you could not be working on your own land growing food etc. and this could be more than just an irritant to a peasant as he would not be producing for his family or preparing for the next year.


rich families could buy their ways into positions in Catholic church

peasents had to pay for children to be christened, pay to get married, pay to bury someone in "holy ground," pay tenth of income to church. Expected to work on church land for free specified number of days per week.


	However, unfair and absurd this might appear to someone now  it was the accepted way of life in 1500 as this was how it had always been and no-one knew any different and very few were willing to speak out against the Catholic Church as the consequences were too appalling to contemplate.

	You were told that if you did not go to heaven then the likelihood was that your soul had been condemned to Hell. Heresy was visibly punished with public burnings which you were expected to attend. John Huss was accused of heresy and granted a safe passage to Constance in modern Switzerland to defend himself at trial. He never got his trial as he was arrested regardless of his guarantee of a safe passage by the Catholic Church and burnt in public.


http://www2.kenyon.edu/projects/margin/hus.htm
	JOHN HUS (Jan Hus) was born sometime around 1372 in the town of Husinec, Bohemia, in the area that is now the Czech Republic. He studied theology at the University of Prague; after his ordination as a priest (1402), he became preacher at the Bethlehem Chapel in Prague. Services at the Bethlehem Chapel were conducted in Czech, contrary to the common practice of conducting services in Latin. The Bible was read and sermons were preached in the common language. Hus was intrigued by the writings of the early English reformer John Wycliffe, though he did not agree with all Wycliffe's teachings. Hus preached actively against the worst abuses of the Roman Church of the day. His primary teachings were:

	- Hus called for a higher level of morality among the priesthood. Financial abuses, sexual immorality, and drunkenness were common among the priests of Europe.

	- Hus called for preaching and Bible reading in the common language, and for all Christians to receive full communion. At the time, laypersons received only the bread during communion, and only priests were allowed to receive the wine.

	- Hus opposed the sale of indulgences. These were documents of personal forgiveness from the Pope which were sold for sometimes exorbitant prices to raise funds for Crusades.

	- Hus opposed the relatively new doctrine of Papal infallibility when Papal decrees contradicted the Bible. He asserted the primacy of the Scriptures over church leaders and councils.

	Hus lived at a time of tumultuous division in the Western Church known as the Great Schism. There were for a time two, and briefly even three competing Popes who each claimed complete authority over the Church. Hus's criticisms and calls for reforms came in the midst of the Schism; high Church leaders generally regarded Hus as an irritating stumbling block to reconciling the divided Church and he was excommunicated. Assured safe conduct by Sigismund, the Holy Roman Emperor, Hus journeyed to the Council of Constance (1414-1418) to defend his beliefs. The Council of Constance was the Council which finally ended the Schism with the election of Pope Martin V. Despite the Emperor's guarantee of safe conduct for Hus, he was immediately imprisoned. When finally tried, he was accused of the crime of being a Wycliffite. He was not allowed to defend himself or his beliefs. Because of his refusal to recant, Hus was declared an heretic and was burned at the stake on July 6, 1415.

	The Council and the Emperor had underestimated Hus' support in Bohemia and Moravia, however, and his followers arose in open rebellion. There followed a period known as the Hussite Wars, which attempted to restore Roman rule by force. During this period, several branches of Hussites organized into denominations. The surviving branch, known as the Unitas Fratrum, or Unity of Brethren, was organized in 1457. After a time, the Roman attempts to subjugate Moravian and Bohemia failed. The Unity became the largest denomination in the area, at one time totalling a quarter million. It important to note that the Unity was an influential and organized denomination twenty-five years before Martin Luther was born, and more than sixty years before the Lutheran Church was organized. They were the first to publish the Bible in the common language and the first to publish hymnals in the common language.


https://www.peoplesworld.org/article/today-in-history-jan-hus-burned-at-the-stake-600-years-ago/
	Like Wycliffe, Hus spoke out against indulgences. Hus asserted that no pope or bishop had the right to take up the sword in the name of the Church; that a Christian should pray for his enemies and bless those who curse him; and that a person obtains forgiveness of sins by true repentance, not by a donation of money to the church. Hus’s followers considered the church a fraudulent mob of adulterers and “Simonists,” people who bought their positions.

	To some, Hus’s efforts were predominantly designed to rid the Church of its ethical abuses, rather than a campaign of sweeping theological change. To others, the seeds of the Reformation are clear in Hus’s and Wycliffe’s writings. In explaining the plight of the average Christian in Bohemia, Hus wrote, “One pays for confession, for mass, for the sacrament, for indulgences, for churching a woman, for a blessing, for burials, for funeral services and prayers. The very last penny which an old woman has hidden in her bundle for fear of thieves or robbery will not be saved. The villainous priest will grab it.”

	In response, three men from the lower classes who openly called the indulgences a fraud were beheaded. They were later considered the first martyrs of the Hussite Church.

	...A few weeks after his arrival in Konstanz, Hus was arrested and thrown into the dungeon of the Dominican monastery. In December a formal investigation against Hus began, but Hus was not allowed an advocate for his defense. Transferred to the castle of the Archbishop of Konstanz, Hus was kept for 73 days, separated from his friends, chained day and night, poorly fed, and ill.

	On June 5, 1415, his trial began, and Hus was moved to a Franciscan monastery. He declared himself willing to recant if his errors should be proven to him from the Bible, but otherwise defended his reformist protests against the Church.

	The condemnation took place on July 6, 1415, in the presence of the assembly of the Council in the Cathedral. After the High Mass and Liturgy, Hus was led into the church. He protested that even at this hour he did not wish anything, but to be convinced from Scripture. He fell upon his knees and asked God to forgive all his enemies.

	At the place of execution, he knelt down, spread out his hands, and prayed aloud. The executioner undressed him, tied his hands behind his back, and bound his neck with a chain to a stake around which wood and straw had been piled up so that it covered him to the neck. At the last moment Hus refused to recant and thus save his own life.

	“God is my witness that the things charged against me I never preached,” Hus said. “In the same truth of the Gospel which I have written, taught, and preached, drawing upon the sayings and positions of the holy doctors, I am ready to die today.”

	Hus’s ashes were thrown into the Rhine River.

	Responding with horror to Hus’s execution, the people of Bohemia moved even more rapidly away from papal teachings, prompting an announced crusade against them. Pope Martin V issued a papal bull that all supporters of reformers like Hus and Wycliffe be slaughtered. Some two thousand Hussites were thrown into the Kutná Hora mines by pro-Catholic townsmen. The Hussite community became a major military power, and defeated a wave of crusades that lasted until 1434. Fighting ended with a compromise in 1436.

	According to Hus, the Church is not the hierarchy; it is the entire body of those who have been predestined for salvation. Christ, not the pope, is its head. It is no article of faith that one must obey the pope to be saved. Neither membership in the Church nor churchly offices and dignities assure that the persons in question are members of the true Church. Hus’s theology predates by almost a century similar developments that would take place in the Lutheran Reformation. His extensive writings earn him a prominent place in Czech literary history.


what was Hus's beef with the church?

according to these: financial abuse, sexual immorality, drunkeness among clergy

not preaching bible in language people could understand

only priests get wine

sale of indulgences saying have to pay money to wipe away sins. Exorbitent prices to raise money for Crusades

new doctrine of Papal infalibility saying anything the pope says is true even if contradict Bible

Hus like Wycliffe said pope and bishops have no right to take up sword in name of the Church and that Christians should pray for enemies instead of being violent

said forgiveness comes from repentance and not from giving money to Church

called out church for being fraudulant mob of adulterers who bought their way into power

some saw Hus's efforts as theological, others as to rid Church of ethical abuses

Hus quote says average Christian paying for confession, mass, sacrement, indulgencies, marriage, burials, prayers... "The very last penny which an old woman has hidden in her bundle for fear of thieves or robbery will not be saved. The villainous priest will grab it."

in response, Church behaded three men from lower classes who openly called indulgences fraud

Hus arrested, put on trial for herasy, said will recant if prove it from Bible. Refused to recant to save his life and said god forgive enemies even while they were executing him like a badass

Hus follows kept going, in response Church launched series of crusades against Bohemia, pope issued Bull saying all Hus followers to be slaughtered. Hussites became military power and defeated wave of crusades from 1415-1434

Hus was about not having church power heiraciery with infallable pope but decentralizing it, don't have to obey Pope 


Hus complaints and reaction to them say a lot about the Catholic church then


Catholic church was really powerful, parasitic, and tyranical, violently supressing people who didn't agree with them and opposed their power.



https://www.historylearningsite.co.uk/the-counter-reformation/the-roman-catholic-church-in-1500/
	Relics: These were officially sanctioned by the Vatican. They were pieces of straw, hay, white feathers from a dove, pieces of the cross etc. that could be sold to people as the things that had been the nearest to Jesus on Earth. The money raised went straight to the church and to the Vatican. These holy relics were keenly sought after as the people saw their purchase as a way of pleasing God. It also showed that you had honoured Him by spending your money on relics associated with his son.


	Indulgences: These were ‘certificates’ produced in bulk that had been pre-signed by the pope which pardoned a person’s sins and gave you access to heaven. Basically if you knew that you had sinned you would wait until a pardoner was in your region selling an indulgence and purchase one as the pope, being God’s representative on Earth, would forgive your sins and you would be pardoned. This industry was later expanded to allow people to buy an indulgence for a dead relative who might be in purgatory or Hell and relieve that relative of his sins. By doing this you would be seen by the Catholic Church of committing a Christian act and this would elevate your status in the eyes of God.


sound like a bunch of con artists


...


http://madefrom.com/history/medieval/medieval-church/
	After the fall of the Roman empire in the fifth century, the Church appeared as the new dominant power of Europe. Like the Romans they had their capital in Rome and they had their own emperor – the Pope.

	The power of the Church lay in their perceived status as the gatekeepers to heaven. Cross them in any way, shape or form and you could find yourself barred from the gates of paradise. This could apply to anyone from the poorest peasant to the most powerful King.

	...For the average person the Church was an all-consuming presence. For starters every peasant had to give up a portion of their weekly work to labour on church land for free. As if this wasn’t enough they had to pay 10% of their earnings to the Church through a tax known as the tithe. Since many peasants couldn’t lay their hands on much cash, this tithe was more often than no paid in grain which was stored in vast barns known as tithe barns. Considering the subsistence level at which most peasants operated, coming up with this tithe was a constant struggle.

	Even so, they laboured to produce the good for the very simple reason that if you didn’t, you’d be cut off from heaven.

	...Even Kings and Queens were meant to subject themselves to papal authority and those who did not risked attracting the wrath of the Church. For instance, the Pope took sides in the Norman invasion, excommunicating English King Harold for supposedly going back on a holy pledge to support William of Normandy’s claim to the throne. The Pope blessed the Norman invasion as a holy crusade.



http://penelope.uchicago.edu/~grout/encyclopaedia_romana/britannia/anglo-saxon/flowers/gonfanon.html
	The principal flag of the classical period was the legionary vexillum of Rome, a diminutive of the word velum or "sail" and the origin of vexillology, the study of flags. Hung by its upper edge or top corners from a crossbar supported by a staff or spear, the vexillum later takes the form of the gonfalon (or gonfanon in French heraldry), which was adopted in the Middle Ages by Italian republics and the church for use in ceremonies and processions. In this detail from the Bayeux Tapestry, Count Eustace carries the papal insignia of Alexander II, a gonfanon with three tails charged with a cross, which William of Poitiers says was given to William to signify the church's blessing of his venture. 


https://www.lagrange.edu/resources/pdf/citations/2016/25_Shirley_History.pdf
	In The English Church 1000-1066, Barlow offers the reader a complete diagram of the formation of the English church before the conquest and talks about different events that took place within the narrow time frame of the sixty-six years that the book covers. Barlow divided the text into independently orga-nized works covering the different elements of the church. He discusses the persons involved with the church and how they interacted with the kingdom as a whole. The key for us is a section on England’s relationship with the Papacy. Anglo-papal relations were not a priority before the conquest but would later form, as Barlow sates, “a bridge to a new age.”ii Barlow points out that the Pope before the conquest of 1066 had almost autonomous control over the church and their officials. As we know, this would be one of the major elements of the church to change under William I. Barlow points out that papal supremacy had been in place for almost two centuries. Thus one of the reasons why William’s reform of the church was so revolutionary was due to his turning of the system of papal control completely on its head.

	...Before we explore the changes William made to the church, we must first look at the condition the church was in before the conquest of 1066. Christianity in England traces all the way back to Romans who introduced it to the Celts. The Romans left, but Christianity remained and the Celts spread the religion, particularly during the fifth and six centuries. During the seventh century the church was organized by Augustine of Canterbury, by the command of Pope Gregory I, mainly following the Roman style of the church. This clashed with the Celts own style of Christianity that they had developed in Rome’s absence. The Celts were primarily monastic in their faith, whereas Rome was more hi-erarchical, which lead to disagreements between the two.xiv During the latter half of the tenth century, following the Danish conflict, the Benedictine reform movement took place, led by St. Dunstan.xv The goal of this reform was the revival of church piety. The manner in which this was achieved was by remov-ing secular canons, who were viewed as corrupted by local land owners, and replacing them with celibate monks who would answer ultimately to the Pope. England was deeply divided on this issue, so much so that it weakened the country, leaving it more exposed to Viking attacks.

	...Bar-low described the church as “appearing more a loose confederation of bish-oprics under the king than as an independent hierarchal organization.”xvii The Anglo-Saxon church was disorderly and unorganized, especially compared to other systems on the European continent. It was never able to set up a work-ing unified administrative system, rather it depended on the individual bishop or archbishop.xviii Bishops were often regarded as the spiritual equivalents to earls and dioceses often engaged in the affairs of the kingdom. The church and crown had a close relationship, as the various kings were extremely pious, and their rule was theocratic. This led to larger provinces and dioceses encompass-ing smaller ones, leading to all kinds of political conflict. William the Conqueror would bring order to the chaos. Another aspect, which is particularly signifi-cant, is the church’s relationship with Rome. Amidst all of the disorganization, the Anglo-Saxon Church was still dedicated to the Pope. It did not have strong ties to Rome at this time, but before any king, church loyalties fell with the Pope.xix This would also soon be challenged.

	...The Bishops in England were almost autonomous, and they preached papal supremacy. Bishops only on occasion worked with each other. Despite the large amount of power the pope had, he rarely interacted with England; he was simply the top of the hierarchy. The Anglo-Saxon community showed so much love and obedience to Rome that it gave the various Popes a very high opinion of their power in England. They viewed the English almost as subjects to the papacy. This kind of mindset is what would lead to con fl ict between Wil - liam and the church later on.

	...There became two permanent business establishments between England and Rome under the new, more controlling Popes. The first was that England would be forced to pay tribute to Rome, and the second involved its archbish-ops’ requirement to take the pallium. The tribute was especially shameful to the English. Technically a long standing custom in the Christian faith, tribute, like so many of the former customs, and rules, had not been enforced on the Anglo-Saxons. The oath of allegiance, which the recipient of the pallium takes today, apparently originated in the eleventh century. The pallium represented in Anglo-Saxon England the dominance of the Pope; it symbolized his power and demand for loyalty. It was not, however, viewed as oppressive by the Eng-lish. In fact, they viewed it as an honor that they were owed for faithful service within the church.xxi This would begin to change during the mid-eleventh cen-tury, as the relationship between the papacy and England began to turn over controversy amongst the churches Roman reform and the acts of archbishop, Stigand of Canterbury, that Rome disapproved of.xxii The falling out between the English Church and Rome would give William a platform to seek approval from Rome for his invasion.


http://santlache.blogspot.com/2010/09/normans-and-papal-banner.html
	Did the pope (then surrounded by Norman warlords in Italy/Sicilily) ever actually issued a Papal flag to William at all? Or did he merely extend a nominal, verbal promise of support which was "pounced upon" by propagandists such as the hagiographer, William of Poitiers)?

	Papal banners were only ever issued during this era to endorse wars against muslims (then in Spain and Siciliy/S.Italy) or against those who had rebelled against Papal authority (Harold had not)- and not against fellow Christians.

	A papal legate to England in 1062 found NO corruption worth noting- even against Archbishop Stigand- whom William left in office until 1070 (along with other English clerics)!
	Odd for a man who had vowed to invade England to alledgedly to rid the land of supposed ecclesiastical corruption and pluralism?


https://www.jstor.org/stable/41533253?read-now=1&refreqid=excelsior%3A4586973f454d10ec1ac209640cbaa2e7&seq=1#page_scan_tab_contents
	It is generally held and stated as established fact that Pope Alexander II gave his blessing to the expedition of Duke William of Normandy against England in 1066, and that he sent the duke a banner as a visible token of papal approval. Although the evidence in support of this thesis has but rarely been adduced in full, it is, in fact, four-fold, and at first examination so impressive as to be well-nigh conclusive. Firstly, and most important, the story of Rome's favour originated with William of Poitiers, who was not only a contemporary witness of the events of 1066, but later King William's chaplain, and thus in an excellent position to know the truth of what happened. Secondly, the two most highly reputed chroniclers of the next century, William of Malmesbury and Orderic Vitalis, repeat the story told in the Gesta Guilelmi, although both were half-English, and Orderic at least apparently hostile to the Conqueror. Thirdly, it has often been claimed that the Bayeux Tapestry depicts the very papal banner mentioned by William of Poitiers. And finally, and decisively (for one might question the bias of the Norman and Anglo-Normal sources), Pope Gregory VII, in his letter to William of 24 April 1080, confirms that he himself secured from Alecander II papal approval of William's venture, though not without curial opposition.

	...accepting for the moment the universal assumption as fact, one is left with a question never answered satisfactorily: *why* did Alexander II give the support of the Holy See to William of Normandy? And this question is one that needs an answer in terms of expediency as well as those of morality. From the standpoint of expediency the answer seems at first simple: it lies in the known disposition of the reforming popes to extend by every possible means their power, political as well as spiritual, over law rulers -- a disposition that culminated in the investiture contest and the long struggle between the empire and the papacy. Specific reasons that have been given for Alexander II's action include: the uncanonical position of Stigand, archbishop of Canterbury from 1052 to 1070 ; irregularities (chiefly pluralism and concubinage) rife in the English church ; Edward the Confessor's promse of his realm to his cousin William ; and Harold Godwinson's broken oath to the duke to uphold that promise. The possibility that the Normans in Italy might have been induced to press his cause at Rome must also be noticed.

	Unhappily, our sources for the Norman Conquest are of no help in determining what could have moved Alexander to favour the duke. The sole contemporary writer to mention the Normal embassy to the pope, William of Poitiers, says merely, Hulus apostolici favorem petens dux, intimato negotio quod agitabat, uexillum accepit elus benignitate uelut suffragium sancti Petri, quo primo confidentius ac tutius inuaderet adversarium.


in google translate is: Asking for the favor of the apostolic leader of this disharmony, notification of the decree in the matter which would consider, he received his vision stands are good, as it were, the standard of the result of the intercession of St. Peter, the first of which might invade the enemy, and with more confidence and safer.


	Thus, the arguments advanced by the Norman embassy are not given, and the specific reasons for the pope's acquiescence often put forward by later writers (and listed above) are not themselves without certain difficulties. Pluralism and concubinage were common throughout the church (so were simony and nepotism, both rare in England), and the prevalence of all such abuses was in large part of the legacy of the decadence of the papacy itself in the tenth century. The state of the church in Normandy was almost certainly worse than that in England. Learning lay almost wholly in the hands of foreign monks like Lanfranc of Pavia. The Norman bishops, mostly sons of the great families, were not men of any intellectual or spiritual distinction. None has the quality of even an Aldred, much less of a Wulfstan.

	There is no reason to assume the Normans in Italy felt any continued feudal allegiance to their erstwhile lord. Neither can it be assumed that any advocacy by them of William's cause would have decided Alexander II. Although he himself owed his election to Norman support, Normans were neither loved nor trusted in Rome. They had imprisoned and perhaps hastened the death of the great Leo IX, first of the reforming popes. IN 1066, two rival Norman armies were contending, for and against papal authority in the Campagna, a constant reminder before the eyes of the pope and curia of the aggressive nature of these barbarians. For although more than one pope had been constrained to make use of the Normans, reliance upon them often proved both dangerous and unprofitable, and was entered into only from the most pressing political necessity.

	...The disposition of the reforming popes to extend their power over lay rulers had not yet in the time of Alexander II plunged the church into warfare against Christians, and there was, in fact, no precedent for the church's urging one Christian ruler into battle against another. Alexander II had, admittedly, himself given 'banners of St. Peter' to Roger of Sicily for his war against the Muslims and to the mercenaries Erlembald of Milan and William of Montreuil, who were opposing rebels against papal authority. Earlier still, Leo IX had bestowed such a banner upon the army of Civitate in preparation for its stand against the Normans in 1053. But such condoning of bloodshed (still deprecated by many within the church) had nothing at all in common with what William asked. Banners had been given only to men directly serving the popes, either vassals or mercenaries, and only for war with rebels against the Holy See or with the infidel enemies of all Christendom. Further, the banners given to Civitate and to Roger of Sicily, at least, were bestowed together with solemn absolution of their sins, a papal blessing, and the assurance that those who fell would rank as martyrs of the church. William's Normanns, on the contrary, received a heavy penance for their invasion.

	Moreover, even had Alexander II possessed the fanaticism and ruthlessness needed to urge a war of Christian upon Christian in order to put Kin gWilliam I in his debt, how could he have been sure that King William I would ever reign? Had his invasion been approved by the pope and failed, the consequences to the Holy See's relations with a wealthy and generous province of the church could well have been disastrous. It is all too easy, after the event, to forget how remove Duke William's chance of swift victory -- or of victory at all -- must have seemed in the summer of 1066.

	...It thus becomes necessary to ask whether indeed Alexander II, whose letters and enactments show him to have been not only a just man, but also a cautious one, was momentarily so rash (even assuming that he was so ruthless) as to risk plunging the English church into the anarchy of a prolonged war. 


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Crusade_of_Barbastro
	The Crusade of Barbastro (also known as the Siege of Barbastro or War of Barbastro) was an international expedition, sanctioned by Pope Alexander II, to take the Spanish city of Barbastro, then part of the Hudid Emirate of Lārida.[1] A large army composed of elements from all over Western Europe took part in the siege and conquest of the city (1064). The nature of the expedition, famously described by Ramón Menéndez Pidal as "a crusade before the crusades",[2] is discussed in historiography, and the crusading element of the campaign is still a moot point.[3]

	...Pope Alexander II first preached the Reconquista in 1063 as a "Christian emergency."[4] It was also preached in Burgundy, probably with the permission or participation of Hugh of Cluny, where the abbot's brother, Thomas de Chalon, led the army.[4] Certainly zeal for the crusade spread elsewhere in France, for Amatus of Montecassino notes that the "grand chivalry of the French and Burgundians and other peoples" (grant chevalerie de Francoiz et de Borguegnons et d'autre gent) was present at the siege.[4] Thus, a large army was present at the siege when it began in 1064 primarily of Frenchmen and Burgundians, along with a papal contingent, made up mostly of Italo-Normans, as well as a local Spanish army made up of Catalans and Aragonese. Later, these Catalan and Aragonese]] soldiers would be disgusted by the infamous crimes committed by those Normans after the capture of the city.[5]

	...Terms were given by the Christians to spare the lives of the Muslims and respect their properties, but the pact was quickly broken.[7] Another source tells that the garrison offered to surrender their property and property of their families in exchange for letting them leave the town, and so it was agreed with the besiegers.[9] However, the Crusaders didn't honour the treaty and killed the soldiers as they came out. Crusade soldiers plundered and sacked the city without mercy.[7] It is said fifty thousand Muslims were killed or captured and the victors divided an enormous amount of booty.[10] The contemporary Muslim chronicles suggest the invading forces might have slain the adult males and enslaved women and children; the numbers however are greatly exaggerated: Barbastro would hardly reach a population of two thousand in those times.[11]

	The Andalusi Muslim jurist Ibn 'Abd al-Barr, among the witnesses of the fall of Barbastro, described the aftermath as follows:

	    "What can be your opinion, Oh Muslims, when you see masajid and oratories, that once were witness to the recitation of the Qur’ān and the sweetness of the call to prayer; immersed in širk and slander, loaded with bells and crosses, in the place of the followers of ar-Raḥmān: aʼimmah and pious men, vergers and muʾaḏḏinūn...are dragged away by the kuffār like animals for sacrifice, they are brought to the butcher; they prostrate themselves humbly in the masajid which are then burnt and reduced to ashes while the kuffār laugh and insult us, and our Dīn wails and weeps."[2]

	The plight of women seems to have been particularly difficult as a consequence of the siege and victory of the crusaders. Many died during the siege of thirst-related diseases and were subjected to degrading treatment after victory, converting them into servants and sex slaves, or sometimes even exposing them to the torture of their husbands.[9]

	The crusaders made off with a huge booty. The Kitab al-Rawd al-Mitar records the capture of a good many Saracen girls and Saracen treasures.[12] Armengol III of Urgel, the brother-in-law of King Sancho Ramírez, was entrusted with the government of the city. On 17 April 1065, after roughly ten months of occupation,[8] the Moors easily retook the city and undid all the crusaders' work, massacring the small garrison.[4]

	...Historian Reinhart Dozy first began a study of the War in the mid-nineteenth century based on the scarce primary sources, mainly Amatus and Ibn Hayyan.[13] Dozy first suggested the participation of a papal element based on Ibn Hayyan's reference to the "cavalry of Rome."[14] Subsequent historiography has stressed the Cluniac element in the War

	...This interpretation has been criticized in more recent decades, especially the papal connection and Italian involvement.[13] It has been suggested that Alexander was preoccupied with the Antipope Cadalus at the time... 


https://www.jstor.org/stable/41533253?read-now=1&refreqid=excelsior%3A4586973f454d10ec1ac209640cbaa2e7&seq=8#page_scan_tab_contents
	...To attempt to answer this question has required a very careful re-assessment of that evidence vited above as 'well-nigh conclusive', and, in addition, an examination of the implications of the Penitentiary of 1070, a document issued by Alexander II's authority, yet largley ignored in studies of the period, and which in itself alone would seem a total contradiction of the accepted assumptions regarding the pope's role.

	...On first consideration, the ommission of any mention of the pope in the Carmen de Hastingae proelio might just possibly have been due to the long-standing quarrel between the bishops of Amiens and the Holy See, but the equal silence on the part played by Aelxander II of William of Poitier's other literary source, the Gesta Normannorum Doccum of William of Jumieges, a Norman monk, writing, as he tells us, at the behest of King William, cannot be so explained.


seems to miss explanation that Pope Alexander might have wanted to keep it on the down low

the problems she identifies of christian vs christian and Williams not having a high foreseeable chance of winning and consequences for losing would be a reason for Alexander to want to do this in the first place.

goes on to say banner evidence not good enough


	Thus, of the eleventh-century sources for the Conquest, only the work of William's chaplain, largely derived from the earlier accounts of Guy of Amiens and William of Jumieges, claims papal approval of the invasion of England, and in making this claim William of Poitiers diveres from his two sources. Because a man is a position to know the truth, it by no means always follows that he tells it

	...But if the claim of William of Poitiers be simple truth, it is most strange that not only his contemporaries, but the great majority of twelfth-century writers as well are ignorant of it--or ignore it.

	...On the other hand, any suggestion that Alexander II actively aided or even passively approved the Norman Conquest is completely absent from Brevis Relatio, Hariulf of St Riquier, 'Florence' of Worcester, Eadmer, Henry of Huntingdon, Geffrei Gaimar, Symeon of Durham, and the whole corpus of monastic annals, both English and continental, not least from the Chronicon of King William's own foundation, Battle Abbey. Even more significant is its ommission from the Vita Lanfranci of Miles Crispin, the Draco Nrmanicus of Stephen of Rouen, and the Accessiones ad Sigbertum of Robert of Torigny, writers who were not only Normans, but monks of Bec, an abbey proud of its close ties with the first two archbishops of Canterbury brought in by the Norman kings


http://santlache.blogspot.com/2010/09/normans-and-papal-banner.html
	...Following the Norman Conquest, William made a number of changes to Church. He claimed religious control over England. He wasted no time ousting the majority of the Saxon bishops and church officials, replacing them with Normans. Most notably was his installment of Lanfranc of Bec as the Archbish-op of Canterbury. Lanfranc’s rule was law in the church, and he and William worked closely in organizing it.xxiii William only wanted one church hierarchy, therefore the Archbishop of York was brought under the authority of Canter-bury. In order to understand all of the complexities, and to see just how revolu-tionary William’s reform was, we have to look at the historical record of William and the church, before and after the conquest. In order to effectively achieve this goal one must examine the works of the writers of the time.

	...The hierarchy of the Anglo-Norman Church in England was simple: God at the very top, followed by William. William treated the church officials in England about the same way as he treated the aristocracy. There was, for a time, co-exis-tence until the revolts of 1068-69, which resulted in the deposition of the mass majority of bishops and abbots. The earliest of these being the archbishop-rics of Canterbury and York, which were held by Stigand and Ealdred. Ealdred, who had crowned William, died in 1069, and Stigand was removed from his position in 1070, where he was held as a political prisoner until his death. Four other English Bishops lost their positions in 1070, leaving only three that had held their positions before 1066.xxxiv Abbots were less ruthlessly treated and usually held their positions for life under William; the only exception being if they participated in a rebellion. Entire religious communities were punished as well. The abbey of Abingdon was plundered for its support of the English rebel Hereward the Wake.xxxv The entire process of replacing church officials was con-ducted in a legitimate way. William made sure of it, but that did not make him any less ruthless in doing so.


https://books.google.com/books?id=DUNGAQAAQBAJ&pg=PA138&lpg=PA138
	The change in ecclesiastical personnel in England following the Conquest was dramatic. In just twenty years there was only Wulfstan of Worcester remaining as an Anglo-Saxon biship and William the Conqueror appointed no Englishman into any important church post. Of the other fourteen bishops, eleven were from Normandy, two from Lorraine and one from Italy. Furthermore, at the time of their appointment the bishops tended to be young and so remained in post for decades: five remained in post for more than thirty tears. The new bishops and abbots also come with a consciousness that they were part of a new order. They had come from a dynamic and professional Norman chruch and were to bring many of the Continental practices to England, such as the holding of regular synods. Although this dynamism was to peter out in the mid-twelfth century, at the time of the COnquest the Norman biships were a powerful ecclesiastical force. Lanfranc and the other new chruchmen had a profound effect upon the Anglo-Saxon church.


https://www.jstor.org/stable/41533253?read-now=1&refreqid=excelsior%3A4586973f454d10ec1ac209640cbaa2e7&seq=18#page_scan_tab_contents
	The choice of Lanfranc as archbishop by both William and Alexander may itself have some bearing on the relations between king and pope. Barlow has pointed out that William's decision to appoint Lanfranc to Canterbury is difficult to fathom, adducing Lanfranc's poor health and his dislike of administration and relative lack of experience in it. He calls him, 'not the obvious man to rule a conquered and disorganized church'. It is possible that William, if before 1070 he lacked the favour of Rome, might well have hoped that Lanfranc, a scholar and theologian of Europoean renown, and a man who had earlier helped bring William's negotiations with the Holy See about his marriage to a successful conclusion, would be an excellent choice for one who wished both the impress on the church (indeed, on his contemporary world) the legitimacy of his rule and to win public recognition of this from Rome.

	Lanfranc himself, however, attributed his woes as archbishop to the pope, and blamed Alexander for his appointment in strong terms and in a letter whose emotion and irregularity of style are anything but typical of his writing. It was clearly not the king's command that he accept the office that Laanfranc obeyed, but the pope's. Is it possible that Alexander II required Lancranc's acceptance because the pope, for his part, thought that this appointment would give him a lever by which to control William? Lanfranc, if he had not been Alexander's own teacher, had certainly had kinsmen of the pope as students. It may well have seemed to Alexander that, if he wanted his own man at William's court, he could make no better choice than an honest and able scholar, who already had the king's ear and trust, and whom the pope himself thought of in terms of a strict dominie. Unfortunately for Alexander, however impressive as a school-master Lanfranc may have appeared to the young, he was in reality, as Barlow says, one who had 'learned to obey perhaps all too well'. And after 1070, as Alexander's letters make quite clear, it was William who he obeyed, even in ecclesiastical matters.


https://books.google.com/books?id=EnuuAAAAIAAJ&pg=PA1&lpg=PA1
	The Letters of Lanfranc, Archbishop of Canterbury

	...Half the letter-collection shows Lanfranc acting as archbishop in the province of Centerbury and--rather more tentatively--as the primate of the British Isles. It was he who maintained contact with Rome and acted as Alexander II's representative in England; in contrast with the flurry of papal legates in the months before his arrival, subsequent papal business was conducted by Lanfranc himself.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Lanfranc
	Lanfranc was then persuaded by Abbot Herluin to open a school at Bec to relieve the monastery's poverty. From the first he was celebrated (totius Latinitatis magister). His pupils were drawn not only from France and Normandy, but also from Gascony, Flanders, Germany and Italy.[4] Many of them afterwards attained high positions in the Church; one possible student, Anselm of Badagio, became pope under the title of Alexander II; another, Anselm of Bec succeeded Lanfranc as the Archbishop of Canterbury. 

	...Notwithstanding some obvious moral and intellectual defects, he was the most eminent and the most disinterested of those who had co-operated with William I in riveting Norman rule upon the English Church and people. 


http://spartacus-educational.com/NORlanfranc.htm
	Lanfranc established a reputation as one of the world's most important biblical scholars. In 1053 he came into conflict with William the Conqueror over his disapproval of the duke's marriage to Matilda of Flanders. William ordered Lanfranc to leave Normandy but the two men were later reconciled.

	In 1063 William the Conqueror appointed Lanfranc as Abbott of St. Stephen's in Caen. Three years later he played an important role in persuading Pope Alexander II to support the Norman invasion of England.

	On the death of Maurilius in 1067 Lanfranc was asked to become Archbishop of Rouen. He refused and instead became William's representative in Rome. In 1070 Lanfranc replaced Stigand as Archbishop of Canterbury. Over the next few years he rebuilt Canterbury Cathedral on the model of St. Stephen's in Caen.

	Lanfranc was unimpressed with the quality of the English clergy and during William's reign supported his policy of promoting foreigners to high office in the Church. Lanfranc also ordered that in future no married man was to be ordained as a priest. However, he allowed existing priests to keep their wives.

	...In 1075 Waltheof confessed to Lanfranc that he was involved in a conspiracy to overthrow William the Conqueror. Lanfranc insisted that Waltheof should tell the king of his actions. Waltheof did so and was executed on 31st May 1076.



http://www.oxfordscholarship.com/view/10.1093/acprof:oso/9780199259601.001.0001/acprof-9780199259601-chapter-13
	Like most leading churchmen of his time, Lanfranc favoured strong kings who provided peace and justice in a violent world, not least for churches, monks, and all grades of clergy. During the seventeen years of their working relationship as Archbishop of Canterbury and king of England, Lanfranc and William I undoubtedly maintained a harmony and collaboration that have few if any parallels in the history of medieval Europe. The relationship of Lanfranc and King William I was the closer and more fruitful by reason of the active part that Lanfranc took in the government and administration of the English kingdom. Aside from being a mentor of and collaborator with the king in his ecclesiastical capacity as archbishop, Lanfranc was also royal deputy and royal justice involved in matters of royal administration and justice.


https://books.google.com/books?id=QCntCwAAQBAJ&pg=PA31&lpg=PA31
	There is evidence that as duke, William had appointed Lanfranc as a kind of overseer or governor of the churches of Normandy. The Bec sources state this clearly: both Vita Herluini and Vita Lanfranci state that Duke William chose Prior Lanfranc "as his counselor in administrating the business of the whole province." This claim is substantiated by William of Poitiers, chronicler of Duke William's conquest of England, writing in about 1077, who states that the duke admitted Lanfranc into his most intimate friendship; Duke William "venerated him as a father, respected him as a teacher, and loved him as a brother or a son. To [Lanfranc] he committed the guidance of his soul, to [Lanfranc] he entrusted the care of presiding, as though from a watchtower, over all the ecclesiastical orders throughout Normandy."


https://www.lagrange.edu/resources/pdf/citations/2016/25_Shirley_History.pdf
	What William of Poitiers does offer, is an understanding of William I’s personal religious belief, stating that “this wise and Christian man was firmly convinced that the omnipotence of God, which wills no evil, would not allow a just cause to fail, particularly since his intention was not so much to increase his own power and glory as to reform Christian observance in those regions.”xxvi

	It is understandable that William would convince himself that god was on his side, which would give the personal justification for the later reforming of the church, as he saw himself as God’s chosen leader of England. Historians would later reaffirm this point. However, William of Poitiers inadvertently indicates that the motivations for the conquest may not have been purely religious, and they were not without a desire for glory. He essentially believed that with god on their side, they could achieve a legendary triumph. The deeds of William is an extremely important work in terms of understanding the mind set and motivations of the Conqueror.


http://www.bbc.co.uk/history/british/normans/1066_01.shtml
	William could not just demand support from his nobles, he had to convince them of his case. He needed to show his followers that his claim was a lawful one, and that he had God on his side. So when he decided on invasion, he took elaborate measures to ensure he had strong support, and even sent an envoy to the Pope asking for his blessing.

	...'Baring his head and lifting his helmet he cried: "Look at me, I'm alive and with the aid of God I will gain the victory!" No sooner had the Duke spoken these brave words than their failing courage was restored, and surrounding several thousand of their pursuers, they mowed them down almost at once.' 


https://books.google.com/books?id=EgRbpkgRSZAC&pg=PA182&lpg=PA182

pope Gregory VII letter

	...The King of England, though in certain respects he is not as scrupulous about religion as we could wish, nevertheless shows himself to be more acceptable and more to be honoerd than other kings in this: that he neither wastes nor sells the churches of God, that he causes peace and justice to prevail among his subjects, that when he was asked by certain enemies of the cross of Christ to enter into a plot against the Apostolic See he refused his consent and that he bound priests by oath to dismiss their wives and laymen to give up the tithes which they were withholding. Therefore it is not unfitting that his power should be dealt with more leniently... 



https://books.google.com/books?id=EnuuAAAAIAAJ&pg=PA61&lpg=PA61
	...Pope Alexander II to King William I Oct. 1071

	Bishop Alexander, servents of the servants of God, greets his dearest son William, the glorious king of the English, and sends him his apostolic blessing.

	We praise and thank almighty God that although the world that 'lieth in wickedness' is tending more than usual towards evil pursuits, we learn at this time of your outstanding reputation for piety among the rulers and princes of the world and we receive unmistakable evidence of your support for the Church: you do battle against the forces of simoniacal heresy and you defend the freedom of catholic rites and customs. But since the cown of reward is promised not to those we begin well but to those who are proven at the end, from our heart we urge your excellency zealously to persevere in your most Christian devotion. ...for although that King of kings, the supreme Judge on high, calls you to account for the whole kingdom which he has entrusted to you, yet he will summon you more strictly to answer for those who have here no resource or defense except your power as king. To achieve these ends and to gain increase of other virtues we exhort your highness to follow the advice and counsel of our brother Lanfranc...


http://www.newadvent.org/cathen/08784c.htm
	It is generally supposed that Lanfranc had much to do with shaping the duke's policy of invasion, obtaining the pope's sanction of the expedition by a papal Bull and the gift of a blessed banner, thereby conferring on the undertaking the appearance of being a holy war against a usurper and a violator of his oath, to some extent, also, identifying It with the cause of ecclesiastical reform


https://books.google.com/books?id=QCntCwAAQBAJ&pg=PA31&lpg=PA31
	...But even before Alexander ordered Lanfranc to go to Canterbury, the new King William seems to have had him in mind. William of Poitiers says that immediately after his coronation King William "was considering placing in the metropolitan see a man of holy life and great renown, a master of expounding the word of God who would know how to furnish a suitable model for his suffragan biships and how to preside over the Lord's flock, and who would wish to procure the good of all with vigilant zeal." Thus King William was intent on reforming the English chruch even before he knew very much about it, suggesting that he, too, shared the Bec perception that the English church was somehow corrupt--and he had Lanfranc in mind to reform it.


http://geoffboxell.tripod.com/church.htm
	Whilst the higher hierarchy became Normanised, the lower clergy mainly remained English. This lead to several incidents as the new church leaders clashed with their English subordinates. The most infamous incident involved Lanfranc's appointee to Glastonbury, Abbot Tousain. This 'tyrannical abbot', as the chronicler Orderic Vitalis called him, ordered the English monks to stop using the Gregorian chants that had been introduced by Saint Augustine when he evangelised the southern English, and use new ones approved by Rome. The monks refused, so Tousain sent in archers who shot at the monks killing three and wounding another eighteen. King William sent Tousain back to Normandy as a result, though the man later bought his abbacy back from William II for 500 pounds of silver.

	The English Church was plundered of its treasures and the spoils were sent to Normandy, France and Rome. The great art works were dispersed, the gold and silver melted down and the books for which the English religious houses were famed sent abroad.

	...A Norman knight called Reinfrid started the northern revival. Like many other Normans, he had became a monk to assuage his conscience for what he had done during the Conquest, in Renfrid's case the Harrowing of the North. He made his monastic profession to Æþelwig at the English monastic house of Evesham where many of the refugees from the harrowing had fled. With an English monk called Ealdwine, and Elwy the Deacon from Winchcombe, he set out for the north and refounded Whitby in Yorkshire, whilst his later companions re-established the houses at Monkwearmouth and Jarrow. From there they were able to help the people of the north recover from the trauma and devastation that the Norman Conquest had brought.


https://books.google.com/books?id=DUNGAQAAQBAJ&pg=PA138&lpg=PA138
	...over the next century the church in Rome increased its power and influence. An important change was that it elevated its position from being the head of the western church, to being Christ's representative on earth. The Pope became Christ's vicar (i.e. deputy) on earth. The bishops became the vicars of Christ's apostles. This change gave the Pope a new power, for he and he alone could determine Christ's will on earth. This idea became widespread through the writings of Bernard of Clairvaux and was generally accepted after the new pope Eugenius III declared it in 1153.


http://turbulentpriests.group.shef.ac.uk/1066-and-the-other-papal-banner/
	1066 and the other papal banner

	In 1066, the Norman Duke William persuaded Pope Alexander II to send him a papal banner, signifying his approval of William’s cross-Channel enterprise (this banner may even be depicted in the Bayeux Tapestry, in the image above).

	But the fall of Anglo-Saxon England wasn’t the only major upheaval taking place in western Europe that year, and nor was William the only person to be sent such a banner. For the pope sent another one to a man named Erembald, who was involved in a conflict of arguably equal importance in European history to that of the Norman Conquest.

	That conflict was taking place in what was probably by this date the largest city in the Latin west, many times larger than London: Milan. Defining precisely what it was about isn’t entirely straightforward, not for lack of sources but because it was complicated. What is clear is that a large group of Milanese inhabitants, led by two minor clerics called Ariald and Landulf Cotta, and later the layman Erembald, were attempting to impose a stricter lifestyle on the wider Milanese clergy, against the Milanese archbishop’s wishes: a ban on marriage, above all.

	The emergence of this group, known as the Pataria, led to large-scale civil unrest in Milan – this is the period when the ‘crowd’ starts to make its appearance in western history after a long hiatus, and perhaps the first time when the authorities really lost control of a major political centre. For months – years – no one really controlled this city, with its tens of thousands of inhabitants, at all.

	...Admittedly, the papal banner had as much or as little impact in Milan as it did at Hastings, and it’s safe to say that the Pataria paid little if any attention to the Costituzioni of 1067: their battles were fought on the streets as much as through pages of solemn canon law. But it’s a reminder – if reminder were needed – that ‘reform’ in the 11th century was a coalition of interests, much like William’s Norman expedition.


https://www.jstor.org/stable/41533253?read-now=1&refreqid=excelsior%3A4586973f454d10ec1ac209640cbaa2e7&seq=10#page_scan_tab_contents
	...It will be objected at once that support for the tale of William of Poitiers is found in a letter written 24 April 1080 by the then Pope Gregory VII (formerly of the Arrchdeacon Hildebrand) to King William, from whom he sought to solicit aid as the final stage of his struggle with Henry IV of Germany opened...


http://spartacus-educational.com/MEDwilliam1.htm
	...William was taken to the priory of St. Gervase. Close to death, he directed that Robert Curthose should succeed him in Normandy and William Rufus should become king of England. William said on his deathbed that "I tremble when I reflect on the grievous sins which burden my conscience, and now, about to be summoned before the awful tribunal of God, I know not what I ought to do. I was too fond of war... I was bred to arms from my childhood, and I am stained with the rivers of blood that I have shed."



------


https://www.quora.com/How-much-political-and-military-influence-did-the-Pope-Papal-State-exert-on-the-rest-of-medieval-Europe
	How much political and military influence did the Pope/Papal State exert on the rest of medieval Europe?

	...Prior to the reforms of Pope Gregory VII(whose Papacy began in 1073), the Popes were arguably either vassals or subordinates of a secular authority-be it the Romans or the Franks. Or, when not subdued by someone else, being constantly harassed by their restless neighbours, like the Lombards or the Saracens. 

	There were a time when the Pope was indeed really powerful, though. A period of time which begun with the Investure Controversy in 1075 and ended with Pope Boniface's capture by the French in 1303. The Pope's temporal power grew substantially with the Crusades, and there were on various occasions when the rulers of England or The Mezzogiorno pledged their loyalty to the Pope, though mostly these feudal contracts were only nominal and few took them seriously. 



https://www.enotes.com/homework-help/what-significance-investiture-controversy-why-this-336636
	The significance of the Investiture Controversy was that it solidified the Pope’s control over many secular leaders, the most important of which was the Holy Roman Emperor, Henry IV. The Investiture Controversy signaled the beginning of the centralization of the Church/Pope’s power. The Controversy also oversaw the first excommunication of a secular leader.

	Many secular (non-religious based) leaders had appointed church bishops in the areas and lands they controlled. This appointment process was called “investiture.” Henry IV, like his predecessors and contemporary rulers, appointed bishops. The Pope, Gregory VII, wanted to central the authority of the Church in the appointment of bishops and thusly claimed the power to appoint bishops.

	The Investiture Controversy reached its zenith in 1075, when the Church formally prohibited secular leaders from appointing bishops. Henry refused to adhere to the new law and continued appointing bishops. As a result, Henry was excommunicated (banished from the Church and prohibited from interacting with other Christians). Furthermore, Gregory encouraged the German nobles to disregard Henry’s orders and authority since he had been officially excommunicated. Many German nobles followed the Pope’s advice and threatened open rebellion against Henry.



https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Investiture_Controversy
	In 1075, Pope Gregory VII composed the Dictatus Papae. One clause asserted that the deposal of an emperor was under the sole power of the pope.[5] It declared that the Roman church was founded by God alone – that the papal power (the auctoritas of Pope Gelasius) was the sole universal power; in particular, a council held in the Lateran Palace from 24 to 28 February the same year decreed that the pope alone could appoint or depose churchmen or move them from see to see.[6] By this time, Henry IV was no longer a child, and he continued to appoint his own bishops.[5] He reacted to this declaration by sending Gregory VII a letter in which he withdrew his imperial support of Gregory as pope in no uncertain terms: the letter was headed "Henry, king not through usurpation but through the holy ordination of God, to Hildebrand, at present not pope but false monk".[7] It called for the election of a new pope. His letter ends, "I, Henry, king by the grace of God, with all of my Bishops, say to you, come down, come down!", and is often quoted with "and to be damned throughout the ages", which is a later addition.[8]


https://www.encyclopedia.com/history/encyclopedias-almanacs-transcripts-and-maps/emperor-henry-iv-and-pope-gregory-vii
	Such greeting as this hast thou merited through thy disturbances, inasmuch as there is no grade in the church which thou hast omitted to make a partaker not of honour but of confusion, not of benediction but of malediction. For, to mention few and especial cases out of many, not only hast thou not feared to lay hands upon the rulers of the holy church, the anointed of the Lord—the archbishops, namely, bishops and priests—but thou hast trodden them under foot like slaves ignorant of what their master is doing. Thou hast won favour from the common herd by crushing them; thou hast looked upon all of them as knowing nothing, upon thy sole self, moreover, as knowing all things. This knowledge, however, thou hast used not for edification but for destruction; so that with reason we believe that St. Gregory, whose name thou has usurped for thyself, was prophesying concerning thee when he said: "The pride of him who is in power increases the more, the greater the number of those subject to him; and he thinks that he himself can do more than all." And we, indeed, have endured all this, being eager to guard the honour of the apostolic see; thou, however, has understood our humility to be fear, and hast not, accordingly, shunned to rise up against the royal power conferred upon us by God, daring to threaten to divest us of it. As if we had received our kingdom from thee! As if the kingdom and the empire were in thine and not in God's hand! And this although our Lord Jesus Christ did call us to the kingdom, did not, however, call thee to the priesthood. For thouhas ascended by the following steps. By wiles, namely, which the profession of monk abhors, thou has achieved money; by money, favour; by the sword, the throne of peace. And from the throne of peace thou hast disturbed peace, inasmuch as thou hast armed subjects against those in authority over them; inasmuch as thou, who wert not called, hast taught that our bishops called of God are to be despised; inasmuch as thou hast usurped for laymen and the ministry over their priests, allowing them to depose or condemn those whom they themselves had received as teachers from the hand of God through the laying on of hands of the bishops. On me also who, although unworthy to be among the anointed, have nevertheless been anointed to the kingdom, thou hast lain thy hand; me who as the tradition of the holy Fathers teaches, declaring that I am not to be deposed for any crime unless, which God forbid, I should have strayed from the faith—am subject to the judgment of God alone. For the wisdom of the holy fathers committed even Julian the apostate not to themselves, but to God alone, to be judged and to be deposed. For himself the true pope, Peter, also exclaims: "Fear God, honour the king." But thou who does not fear God, dost dishonour in me his appointed one. Wherefore St. Paul, when he has not spared an angel of Heaven if he shall have preached otherwise, has not excepted thee also who dost teach otherwise upon earth. For he says: "If any one, either I or an angel from Heaven, should preach a gospel other than that which has been preached to you, he shall be damned. " Thou, therefore, damned by this curse and by the judgment of all our bishops and by our own, [should] descend and relinquish the apostolic chair which thou has usurped. Let another ascend the throne of St. Peter, who shall not practise violence under the cloak of religion, but shall teach the sound doctrine of St. Peter. I Henry, king by the grace of God, do say unto thee, together with all our bishops: Descend, descend, to be damned throughout the ages.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Investiture_Controversy
	The situation was made even more dire when Henry IV installed his chaplain, Tedald, a Milanese priest, as Bishop of Milan, when another priest of Milan, Atto, had already been chosen in Rome by the pope for candidacy.[9] In 1076 Gregory responded by excommunicating Henry, and deposed him as German king,[10] releasing all Christians from their oath of allegiance.[11]

	Enforcing these declarations was a different matter, but the advantage gradually came to be on the side of Gregory VII. German princes and the aristocracy were happy to hear of the king's deposition. They used religious reasons to continue the rebellion started at the First Battle of Langensalza in 1075, and for seizure of royal holdings. Aristocrats claimed local lordships over peasants and property, built forts, which had previously been outlawed, and built up localized fiefdoms to secure their autonomy from the empire.[5]


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Pope_Gregory_VII#Pope_and_Emperor_depose_each_other
	In Germany there was a rapid and general feeling in favor of Gregory, and the princes took the opportunity to carry out their anti-regal policy under the cloak of respect for the papal decision. When at Whitsun the king proposed to discuss the measures to be taken against Gregory VII in a council of his nobles, only a few made their appearance; the Saxons snatched at the golden opportunity for renewing their rebellion, and the anti-royalist party grew in strength from month to month.[20]

	Walk to Canossa

	The situation now became extremely critical for Henry. As a result of the agitation, which was zealously fostered by the papal legate Bishop AltPassaumann of , the princes met in October at Trebur to elect a new German ruler. Henry, who was stationed at Oppenheim on the left bank of the Rhine, was only saved from the loss of his throne by the failure of the assembled princes to agree on the question of his successor.

	Their dissension, however, merely induced them to postpone the verdict. Henry, they declared, must make reparation to Gregory VII and pledge himself to obedience; and they decided that, if, on the anniversary of his excommunication, he still lay under the ban, the throne should be considered vacant. At the same time they decided to invite Gregory VII to Augsburg to decide the conflict.

	These arrangements showed Henry the course to be pursued. It was imperative under any circumstances and at any price to secure his absolution from Gregory before the period named, otherwise he could scarcely foil his opponents in their intention to pursue their attack against him and justify their measures by an appeal to his excommunication. At first he attempted to attain his ends by an embassy, but when Gregory rejected his overtures he took the celebrated step of going to Italy in person.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Investiture_Controversy
	Thus, because of these combining factors, Henry IV had no choice but to back down, needing time to marshal his forces to fight the rebellion. In 1077, he traveled to Canossa in northern Italy to meet the pope and apologize in person. As penance for his sins, and echoing his own punishment of the Saxons after the First Battle of Langensalza, he wore a hair shirt and stood barefoot in the snow in what has become known as the Walk to Canossa. 


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Road_to_Canossa
	According to contemporary sources, he was forced to humiliate himself on his knees waiting for three days and three nights before the entrance gate of the castle, while a blizzard raged. Indeed, the episode has been described as "one of the most dramatic moments of the Middle Ages". It has also spurred a lot of debate among medieval chroniclers as well as modern historians, who argue about whether the walk was a "brilliant masterstroke" or an embarrassing humiliation.[2]

	...As the Swabian nobles refused to open the way to the Alpine passes, the king had to move through Burgundy and cross the Alps at steep Mont Cenis.[5] According to the chronicles by Lambert of Hersfeld, Henry, his wife Bertha of Savoy, and their young son Conrad risked their lives by crossing the Alpine crest in harsh mid-winter conditions. After a long journey, they reached Gregory's accommodation in Canossa on 25 January 1077.

	At the castle

	When Henry reached Matilda's castle, the Pope ordered that he be refused entry. Waiting at the gates, Henry took on the behavior of penance. He wore a hair-shirt, the traditional clothing of monks at the time, and allegedly walked barefoot. Many of his entourage including the queen Bertha and the prince Conrad also supposedly removed their shoes. According to Lambert of Hersfeld and first-hand accounts of the scene (letters written by both Gregory and Henry in the following years), the king waited by the gate for three full days. Throughout this time, he allegedly wore only his penitent hair-shirt and fasted.[6]

	Finally, on 28 January, the castle gates were opened for Henry and he was allowed to enter. Contemporary accounts report that he knelt before Pope Gregory and begged his forgiveness. Gregory absolved Henry and invited him back into the Church. That evening, Gregory, Henry, and Matilda of Tuscany shared communion in the chapel of Sant'Apollonio inside the castle, signaling the official end of Henry's excommunication.[7]

	...Historical impact

	The immediate effects of the Canossa meeting were limited. Although Henry was restored to the Church, any expectations that the Pope would restore support of Henry's right to the throne were soon dashed;[8] in March, a small group of powerful Saxon and South German territorial magnates, including the archbishops of Salzburg, Mainz and Magdeburg and several bishops, met at Forchheim and, on the assumption that Henry had irretrievably lost the imperial dignity, repudiated the Salian dynasty's claim to pass the imperial crown by heredity and, in the words of Bruno of Merseburg, present in his bishop's entourage, declared that "the son of a king, even if he should be preeminently worthy, should become king by a spontaneous election". The Pope confirmed the agreement.[9] His deposition still in effect, Henry was forced into civil war with Duke Rudolph of Swabia. Gregory levied a second excommunication against Henry, who ultimately won the civil war, invaded Rome, and forced Gregory to flee, replacing him with Antipope Clement III.[10]

	...In modern usage, "going to Canossa" refers to an act of penance or submission. To "go to Canossa" is an expression that describes doing penance, often with the connotation that it is unwilling or coerced.


What happened to Henry that made him think he had to submit to the Pope?


article on walk to Canossa:


http://www.medievalists.net/2017/08/walk-canossa-tale-emperor-pope/
	...News soon spread throughout Europe that the Pope had excommunicated the Holy Roman Emperor and stripped of his right to rule. It was the culmination to an increasingly bitter dispute that Gregory had with Henry, one that threatened to plunge both Germany and Italy into civil war.

	...Nearly all of his reign to this point was spent trying to maintain his power against the nobility of the empire. He was also eager to continue the practice where emperors actually chose who would be the bishops in various German cities, which at the time was not only an important religious position, but also included a lot of secular authority. Pope Gregory had demanded this practice stop, and their dispute, known as the Investiture Controversy, heated up.

	...It was a bold move for a Pope to say that he could deprive an emperor of his right to rule, when it was just a generation ago that the emperors were determining who could sit on the Papal throne. As one historian noted, “the papal ban was seen to speedily efficacious. It frightened the more timid of Henry’s adherents, it impressed moderate men who had been horrified by the king’s attack on the Pope. Moreover, it gave the excuse for revolt to raise its head in Saxony once more, and to win adherents from the among the higher nobility in the rest of Germany, alienated by the high-handed measures of the king in his moment of triumph and resenting their own lack of influence in the affairs of the kingdom.”

	Throughout the summer and fall of 1076 the supporters of Henry abandoned him, while his foes became more brazen. At a council held in Tribur the German princes made a demand of the emperor – if Henry had not received absolution from the Pope by February 22, 1077, he would automatically be deposed and replaced by a new candidate. They even invited Gregory to come to Augsburg to preside over a meeting that month where they would make the choice on who the new emperor would be.

	The Pope was delighted by this news, and as winter approached he left Rome in the company of Matilda, Countess of Tuscany, who had been fighting the Emperor over her lands in Italy (the pro-Imperial side also sent out rumours that Gregory and Matilda were more than just allies). They headed to northern Italy, waiting for the German princes to send them an escort to take them through the Swiss Alps.

	Meanwhile Henry IV faced with the real possibility that he would be deposed in just a few months, and with little support in Germany, he decided on a bold move – he would go to Italy. 


	...On January 25, 1077, with a blizzard raging, Henry arrived at the gates of Canossa. Here is Gregory’s own account, written just weeks after, of what happened:

		Finally he came in person to Canossa, where we were staying, bringing with him only a small retinue and manifesting no hostile intentions. Once arrived, he presented himself at the gate of the castle, barefoot and clad only in wretched woollen garments, beseeching us with tears to grant him absolution and forgiveness. This he continued to do for three days, until all those about us were moved to compassion at his plight and interceded for him with tears and prayers. Indeed, they marvelled at our hardness of heart, some even complaining that our action savored rather of heartless tyranny than of chastening severity. At length his persistent declarations of repentance and the supplications of all who were there with us overcame our reluctance, and we removed the excommunication from him and received him again into the bosom of the holy mother church.

	...The account written by a supporter of Countess Matilda has her playing more of a central role in the affair, acting as the key intermediary. At one point the emperor begs her “If you do not help me in this moment I cannot fight anymore because the Pope has condemned me. O valiant cousin, make him bless me. Go!” Finally, if you were reading a pro-Henry chronicler, than most of these details would be conveniently left out, replaced with a simple notice that the emperor was able to get his sentence of excommunication lifted.

	Before being absolved, Henry had to promise Gregory that he would behave better and gave the following oath:

		I, Henry, king, promise to satisfy the grievances which my archbishops, bishops, dukes, counts, and other princes of Germany or their followers may have against me, within the time set by pope Gregory and in accordance with his conditions. If I am prevented by any sufficient cause from doing this within that time, I will do it as soon after that as I may. Further, if Pope Gregory shall desire to visit Germany or any other land, on his journey thither, his sojourn there, and his return thence, he shall not be molested or placed in danger of captivity by me or by anyone whom I can control. This shall apply to his escort and retinue and to all who come and go in his service. Moreover, I will never enter into any plan for hindering or molesting him, but will aid him in good faith and to the best of my ability if anyone else opposes him.

	Once that was done the Pope held a mass and gave communion to Henry. Afterwards they had dinner, and according to another chronicler the Emperor was in such a bad mood that he did not touch his food, but instead spent his time grinding his fingernails into the wooden table. With a final blessing from Gregory, Henry departed Canossa and headed back to his supporters.

	Almost as soon as the event happened, people were debating what was the real significance of the Walk to Canossa. Had Henry humiliated himself and become subservient to the Papacy? Or was he deft enough that he framed the issue around his personal repentance and this situation had no bearing on his right to kingship? Medieval chroniclers (and modern historians) have argued about this, but the immediate effect was the threat from the rebellious German nobility collapsed – only a few diehards continued to oppose him.


Henry was apparently afraid of the nobility and bishops who organized against him

henry in his letter said the pope used underhanded tricks to control the bishops and priests, and called the pope tyranical. Accused Gregory of arming laymen against him, smearing his bishops, buying favors with money, and starting wars "against the throne of peace."

In his letter Henry argued that he was annointed by God and only God could judge or depose him


https://books.google.com/books?id=y2Tc4PsRvQkC&pg=PA11&lpg=PA11&
	...In Hugh's Chronicon, the arch-simonist [buying off clergy] was King Henry IV of Germany. It was he, by virtue of the evil policy of his counsellors (familiares), who had simoniacally introduced 'wolves' instead of pastors in the bishoprics and monastaries of the realm. Admonished by the pope to abstain from the company of his advisers - they had been excommunicated by Pope Alexander II (1061-73), possibly because of simony - Henry IV acquiesced and wrote a penitential letter to Gregory VII in Spetember 1073. However, the king had only submitted because of the crisis of a rebellion in Saxony, and having defeated the Saxons in battle on the River Unstrut in June 1075, Henry IV received his exommunicated advisors back into the royal household - like a 'dog returning to its own vomit' (cf. Proverb. 26:11 and II Peter. 2:22) according to the Hugh of Flavigny.


papacy didn't like Henry IV's advisors, excommunicated them and pressured Henry to drop then in 1073. Henry caved but brought them back after defeating Saxon rebellion. Hugh of Flavigny backed up the papacy on this and was angry at Henry for brining back advisors.


	The example of his simoniacal heresy, moreover, had contaminated the whole episcopate in Germany. Inspired by the king's example, the bishops revealed themselves to be 'not pastors of sheep but hirelings' (cf. John. 10:12-13). Hugh of Flavigny particularly had in mind Bishop Otto of Constance, who was unable to enforce the pope's reforming legislation on clerical chastity in his diocese and who, on that account, was censured by Gregory VII in a series of letters inlate 1075. The corruption of these bishops was manipulated by Henry IV who, enraged by the pope's threat of deposition in late 1075, had resolved to make a 'shipwreck of the faith' by forcing almost all the bishops in Italy and Germany to renounce their obedience to the pope. Thus, Hugh of Flavigny's narrative of the events leading up to the fateful council of Worms in January 1076 shows no trace of the objects to the pope that were ventilated at that assembly: Gregory's arrogant disregard for the traditional rights of bishops; his subjection of the bishops to the 'common frenzy' of the mob; his novel intrusion into their jurisdictions, unsupported by canon law.


Hugh lamented that bishops were being hirelings of King rather than 'pastors of sheep.' Slammed Bishop Otto who was also censured by Pope. Wrote that Henry forcing bishops to renounce obedience to the Pope was 'making a shipwreck of the faith.'


how was Gregory subjecting Bishops to the 'common frenzy' of the mob?


	These mainly ecclesiological complaints find no trace in the CHronicon of Hugh of Flavigny, Hugh preferred to see the council of Worms as an assembly of simoniacal 'wolves', who resisted reform in the shape of Gregory's investiture prohibitions ... and who were not afraid to ignore the reforming letters with which the pope had attempted to disseminate reforming instructions. Led by the 'tyrant' Henry IV, who had become 'an unhappy member of him who is king over all the sons of pride', these bishops  'not wishing to live a blameless life and ... defiling the canonical institutions ... sought to judge the mother of the Universal Church.'

	...Hugh took his account of the council from the Epistola of Archbishop Gebhard of Salzburg to Hermann of Metz of 1081, both of whom were, like Hugh of Flavigny, ardent supporters of Gregory VII. For his part, Gebhard framed the bishop's renunciation of the of the pope at Worms against a background of concord between the regnum and the sacerdotium. He emphasised this point to incriminate the bishops of rebellion against the pope who, at that point, ahd issued no sentence of excommunication against them. ...One of Beghard's main objections to the proceedings at Worms was that the pope had been judged in his absense ...the proceedings against him were therefore void according to canon law. This objection had been made by Bishop Hermann of metz at the council of Worms itself, and although he was not heeded on that occasion, Hermann's criticism soon became persuasive. The king's coalition against Gregory, so formidable at Worms, began to erode throughout the course of spring and summer of 1076 when a general consensus emerged among the German episcopate that the council of Worms had acted ultra vires. This was a theme that Hugh of Flavigny took up assiduously, and he fleshed out Gebhard's narrative on the council of Worms with a great number of canon law sententie asserting that the pope could not be deposed, nor be judged by any human agency: on the Almighty was fit to arbitrate on cases involving the Roman pontiff.


Hugh and other Gregory supporters ignored charges against Gregory at council of Worms, eventually concluded only God could judge pope.

How did Henry's coalition against Gregory erode in 1076?


	...Henry IV's reaction to his excommunication at the hands of the pope was of immense interest to pro-papal authors, including Hugh of Flavigny. The king assembled a synod at Utrecht on 26 March 1076 in order to excommunicate Gregory VII and to demonstrate publicly Henry's authority as 'vicar of God' within his realm. Bishop Pibo of Toul had originally been deputed to pronounce the sentence of excommunication on Easter Sunday, 27 March, but being 'of timid mind and very inconstant', according to Hugh of Flavigny, he fled Utrecht together with Bishop Theoderic of Verdun on the eve of Easter. Instead, Bishop William of Utretch performed the task. However, because he then received the Eucharist in such a state of rebellious sinfulness, William did not escape divine punishment (ultio divina), bursting into flames in penalty for his crimes. Although it would appear that William of Utrecht did not die on Easter Sunday - he perished on 27 April - his passing does seem to have been sudden and painful and to have been interpreted by the 'Gregorian' party in Germany as a welcome confirmation that they belonged to the righteous. Hugh's version of William's fiery death may have been influenced by the lighting that burned the church of St peter in Urecht to the ground on Easter Sunday 1076 - perceived by many as a token of divine displeasure - but may also have been modelled on the genre of Eucharistic miracles, where it was believed that the Host was immunie from the ravages of fire.


https://books.google.com/books?id=XkMSmrP9wz4C&pg=PA324&lpg=PA324
	...At length after the reading of the Gospel the bishop went up into the pulpit to deliver the sermon of the people according to custom. Having briefly spoken of the meaning of the Gospel, being blind in his heart and of unsound mind, he immediately erupted into blasphemies against Pope Gregory, which because of their excessively horrible character it is best to pass over in silence. For it is difficult for the tongues of the detractors to refrain from stinging one who is conscious of his honesty and for the friend of righteousness to escape the taunts of the wicked. Nevertheless the vengeance that immediately followed makes clear, if it is considered carefully, how this blasphemy appeared in the eyes of God. For when the joyous Easter day was not yet over, the heavens resounded with a sudden crash of thunder and fire was seen to descend from heaving, whic suddenly consumed the whole of that church and all the houses prepared for the reception of the king, turning the happiness of impious men into sorrow. In truth the divine vengeance that suddenly smote that blasphemous bishop also killed him. Before he breathed his last, however, he was compelled to tell the servants who made the preparations for his departure: 'I see myself snatched out of this life, bound by reins of fire, pulled by hideous ghosts. Nevertheless, go and tell the king to correc the shameful offence that he has committed against God and blessed Peter and his vicar, lest he follow me to the regions of hell.' With these words he expired. Reminded by this example, we exhort and beseech every man who reads this work to avoid the tongues of the detractors if he prefers to enjoy the company of Gregory at the resurrection rather than to suffer torments with the detractors.


https://books.google.com/books?id=y2Tc4PsRvQkC&pg=PA11&lpg=PA11&
	Bishop William's sudden death, together with growing disquiet about the legality of the episcopal renunciation of Gregory VII at worms, induced many German bishops to seek papal forgiveness for their rebellion throughout the course of 1076. Aware of the sin of disobedience, rebel bishops such as Udo of Trier made their way to Rome to do penance; just as in the Old Testament book of Job (23:4), 'their mouths were full of [self] reproach'. Among those penints was Bishop Theoderic of Vedun who, although absent from the council of Worms in January 1076, was nonetheless identified with the rebels. Theoderic conveyed his submission to Rome via Abbot Rudolf of St Vanne, and was recieved back into comunion once had had performed due satisfaction to the foremost papal representative in Upper-Lotharingia, Bishop Hermann of Metz. Pope Gregory VII was certainly anxious to welcome back into communion those who repented of their sins, and the people wrote a letter to this effect - copied into the Chronicon of Hugh of Flavigny - addresed to all the faithful of the Roman Empire and dated 25 July 1076. Hugh of Flavigny was determined to embroider the theme of this letter, and emphasised that the pope was motivated by a desire for reconciliation and wanted to deal midly with the party of Henry IV. To this end, Hugh added a patristic gloss to the letter of Gregory VII, claiming that 'like Ambrose, [Gregory VII] was solicitous not to act rashly or negligently'. Henry IV, on the other hand, had let slip 'the reigns of moderation'


Henry wanted his bishops to excommunicate Gregory instead. One bishop ran away and the other, William, died. Hugh wrote that William burst into flames for his sinfulness and Hugh and other pro-Gregory writers wrote that this was a sign of God's displeasure with Henry's party. Someone wrote that William's death was punishment for going against Gregory and should serve as a reminder for anyone who read that message. William's death and questions of legality of Henry's renunciation of Gregory at Worms led many German bishops to seek papal forgiveness throughout 1076. The bishops sought papal forgiveness for the 'sin of disobedience' and started falling in line. Hugh emphasized that Gregory wanted leniency for the bishops, but had something different in mind for Henry. 


more on William of Utrecht:


https://books.google.com/books?id=QP8fNo5UNIYC&pg=PA151&lpg=PA151
	...Almost immediately, however, two accidents occured which seemed to negate the effects of the royal demonstration. On Easter day (27 March) the cathedral of St Peter in Utrecht, the scene of the crown-wearing, recently rebuilt at great expense by Bishop William, was struck by lightning and reduced to ashes. Moreover, one month after he pronounced the pope's excommunication William himself suffered a sudden and painful death (27 April). The king's critics regarded these events as a divine judgement on the king's most diligent supporter and on the king himself. The disquiet that these accidents aroused in Henry and his entourage is apparent in two royal diplomas drawn up by the Gottschalk of Aachen. The first records a royal gift to the church of St Mary in Aachen, founded by Charlemagne (21 April), an attempt to secure for Henry's regime the patronage of the Virgin and the great emperor. The second diploma, recording a donation to the cathedral of St Peter in Utretch (23 May), was an attempt to regain the saint's protection after Peter had manifested his anger against the cathedral and its bishop. The diploma contains an admission of guilt: 'we grieve that [the church of Utrecth] was consumed by fire, ascribing this to our sins.'

	Henry accepted that the destruction of the cathedral was a punishment for his sins, but he was not prepared to give up his plan to dethrone Hildebrand, whom he still regarded as an usurper.


How did Henry see burning of St Peter church and death of his supporter William? was he superstitious? did he suspect foul play? author says Henry accepted that it was "punishment for his sins," but still opposed Gregory.


also going on around same time of William of Ulretch's death according to author:


	...The failure of Henry's Saxon expedition emboldened his enemies elsewhere. In late August or early September a number of conspirators met in Ulm: the dukes Rudolf, Welf and Berthold and the bishops Adelbero of Wurzburg, Adalbert of Worms and Altmann of Passau. They decided to summon all the German princes to an assembly in Tribur on 16 October 'to bring an end to the various misfortunes that for many years had disturbed the peace of the Church'. Bishop Altmann came to the assembly in Tribur as the legate of Gregory VII (who trusted him not least because he was the former chaplain and confidant of Empress Agnes). He and his fellow-conspirators in Ulm had to take account of the attitude of the pope, as indicated in the letters sent to Germany during the months of April-September 1076. in the letters of April-July the emphasis was on the pope's desire for peace with the king: 'if he comes to his senses ... he will find us ready to receive him into holy communion'. The letter of 29 August, however, warned that 'we have learned from the faithful of the holy Church that the king is trying his best to divide us from each other and to deceive us, sometimes through spiritual and sometimes through secular persons.' Nothing further is known about this royal tactic of sowing dissension among opponents. Gregory's response was to forbid anyone to absolve Henry from excommunication 'until the news of his satisfaction and penance is announced to [the pope] by suitable messengers of [the princes]'.

	The letter of 3 September began by instructing the princes that, for the sake of his parents, 'whose equals in governing the empire cannot be found in our age', they must 'treat [Henry] kindly', provided he removed the 'evil counsellors' and rejected 'customs contrary to the freedom of holy Church'. If Henry failed to repent, however, 'someone should be found . . . to govern the kingdom' who would promise to do 'wahtever seems necessary for the Christian religion and for the safety of the whole empire'.


Henry didn't do well fighting the Saxons and this embolded his enemies, which included Altmann of Passau, a pope ally said to have "agitated" against Henry. They met to conspire against him to stop his church activities in October 1075. Gregory said Henry might 'come to his senses,' but warned Henry was trying to organize secular and church officials against pope. In 1076 papacy still wanted Henry to get rid of his counselors. Pope sent letters eventually saying if Henry didn't comply they should find a new King.

	
	...This claim that papal approval was necessary for the installation of a new king was a characteristic Gregorian 'creative minsinterpretation' of the conduct of two predecessors ('our holy Fathers'): Pope Zacharias's reccomendation that Carolingian Pippin III should repalace the 'useless' Childeric III as king of the Franks (750) and Victor II's role as guardian of the young Henry IV (1056-7).

	Gregory's letters of April-September continued the papal strategy, first apparent in Alexander II's pontificate, of forcing reforming ideas upon the king with the help of a pressure-group of princes. This strategy achieved success in the assembly of princes in Tribur, during which Henry was compelled to negotiate with the pope's legates and promised to submit to the pope to avoid being deposed by the princes.

	...According to Berthold of Reichenau, the absolution of the bishops preceeded all the other business of the assembly. The bishops' submission was perhaps an important factor in persuading the king to abandon the stand taken in January.

	‘From the outset only one party of princes sought a new election; the others certainly wished to humble Henry, but also to keep him as king.’ 63 The single eyewitness account of the Tribur assembly, a letter by an unknown bishop, is written from this moderate viewpoint. ‘It was judged to be just that the royal dignity should show due reverence to priestly excellence, in that the excom- municate should be reconciled to the Church in the presence of the excom- municator either by proving his innocence or by making appropriate satisfaction for his fault.’ 64 The aims of the small ‘deposition faction’ who had summoned the assembly of Tribur – the conspirators of Ulm (the south German dukes and the bishops of Würzburg and Worms), together with the leaders of the Saxon rebels – are found in the account of Lampert of Hersfeld. They ‘firmly resolved to remove King Henry from the government of the kingdom and to create another, elected by common consent’. 65 Berthold of Reichenau, however, reflecting the attitude of the majority in the assembly and of the papal legates, wrote that the princes hoped ‘that they might be per- mitted to serve their lord and king, once he had been admonished, converted to penitence and reconciled’. 66 The legates were obliged to follow the instruc- tions in the papal letter of 3 September 1076: the election of a new king was a last resort, to be adopted only ‘if [the king] was not wholeheartedly converted to God’. 67 It was the strategy of reconciliation, rather than that of the ‘depo- sition faction’, that prevailed in Tribur.


the pope had a "presure group" of princes and bishops acting against Henry. Some wanted to depose him, others wanted him to "convert to pentinence" and deposition only a last resort if Henry not "wholeheartedly converted to God."

Is this where Henry got the idea of his walk to Canossa?

Tribur assemply and King negotiated for a few weeks. Henry was to restore BIshop Adalbert to Worms, free Saxon hostages, disband army and withdraw to Speyer.

	
	...More importantly, he promised to dismiss his excommunicated advisers and repudiate the measures taken against the pope by the council of Worms. These were the concessions specified in Gregory VII's letter of 3 September and demanded by the papal legates during the Tribur negotiations. The king's written promise 'to preserve due obedience in all things' to the pope. the so called 'Promise of Oppenheim', was to be brought to Rome by Udo of Trier. Simultaneously Henry issued a manifesto addressed to the bishops, princes 'and every office-holder': 'it has pleased us, following sounder counsel, to change our former judgement and in the manner of our predecessors and ancestors to preserve due obedience in all things to the holy see and ... to the lord Pope Gregory.' He urged his subjects likewise 'to show solemn obedience to St Peter and his vicar'.

	Before the assembly dispersed, the princes gained a further concession from the king. Henry agreed to the proposal of the princes to refer their grivances against him to the pope's judgement at an assembly in Augsburg on 2 February 1077. Lampert, reporting the view of the 'deposition faction', wrote that at this assembly the pope 'would sentence the accused [king] or absolve him, according to his judgement. If, however, [Henry was not absolved, through his own fault, before the anniversary of his excommunication, his case would at once be lost forever and he could not thereafter lawfully claim the kingship.'


Henry promised to dismiss his exocmmunicated advisers again, repudiate council of Worms, and 'preserve due obedience in all things' to the pope. The princes proposed to refer their greivances with him to the pope and Henry agreed. He had until next year to be absolved by pope or he would lose kingship forever.

	
	...The debate about the ‘Promise of Oppenheim’ – whether it was a ‘peace-treaty’ advantageous to the king or ‘unconditional surrender’ on his part 73 – has concentrated on the last sen- tence of the ‘Promise’. ‘It is fitting that your holiness should not overlook those [accusations] that have been published about you, bringing scandal to the Church, but that this difficulty should be removed from the public con- science and the universal tranquillity of both Church and kingdom consoli- dated by your wisdom.’ This apparent reference to the accusations made at the council of Worms certainly does not suggest unconditional surrender: it amounts in fact to a remarkable concession by the legates and the princes. The last sentence of the ‘Promise of Oppenheim’ has been ingeniously defended against the charge of forgery. 74 Nevertheless it is unlikely that the papal legates could have admitted into the ‘peace-treaty’ of Oppenheim the demand that the pope clear himself of the accusations made in Worms. A useful analogy has been drawn with the two versions of Henry IV’s letter to the pope of 1076, the longer version being a justification of the king’s action, intended solely for a German audience. The extant version of the ‘Promise’ may be a longer ‘German version’ of the document negotiated at Tribur- Oppenheim with a face-saving addition made by the royal chancery after the original version had been sent to Rome. 75 The royal ‘Promise’ approved by the legates and princes and sealed in their presence probably amounted, therefore, not to a ‘peace-treaty’ but to ‘unconditional surrender’. In the dan- gerous situation of October 1076 an honourable surrender was the best that the king and his advisers could achieve.


there is a debate over whether the 'promise of Oppenheim' was an unconditional surrender or an advantageous peace-treaty maneuvered by Henry


	...Meanwhile Henry awaited the pope’s reaction to his submis- sion. Gregory referred in a letter of December 1076 to the princes to ‘the many and great debates that we have had with the envoys of the king and the argu- ments with which we have resisted his words’, indicating that far more was at issue than the ‘Promise of Oppenheim’ brought to Rome by Udo of Trier. 77 According to Berthold of Reichenau, ‘the king obstinately requested permis- sion to come to the pope in Rome to be reconciled. The pope, however, would not consent, but commanded by apostolic authority that [Henry] should meet him in Augsburg to be heard and reconciled in the presence of the princes of the kingdom.’ 78 Gregory was determined to adhere to the plan of the ‘depo- sition faction’, whose envoys followed Udo of Trier to Rome with the invita- tion to the assembly of Augsburg. The invitation to arbitrate between king and princes was irresistible, since it offered Gregory the opportunity of dem- onstrating that papal supremacy in secular affairs which he had claimed in his letters to the faithful during the summer of 1076.

	‘The king was well aware that his safety depended entirely on his being absolved from excommunication before the end of the year. He considered, however, that it was not in his own interests to await the arrival of the Roman pontiff in Germany and to allow his case to be investigated by so hostile a judge and by such inflexible accusers. He judged that his best course was to enter Italy and meet the Roman pontiff while he was still on his way to Germany and seek to obtain absolution from the anathema by whatever means he could.’ 79 Lampert’s version of Henry’s reflections in the last days of 1076 rings true. When Henry learned of the failure of his envoys in Rome, he recalled his advisers, who counselled him to intercept the pope in Italy. Shortly before Christmas he set out for the kingdom of Burgundy with Queen Bertha and their son Conrad, not yet three years old.


Henry waited to here back from Gregory on his submission. Gregory told Henry to meet in in Augsburg in presence of princes. Henry said to have really wanted to be absolved from excommunication and thought his safety depended on it (why?). Henry's new advisors told him to go meet the pople himself in Italy instead, and this started his walk to Canossa.


...


Henry's family had history of tusstles with papacy:


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Agnes_of_Poitou
	Though initially a follower of the Cluniac Reforms, Agnes opposed the contemporary papal reform movement, and took the side of Italian dissidents who did as well.[1] Things had worsened after the death of Pope Victor II in 1057: his successor Stephen IX, who was unable to take actual possession of Rome due to the Roman aristocracy's election of an antipope, Benedict X, sent Hildebrand of Sovana and Anselm of Lucca (respectively, the future Popes Gregory VII and Alexander II) to Germany to obtain recognition from Agnes. Though Stephen died before being able to return to Rome, Agnes' help was instrumental in letting Hildebrand depose the Antipope [4] and with Agnes' support replace him by the Bishop of Florence, Nicholas II. However, on Easter 1059 Nicholas issued the papal bull In nomine Domini establishing the cardinals as the sole electors of the pope, detrimental to the interests of the emperor. When Pope Alexander II was elected on 30 September 1061, Agnes refused to acknowledge him and had Antipope Honorius II elected; a schism that did not end until Pentecost 1064. The empress' candidate could not prevail against the Roman Curia; in consequence, Agnes retired from politics, leaving the regency to her confidant Bishop Henry II of Augsburg.

	Bishop Henry did not receive wide acceptance due to his awkward and haughty manners, not least with a view to rumours about his relationship with the Empress as rendered by the chronicler Lambert of Hersfeld. Moreover, the fact that the heir to the throne was raised by common ministeriales led to anger with the princes. In 1062, young Henry IV was abducted by a group of men, including Archbishop Anno II of Cologne and Otto of Nordheim, in a conspiracy to remove Agnes from the throne, referred to as the Coup of Kaiserswerth. Henry was brought to Cologne, and despite jumping overboard from a board to escape, he was recaptured again. Agnes resigned, as ransom, from the throne, and Anno together with the archbishops Siegfried of Mainz and Adalbert of Bremen took her place.[1] According to Frutolf of Michelsberg she retired to Fruttuaria Abbey after the dethroning, and when Henry IV reached majority moved to Rome, where her arrival in 1065 is documented by Peter Damian. Agnes went on to act as a mediator and peacemaker between her son and the papacy.[1] She died in Rome on 14 December 1077 and is buried at St. Peter's Basilica.


Henry was abducted by archbishop Anno II and Otto, his mother empress Agnes resigned as ransom.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Lambert_of_Hersfeld
	After his elevation to the priesthood, he made a pilgrimage to Jerusalem. Back in Hersfeld in October 1059, Lambert worked in the cloister library and taught at the monastery school. In 1071 he visited the Benedictine abbeys of Siegburg and Saalfeld to study the Cluniac Reforms, promoted by his mentor Archbishop Anno II of Cologne. However, Lambert adhered to traditional Benedictine rules and remained reserved towards monastic reforms.

	Lambert was a convinced opponent of the German king Henry IV. In 1077, during the rising conflict with Pope Gregory VII, he moved from Hersfeld to the canon monastery of Hasungen at the instigation of Henry's enemy Archbishop Siegfried I of Mainz. 


	...Lampert was superbly educated for his day and wrote in a fine, classicizing Latin peppered with references and allusions to Roman authors, particularly Livy, Sallust, and the playwright Terence. Like many of the classical authors he admired, Lampert fancied himself a cynical observer of elite society, casting a critical eye on the political melodramas and scandals of his day and chronicling the way in which power and pride corrupted rulers and perverted society, raising up the unworthy and punishing the good and decent.

	Throughout, Lambert demonstrates his hostility to 'godless' King Henry IV and royal interests, which is not surprising given his sympathies for the independence of the regional aristocracy. He expresses a generally favorable opinion of Pope Gregory VII and the ecclesiastical reform movement, but also evinces skepticism towards some contemporary monastic reforms in Germany. He is also quite uncharitable towards figures like Archbishop Siegfried I of Mainz, who encroached on the traditional rights and prerogatives of Hersfeld and other monasteries.



Chronicler Lambert was a priest mentored by one of the Bishops who kidnapped young Henry. He opposed Henry during dispute with Gregory VII. He is an important source on Henry's walk to Canossa, supported Gregory and wrote of bishop Henry banging empress Agnes.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Coup_of_Kaiserswerth
	The Coup of Kaiserswerth (German: Staatsstreich von Kaiserswerth) in 1062 was a hitherto unprecedented action of several secular and ecclesiastical Princes of the Holy Roman Empire under the leadership of Archbishop Anno II of Cologne against Empress Agnes, ruling on behalf of her under-age son, King Henry IV, and against her chosen sub-regent, Bishop Henry II of Augsburg. By kidnapping the young king and enforcing the handover of the Imperial Regalia, the group gained control of the reins of power in the Empire.


	...But no sooner had he entered the ship when he was surrounded by the archbishop's hired accomplices, the rowers quickly gathered themselves up, threw themselves behind their oars with all their might and propelled the ship rapidly into the middle of the stream. The king, stunned by these unexpected events and unsure what was happening, could only think that they wanted to attack and murder him, and so plunged headlong into the river, and he would have drowned in the raging waters had not Count Egbert, despite the great danger in which he put himself, dived in after him, and rescued the endangered king from drowning with great difficulty and returned to the ship.

	Lampert von Hersfeld, Annalen, p. 75[1]

	Anno then took the king up the river to his Cologne residence and blackmailed Empress Agnes to hand over the Imperial Regalia. As a consequence the power of the state fell into the hands of the rebels, who, in addition to Anno and Count Egbert of Brunswick, mentioned by Lambert, also included Otto of Northeim as well as the Archbishops Adalbert of Bremen and Siegfried of Mainz.

	Motives of the kidnappers

	The motives for the attack are still not entirely clear, especially as the sources for this event are extremely contradictory. The opinion of the contemporary commentators is divided. Lambert's report still seems to be relatively objective when he writes that the kidnappers and Anno, in particular, sought to "rescue the son from the influence of his mother and to seize the administration of the Empire for themselves." Lambert did not speculate on the motives of the conspirators. He points out the possibility that Anno had "acted out of political ambition", but admits that he may have also acted for the good of the Empire.[2]

	The assessment of the Vita Heinrici IV imperatoris, however, appears subjective and may be better understood if one assumes that the anonymous author was very close to the royal family. Here, it suggests, inter alia, that the motive for the kidnapping was fear of Agnes' "maturity, wisdom and strict morals". The official reason, that it was not proper for the kingdom to be ruled by a woman, is rejected by the author. Here, he even claims that they had kidnapped the young king only to have unrestricted freedom to expand their own power.[3]

	Bruno the Saxon even more or less states that Henry himself was to blame for his own kidnapping: young Henry "full of royal arrogance hardly [heeded] his mother's admonitions". Anno had him educated "with great care" after his kidnapping. Bruno not only entirely denies that Empress Agnes was so assertive, i.e. he considered her to be too weak (whether in terms of ensuring the proper education of the young king or in terms of her regency, is not clear), but he even praised Anno for his actions.[4] His criticism of Henry IV himself is probably explained by the fact that Bruno did not subsequently agree with Henry's politics and saw negative traits in the king from an early age. That he was, politically, not on Agnes' side, is obvious.

	Although the sources apparently fail to report anything reliably about the motives of the kidnappers, current research now believes that both the pursuit of power (especially for Anno of Cologne), as well as concern for the neglect and the education of Henry IV were crucial to the case. The rebellion was also directed against Empress Agnes' subregent, Bishop Henry of Augsburg, who was accused of having an "unskillful and pretentious way of handling the business of government".[5] In addition, according to the chronicler Lambert of Hersfeld, "the Empress and the bishop could not escape the suspicion of an affair, because there was a general rumour that such a confidential relationship could not develop without an illicit relationship."[6]


motives of kidnappers not decided on by historians, but may have included wanting power, not liking how Henry was being educated (some didn't like his advisors later either) and not liking how Agnes and Biship Henry of Augsburg were running things.



https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Anno_II
	...Anno is venerated as a saint of the Catholic Church.

	...After he also had secured the Imperial regalia for himself, Anno for a short time was able to exercise the chief authority in the Empire, but he was soon obliged to share this with his fellow conspirators, Archbishop Adalbert of Bremen and Archbishop Siegfried of Mainz, retaining for himself the supervision of Henry's education and the title of magister.
	
	...The first uprising occurred under Anno II, at Easter of the year 1074. The citizens rose against the archbishop, but were defeated within three days, and severely punished.[4] It was reported he had allied himself with William the Conqueror, King of England, against the emperor. Having cleared himself of this charge, Anno took no further part in public business and died in Siegburg Abbey on 4 December 1075,[5] where he was buried.



clearly Henry would have been familiar of plots by the clergy

the pope and some bishops seemed to care a lot about having influence over seuclar rulers: pope repeatedly asking Henry to ditch his advisers, Anno apparently not liking how young Henry taught and kidnapping him and teaching him himself, Lanfranc going out of way to stay close to William the Conqueror and pope Alexander II asking William to follow Lanfranc's advice


pope and bishops also cared a lot about having their people in place in clergy. That's what Lanfranc told William he had to do to "reform" English church, and William replaced clergy with bishops from English continent already under vatican influence. The whole conflict between Henry and Gregory was started because Pope wanted to appoint bishops in his kingdom instead of Henry. Some bishops emphasized death of William of Utrecht should be seen as lesson not to oppose pope, and many others went with this.


What factors made Henry capitulate and humliliate himself before pope Gregory? why did he think being absolved by Gregory was so important for his survival?

sources so far point to death of William of Ulretch, defeat at Saxony, his mother, and demands of princes influencing him.

Why would he think going to Gregory alone would satisfy the princes?

Gregory had written to these princes, and apparently they had all sided with him and Henry understood things this way.


gregory writes letter to Germans April or May 1076:


http://avalon.law.yale.edu/medieval/inv06.asp
	Bishop Gregory, servant of the servants of God, to all the bishops, dukes, counts and other loyal defenders of the Christian faith in the land of the Germans, greeting and apostolic benediction.

	We have heard that certain among you utter complaints and are doubtful, concerning the excommunication which we have passed against the king, whether he has justly been excommunicated and whether our sentence has proceeded from the authority of a censure that is permissible, and with due deliberation. Therefore, as best we could, our conscience bearing witness, we have taken care to lay before the eyes and intellects of all how we were led to excommunicate him; not so much in order to throw before the public, with our Glamour as it were, the separate causes -which, alas, are too well known-as to satisfy the doubts of those who think that we have seized the spiritual sword rashly, and through a sudden impulse of our mind, rather than through fear of God and zeal of justice.

	Previously, when we were exercising the office of deacon, a dark and very disgraceful report of the king's actions having reached us, we, for the sake of the imperial dignity and out of reverence for his father and mother-also with the hope and desire of correcting him-often admonished him, through letters and envoys, to desist from his wickedness and, mindful of his most distinguished race and dignity, to order his life according to rules of conduct suitable for a king and, if God should grant it, a future emperor. 


greg addresses bishops, dukes, counts, and "loyal dsefenders of christian faith" in germany

says we heard complaints that we are being too rash and power-grabbing in excommunicating henry

heard a "dark and very disgraceful report" of King's actions, and admonished him to "desist from his wickedness"


	Moreover, his age and his depravity keeping pace with each other,-after we, though unworthy, came to be supreme pontiff, the more diligently did we urge him in every way, by arguing, exhorting, rebuking, to amend his life; knowing that God Almighty would the more strictly demand his soul at our hands the more we, above all others, had been given permission and authority to rebuke him. ~:e, while often sending to us devoted letters and greetings excusing himself both with his age, which was pliable and frail, and because evil was often recommended to him by those who had the court in their hands, promised, indeed, in words, from day to day, that he would most readily receive our warnings; but in fact, and by increasing his faults, he entirely trod them under foot. 


says they diligently "urged him in every way" to stop his actions, and he would send letters to them giving excuses and saying it was his age and recomendation of his advisors, and "promised" he would recieve their warnings but never did.


	In the mean while we called to repentance some of his associates by whose counsels and machinations he had, with simoniacal heresy, defiled bishoprics and many monasteries, introducing, for money, wolves instead of shepherds. For we wished both that, while there was yet time to make amends they should restore to the venerable places where they belonged the goods of the church which they, through so shameful a traffic, had with sacrilegious hand received- and that they themselves, through the lamentations of penitence, should render satisfaction to God for the iniquity perpetrated. But when we learned that they had scorned the terms appointed for carrying out these things and were obstinately continuing in their accustomed iniquity, we justly separated them, as sacrilegious persons and ministers and members of the devil, from the communion and body of the whole church. And we warned the king to expel them, as excommunicate, from his palace and his counsels and from all intercourse with himself. 


they were upset he wasn't appointing the bishops they wanted


	But meanwhile the cause of the Saxons gained the upper hand against the king. And when he saw that the forces and the protectors of the land were ready, for the most part, to abandon him, he once more directed to us a letter, supplicatory and full of all humility. In it he acknowledged his guilt towards God Almighty, St. Peter and ourselves; praying that, whatever faults he might have committed in ecclesiastical matters against the institutions of the canons and the decrees of the holy fathers, we, with our t: apostolic foresight and authority, should strive to correct. And in this matter he promised us, in every way, obediences consent and faithful aid. Afterwards, being admitted to penance by our brothers and legates Humbert bishop of Praeneste and Gerald bishop of Ostia whom we sent to him, he renewed to them and confirmed this promise. swearing by the sacred stoles which they bore about their necks. 


the Saxons started winning against Henry then he was supplicatory to them again


could Gregory "use" the Saxons like he was said to be able to use the Normans?

Charlemange and others helped convert Saxons:


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Saxons#Christianity
	The continental Saxons were evangelised largely by English missionaries in the late 7th and early 8th centuries. Around 695, two early English missionaries, Hewald the White and Hewald the Black, were martyred by the vicani, that is, villagers.[42] Throughout the century that followed, villagers and other peasants proved to be the greatest opponents of Christianisation, while missionaries often received the support of the edhilingui and other noblemen. Saint Lebuin, an Englishman who between 745 and 770 preached to the Saxons, mainly in the eastern Netherlands, built a church and made many friends among the nobility. Some of them rallied to save him from an angry mob at the annual council at Marklo (near river Weser, Bremen). Social tensions arose between the Christianity-sympathetic noblemen and the pagan lower castes, who were staunchly faithful to their traditional religion.[47]

	Under Charlemagne, the Saxon Wars had as their chief object the conversion and integration of the Saxons into the Frankish empire. Though much of the highest caste converted readily, forced baptisms and forced tithing made enemies of the lower orders. Even some contemporaries found the methods employed to win over the Saxons wanting, as this excerpt from a letter of Alcuin of York to his friend Meginfrid, written in 796, shows:

	    If the light yoke and sweet burden of Christ were to be preached to the most obstinate people of the Saxons with as much determination as the payment of tithes has been exacted, or as the force of the legal decree has been applied for fault of the most trifling sort imaginable, perhaps they would not be averse to their baptismal vows.[48]

	Charlemagne's successor, Louis the Pious, reportedly treated the Saxons more as Alcuin would have wished, and as a consequence they were faithful subjects.[49] The lower classes, however, revolted against Frankish overlordship in favour of their old paganism as late as the 840s, when the Stellinga rose up against the Saxon leadership, who were allied with the Frankish emperor Lothair I. After the suppression of the Stellinga, in 851 Louis the German brought relics from Rome to Saxony to foster a devotion to the Roman Catholic Church.[50] The Poeta Saxo, in his verse Annales of Charlemagne's reign (written between 888 and 891), laid an emphasis on his conquest of Saxony. He celebrated the Frankish monarch as on par with the Roman emperors and as the bringer of Christian salvation to people. References are made to periodic outbreaks of pagan worship, especially of Freya, among the Saxon peasantry as late as the 12th century.

	Christian literature

	In the 9th century, the Saxon nobility became vigorous supporters of monasticism and formed a bulwark of Christianity against the existing Slavic paganism to the east and the Nordic paganism of the Vikings to the north. 


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Saxon_Rebellion

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Otto_of_Nordheim

Otto of Nordheim had leading role in Saxon rebellion, was involved in kidnapping coup of Henry and was accused of plotting to murder him later.


gregory's letter makes it sound like the Saxons gaining upper hand and Henry changing his tune happened after the start of investiture conflict? he had already defeated them in 1075, and the humilation he did of bishops there was said to be mirrored in his walk to Canossa:


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Battle_of_Langensalza_(1075)
	The defeat was stunning. It shocked the Saxons, and the supporters of the rebellion became frantic. The Archbishop of Mainz threatened excommunication against the Thuringians in order to gain funds to finance the insurrection. Unfortunately, Henry and his army ravaged the Saxon and Thuringian countryside, bringing starvation. The Archbishop of Magdeburg eventually conceded and requested the terms to which the King would hold the rebels. Henry demanded a short imprisonment for all the leaders, as well as confiscation of their fiefs and their redistribution among loyal Imperial partisans. As harsh as the terms were, the complete victory Henry gained at Langensalza convinced them to accept. In a humiliating gesture, the rebel bishops, nobles and peasants walked barefoot between the ranks of the King's army and submitted to him. The King then convened a meeting of princes at Goslar on Christmas to determine the future of Saxony; he ended up freeing Otto of Nordheim and making him his viceroy to Saxony. Henry considered the Saxon question settled, but the Investiture conflict would quickly undo the peace.


https://books.google.com/books?id=QP8fNo5UNIYC&pg=PA151&lpg=PA151
	Bishop Herman of Metz’s reaction to the news of the king’s excommunication was to release the prisoners entrusted to his care after the defeat of the Saxons in 1075. 47 The return of the prisoners- of-war to Saxony rekindled the spirit of resistance stifled by Henry’s victory. The Saxons were especially heartened by the escape of Burchard of Halberstadt in June. Burchard, regarded by the king as ‘the leader of the whole Saxon rebellion’, was kept in close captivity in the royal household until an opportunity occurred to send him into a secure exile. A distinguished visitor, the king’s sister, Queen Judith-Sophia of Hungary, returning to her husband’s kingdom, agreed to take the prisoner with her. During the journey down the Danube Burchard jumped ship and returned to his diocese. 48 Henry sought to check the growing unrest in Saxony by freeing Archbishop Werner of Magdeburg and Bishop Werner of Merseburg and sending them to assure the Saxons of the king’s goodwill and love of justice. Their mission did nothing to calm the duchy. 49


Bishop Herman of Metz released Saxon prisoners upon hearing Henry excommunicated, which rekindled Saxon rebellion, especially by Burchard of Halberstadt. Henry though Burchard was the leader of the rebellion. Henry freed two bishops and sent them to Saxony which he thought would check Saxon unrest, but it didn't work. 

	
	The opening hostilities in this new phase of the Saxon rebellion were the work of the Wettin princes Theoderic and William, sons of Count Gero of Brehna. They had fled to the Slav lands beyond the Elbe to avoid surrender- ing in 1075 and now returned to make war on the king’s adherents in Saxony. 50 Henry’s principal representative in the province was Otto of Northeim, who since his submission at Christmastide 1075 had exercised ‘the government of the whole of Saxony’ from his headquarters in the Harzburg. As resistance to the crown began to revive, Otto was pressed by his compatriots to expiate his recent treachery by embracing the cause of Saxon liberty again. The conse- quence was that ‘henceforward he lived in friendship and alliance with the Saxons’. Initially he adopted the role of mediator between Henry and his Saxon opponents, communicating the Saxons’ demands that Henry release the remaining prisoners and dismantle the controversial royal castles. Otto privately promised the Saxon princes that he would join their rebellion if the king refused these demands. His opposition to the crown became overt when, in August, Henry decided, against Otto’s advice, to lead an expedition into Saxony to check the incursions of the rebel Wettins. The king entered the march of Meissen with his ally, Duke Vratislav II of Bohemia. Otto then declared that ‘since [the king] had more faith in foolish flatterers than in [Otto] and placed more hope and trust in the Bohemian contingent than in the German army’, he considered himself absolved from his oath to serve Henry. The king’s arrival provoked ‘many thousands’ of Saxons to take up arms against him, and his small army might have been cut to pieces had not the flooding of the River Mulde hindered the Saxon advance and allowed Henry to retreat to Bohemia. 51 As a reward for his loyal service, the king con- ferred the march of Meissen on Duke Vratislav, having already granted him the march of Lower Lusatia in 1075. Henry hoped to secure control of the Thuringian marcher territories by using the power of his Bohemian ally, his own resources having proved inadequate. In so doing he disinherited his own kinsman, Ekbert II of Brunswick, ‘a boy still far below the age of knighthood’. Ekbert’s youth would have disqualified him, in the opinion of most contem- poraries, from holding such a responsible office as the march of Meissen: nevertheless the king’s action confirmed the Saxon view of Henry as a lawless tyrant. The Saxon rebels expelled Vratislav’s garrisons from the fortresses of his march and replaced them with knights loyal to Ekbert II. 


Wettin princes returned to attack Henry in Saxony. Otto was Henry's principal rep there. Otto was pressed to embrace Saxon liberty again. He acted as mediator and told Henry Saxon demands to release remaining prisoners and dismantle castles, while telling Saxons privately he would support rebellion if Henry refused. Meanwhile Henry decided to go into Saxony to attack Wettins, against Otto's advice. Otto decided to switch back to Saxons while Henry's arrival in Saxony provoked Saxons to take arms against him. Henry gave the inheritence of a young noble to the guy who helped him against Wettins which pissed off Saxons even more.



https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Burchard_II_(bishop_of_Halberstadt)
	Burchard of Veltheim (also Burckhardt, Bucco, or Buko; c. 1028 – 7 April 1088) was a German cleric and Bishop of Halberstadt (as Burchard II) from 1059 until his death.

	...A member of the Veltheim noble family, possibly of Swabian origin, Burchard was a maternal nephew of the archbishops Anno II of Cologne and Werner of Magdeburg. In 1057, he became provost of the Collegiate Church of St. Simon and St. Jude at the Imperial Palace of Goslar. In 1059, through the intervention of his uncle, Archbishop Anno, he succeeded Bishop Burchard I in the diocese of Halberstadt.

	In October 1062, it was the decision of a German-Italian synod held at Augsburg to send Burchard, high in the favour of Empress dowager Agnes of Poitou, to Rome to mediate a disputed Papal election between the legitimate Pope Alexander II and the Antipope Honorius II. Although the German crown stood by Honorius, Burchard vowed to stand by Hildebrand, the great Papal reformer, and supported Alexander. In gratitude, Alexander bestowed on Burchard the coveted pallium.

	In the dead of winter 1067–1068, Burchard, crossing frozen marshland, invaded the country of the Slavic Lutici tribes. His forces razed the pagan temple at Rethra (Radagoszcz), and the bishop returned to Saxony riding the sacred black horse.


Burchard was the guy Henry thought was the leader of the Saxon rebellion and the one whose escape from prison did the most to hearten Saxon rebels. He was related to Anno II and was made bishop of Halberstadt with Anno's intervention. Burchard had a history of going against German crown in favor of Gregory (then Hildebrand) and gained favor of Pope Alexander II.


this says Burchard and Otto lead beginning of Saxon rebellion:

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Saxon_Rebellion
	According to the chronicler Lambert of Hersfeld, the Saxon princes came to the Imperial Palace of Goslar on 29 June 1073 in order to point to these abuses and demand improvements. Henry IV refused to enter discussions and then fled from the large, advancing Saxon army to the nearby castle of Harzburg, where he was besieged by the Saxon rebels, again led by Count Otto of Nordheim together with Bishop Burchard II of Halberstadt. The king, however, was able to escape on the night of 10 August 1073, allegedly through the castle's well shaft. Henry fled across the Harz mountains reaching the Landgraviate of Thuringia at Eschwege first and then moved on to Franconian Hersfeld further into southern Germany. But he found hardly any support among the princes of the Empire, who were not willing to go to battle with him against the Saxons.

	As a result, on 27 January 1074, Henry stood at the head of what was only a small army compared to the much larger Saxon one at Hersfeld. Both sides were afraid to join in battle, but for different reasons. Henry probably because of his obvious inferiority. The Saxon leaders, by contrast, were aware that a victory by their army, consisting mainly of peasants, would have strengthened the position of the latter, something they were not in favour of. So it happened that on 2 February 1074 peace negotiations in Gerstungen took place, which resulted in a settlement between the warring parties. The main outcome was that Henry IV agreed to the slighting of his castles on the edge of the Harz.


Henry had to run from them before

how did Otto and Burchard get an army of Saxon peasants?


https://books.google.com/books?id=QP8fNo5UNIYC&pg=PA89&lpg=PA89
	When noblemen were persuaded by such arguments to rebel, they were supported by east Saxon bishops, whose grievances, according to Bruno of Merseburg, were of the same character as those of the secular princes. The chronicler claimed that Archbishop Werner of Magdeburg and his nephew, Bishop Burchard II of Halberstadt, were provoked into rebellion by royal attacks on their property, that is, by Henry IV’s ‘policy of recuperation’. 80 The role of the two prelates was in fact more complex than this. Although from 1073 until the end of their lives they were among Henry IV’s bitterest enemies, they had previously enjoyed close contact with the court and as late as 1072 they were still in the king’s confidence. Henry celebrated Whitsun (27 May) 1072 in Magdeburg, his second visit to the city during Werner’s archiepisco- pate. Werner had been a fairly frequent visitor at court, his last appearance being in March 1072 in Goslar, and his church had benefited from royal gen- erosity. 81 Werner is a shadowy figure, however, compared with his nephew, the astute and energetic politician Burchard, who had enjoyed an unusually active career in the service of the crown. The evidence of the royal diplomas reveals two periods during which Burchard was continuously in the royal entourage: in July 1062 – May 1064 and in May 1068 – April 1070. During the former period Burchard was entrusted with an important mission in the Italian kingdom; during the latter period he commanded the successful expedition of 1068 against the Liutizi. 82 The church of Halberstadt reaped the reward of her bishop’s faithful service. 83 On 12 June 1071 the king celebrated Whitsun in Halberstadt and was present at the consecration of Burchard’s new cathedral and on 27 April 1072 Burchard appeared at court for the last time before the rebellion. 84

	Werner and Burchard were members of the Steusslingen family, Swabians of the minor nobility, who first came to prominence when Anno of Steusslingen became archbishop of Cologne. Werner was Anno’s brother, Burchard his sister’s son. Anno’s family established itself with particular success in Saxony. During the eighty years following Anno’s appointment to Cologne his family produced two archbishops of Magdeburg, two bishops of Halberstadt and a bishop of Münster. Simultaneously some of their lay kinsmen settled in the region. 85 The careers of the Steusslingen family help to explain Lampert’s allegation that Henry IV intended to replace the Saxons with Swabian settlers, very many of whom, ‘men sprung from obscure or almost non-existent ancestry’, he raised ‘to the highest honours’. 86


Burchard and Werner were at first loyal to Henry, were related to Anno who's family had a lot of influence and settled in Saxony.

	
	Werner of Magdeburg and Burchard of Halberstadt were, therefore, characteristic figures of the Henrician regime in Saxony against which (according to Lampert and Bruno) the rebellion of 1073 was directed; but they themselves were leading rebels. The consequence of their refusal to join the rebellion would probably have been the loss of their sees, which was the fate of three royalist prelates in 1073. ‘Archbishop Liemar of Bremen, Bishop Eberhard of Naumburg and Bishop Benno of Osnabrück were driven out of Saxony because they would not concur with the general opinion of their race.’ 87 It is unlikely, however, that this was what prompted Burchard of Halberstadt to rebel. He was not a reluctant rebel, forced to participate by the threats of his neighbours, the secular princes. Henry IV allegedly regarded him as ‘the leader of the whole Saxon rebellion and the originator and instigator of all the evils which flowed from it’. 88 The crucial factor in Burchard’s rebellion was his devotion to eccle- siastical reform. Burchard was one of the first German bishops to play an active part in defending the interests of the reform papacy. His role in ending the papal schism (1062) resulted in a close friendship with Pope Alexander II, who proclaimed him ‘the special son’ of the Roman church. 89 Like his uncle, Anno of Cologne, Burchard promoted monastic reform in his diocese. 90 The close connection between support for monastic reform and opposition to Henry IV is also apparent in the career of Bishop Werner of Merseburg, the founder of the monastery of St Peter on the Altenburg. Werner, like Burchard, had close contacts with the court during the early years of the reign, while Henry IV (imitating his father’s practice) visited Merseburg five times in the years 1057-71. 91 After 1073, however, Werner became the king’s enemy. It was in his entourage that Bruno composed his Saxon War and to him that the chronicler dedicated the work. 92

	The presence of reform-minded bishops in the Saxon conspiracy of summer 1073 is reflected in Lampert’s version of the princes’ demands at Goslar on the eve of the rebellion. The complaints against the king’s castle- building, confiscations, evil counsellors and frequent visits to eastern Saxony, are accompanied by complaints about Henry’s failure to behave like a Christian king. He must dismiss ‘the swarm of concubines with whom he slept, contrary to the dictates of the canons’, adhere to the queen, whom he had married ‘according to the traditions of the Church’ and abandon the youthful vices with which ‘he had defamed the royal dignity’. The princes had sworn an oath of fealty to him, but it was valid ‘only if he wished to be a king who would build the Church of God, not destroy it’. If he failed to preserve the rights of Church and people, the princes would ‘fight for the Church of God, the Christian faith and their liberty’ and make war against him ‘as against a barbarian enemy and oppressor of the name of Christ’. 93 A holy war against ‘a barbarian enemy’ was a concept which Burchard of Halberstadt knew well, having waged such a war in 1068 against the Liutizi. He destroyed their cult centre of Rethra, seized their sacred horse and used it as his mount when the expedition returned to Saxony. 94 Five years later Burchard was ready to fight a similar holy war against a king whose conduct towards his subjects and towards the Church seemed to him as bad as that of the heathen Liutizi. The attitude of Burchard of Halberstadt, Werner of Merseburg and perhaps the shadowy Werner of Magdeburg anticipates that of the Gregorian bishops who would obey the command of Pope Gregory VII to rebel against the king in 1076. In 1076 in eastern Saxony Henry IV already faced the combination of political and spiritual opposition that was to be characteristic of the late eleventh-century conflict of empire and papacy.


Burchard and Wener were supporters of the pope's reform efforts, and this was said to contribute to their opposition to Henry.

There was a religious component to Burchard and Werner's opposition to Henry and the rebel prince's demands at the eve of the rebellion. Demanded he dismiss his swarm of concubines, abandon youthful fivces, and "build the church of God."

Burchard had let a holy war before

rebelion said to be "combination of political and spiritual opposition" and "instigated in large measure by their bishops" (https://books.google.com/books?id=XdE7AQAAMAAJ&pg=PA764&lpg=PA764)

this adds to understanding of why Henry might have thought getting absolved by Pope would reduce the threat from the rebel princes

this also aids in understanding Pope Gregory's letter explaining himself to the German princes, where he says Henry showed submission to him after he started losing to Saxons.


why does wikipedia say this?


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Saxon_Rebellion
	...To secure these estates he initiated a castle building programme, erecting numerous fortresses along the range, the most prominent being the Harzburg. This was perceived as a threat by the Saxons. In addition, these castles were staffed with ministeriales of Swabian origin, who frequently plundered the Saxon population to make up for their lack of income..[2]

	Motives of the participants
	
	In order to grasp the reason for the outbreak of the uprising, it is important to deal with the persons and parties involved. These were, in this instance, Emperor Henry IV, the Saxon nobility and the remaining imperial princes.

	...The motives of the Saxon nobles are now obvious, as they were hugely affected by Henry's actions and were consequently outraged. They did not want to give up so easily the influence that they had built up during the absence of a ruler..[7] This independence, which the king himself tried to achieve, led to a competition with the king, which in turn led to dissatisfaction among the Saxon princes.[8] Henry's endeavours led to the desire for a ruler who was easier to control and to the king being blamed by the Saxons for his abuse of official authority.[9] There was also a conflict due to the so-called "royal immediacy", the regular presence of the king in certain parts of the Empire. This situation was possibly overdramatized; for the king stayed in other parts of the Empire without similar complications.[10] Among the Saxon princes, a certain Otto of Northeim, in particular, found the king a serious thorn in his side due to his participation in the Coup of Kaiserswerth and his expansion of possessions in the Harz.[11] Because of this dispute and the later loss of his estates, Otto takes a leading role in the insurrection during the course of the alleged murder plot against the king.

	...According to the chronicler Lambert of Hersfeld, the Saxon princes came to the Imperial Palace of Goslar on 29 June 1073 in order to point to these abuses and demand improvements.


would be important to learn from history how religion could be used as a tool by power-grabbing nobles and the church abused their power, but wikipedia omits that


The Papacy was said to have been able to "use" Normans to defend himself (iirc played out later in conflict with Henry), gave William the conquerer blessing to invade England with encouragement from a bishop in Pope's favor, gave another banner to the army that invaded Milan, and Burchard, apparently an agent of the Pope, had lead a holy war before. The bishops at the head of the Saxon rebellion were said to have obeyed the command of Gregory VII.


Machiavelli spoke of church terrifying princes and not allowing them to have their own cardinals, who "fostered the factions in Rome" in his time:

https://www.gutenberg.org/files/1232/1232-h/1232-h.htm
	Pope Julius came afterwards and found the Church strong, possessing all the Romagna, the barons of Rome reduced to impotence, and, through the chastisements of Alexander, the factions wiped out; he also found the way open to accumulate money in a manner such as had never been practised before Alexander's time. Such things Julius not only followed, but improved upon, and he intended to gain Bologna, to ruin the Venetians, and to drive the French out of Italy. All of these enterprises prospered with him, and so much the more to his credit, inasmuch as he did everything to strengthen the Church and not any private person. He kept also the Orsini and Colonnesi factions within the bounds in which he found them; and although there was among them some mind to make disturbance, nevertheless he held two things firm: the one, the greatness of the Church, with which he terrified them; and the other, not allowing them to have their own cardinals, who caused the disorders among them. For whenever these factions have their cardinals they do not remain quiet for long, because cardinals foster the factions in Rome and out of it, and the barons are compelled to support them, and thus from the ambitions of prelates arise disorders and tumults among the barons. For these reasons his Holiness Pope Leo(*) found the pontificate most powerful, and it is to be hoped that, if others made it great in arms, he will make it still greater and more venerated by his goodness and infinite other virtues. 


Machievelli spoke in support of Pope Leo


this guy also rules out church influence in the Saxon rebellion more explicitly:


https://books.google.com/books?id=Tv0_AQAAMAAJ&pg=PA527&lpg=PA527
	Church and State in Mediaeval Germany

	By James Westfall Thompson

	...Such as we have described it, is the complex background of the war by investiture upon the verge of which we now are. It was a series of wheels within wheels, of struggle within struggle, at the bottom of every one of which, in last analysis, the church's lands and the church's resources were the subject of fued. One other factor yet remains to be mentioned, although this is not the place to enter into consideration of the causes of the great revolt of the Saxons under Henry IV. It was inspired by a blend of tribal jealousy, political and economic grievance, and social unrest. It was in no sense due to any religious or ecclesiastical issue, even remotely.

	...The coincidence between the rebellion of the Saxons and the prohibition by Gregory VII of lay investiture was not accidental. The pope's action was deliberately timed.

	...No thinking person of the time was duped by the Saxon professions of religious devotion. Their special and local motives were clearly perceived. Real Gregorianism probably had less actual sway in Saxony than anywhere else in Germany.


Westfall seems to rule out that these "self-interested" nobles might have been working for the Church or thought the Church was too powerful to oppose, as is suggested by bishops falling in line after death of William of Ulretch. Lying about religious devotion does not preclude working for the Pope.


Westfall doesn't seem like good historian, looks like his books would do more to stir shit than answer questions:

https://archive.org/stream/russiandiplomacy11thom/russiandiplomacy11thom_djvu.txt
	It were well for the reader clearly to perceive the actual, au- thentic diplomatic relations at this juncture, for since the war began the allied governments have deliberately tried to misrepresent the facts so as to exonerate Russia and to make it appear that Germany and Austria are wholly to blame. This construction is contained in what is misleadingly termed a “Dispatch from His Majesty’s ambassador at Vienna respecting the rupture of diplomatic relations with the Austro-Hungarian Government,” for it was not written, from Vienna, but was prepared in London, after Sir Maurice de Bunsen had been given his passports, and is dated Sept. 1, 1914. Obviously is cannot be a dispatch.* It is clearly an inspired tract calculated to mislead and to deceive. In this pamphlet Sir Maurice de Bunsen twists the sequence of events in order to make it appear that Germany, on July 31, through her “double ultimatums to St. Petersburg and Paris” violently shattered “the hopeful conversations” which had been going on between Vienna and St. Petersburg. 

	...Russia has also had another motive in promoting war. There is strong evidence that Russia in the Spring and early Summer of this year was upon the verge of revolutionary outbreak which the war has averted.

(this was written 1915)


	...Russia is playing with dangerous, intangible and in- calculable forces in her own midst, which she does not understand, as France did in 1792, and these may yet turn and rend her as France was rent by the Terror. She has chosen the desperate course of vio- lating the peace of the world and beginning a war which staggers hu- manity because she has shrunk from facing the results of her own stupidity and incapacity to govern.

	This is not an extravagant, disordered view of Russia’s present internal condition. The recent open letter of the leader of the Social- Democratic Party in Russia to M. Vandervelde, chief of the Belgian Social Democracy, shows the real spirit of popular Russia.


...


It's hard to find sources on what the Saxon layman thought of the rebellion

this might be one:

https://en.wikisource.org/wiki/Catholic_Encyclopedia_(1913)/Bruno_the_Saxon
	Catholic Encyclopedia (1913)/Bruno the Saxon

	A German chronicler of the eleventh Century and author of the "Historia de Bello Saxonico". Little is known of his life. He was apparently a Saxon monk belonging to the household of Archbishop Werner, of Magdeburg, who was a vigorous opponent of Henry IV and one of the leaders of the Saxon uprising against the emperor. After the death of the archbishop in 1078 at the hands of peasants, Bruno attached himself to Werner, Bishop of Merseburg, to whom, in 1082, he dedicated the work, "De Bello Saxonico" by which he is chiefly known. As its name indicates, it is a record of the struggles of the Saxons with the Emperor Henry IV. The author begins with an account of the youth of Henry and the evil influence exerted over him by Adalbert of Bremen after he had passed from the stern tutelage of Anno, Archbishop of Cologne. He then traces the relations of the emperor with the Saxons and narrates at length the causes and events of the rebellion, ending with the election of Hermann of Luxemburg as king in 1081.

	There has been a difference of opinion regarding the historical value of Bruno's work. It was written during the contentions between Henry and Gregory VII, and the author has been classed with those partisans who, either through ignorance or malice, endeavoured to lower Henry in the esteem of his subjects (Stenzel). Bruno indeed supported the pope's cause, and his Saxon sympathies manifest themselves at times in his writings, but of his sincerity and his expressed purpose to narrate the truth there can be no doubt. He made the most of his sources of information and, in spite of occasional omissions, gives a vivid picture of the times from the point of view of an interested contemporary. The letters of Saxon bishops and other original documents which he includes in his history give an added value to the work.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Bruno_the_Saxon
	Bruno sought to justify the rebellion of the Saxons and the election of the first anti-king, Rudolf, and to show how by his oppressive government King Henry had forfeited any right to rule, both for himself and his dynasty. Bruno also devoted considerable attention to Henry’s dispute with Pope Gregory VII, ten of whose letters he reproduced in his history. But while supporting the pope against the king, he made clear, both in his own words and through letters which he copied, that the German rebels were deeply disappointed by the Gregory’s absolution of Henry at Canossa in December 1076, and his attempt to remain neutral after the more intransigent rebels had elected a rival king at Forchheim in March 1077. Bruno was at pains to stress that this election was conducted with the full knowledge and involvement of a papal legate, and indeed followed the standards of probity laid down by canon law. Hence there could be no doubt about its validity.[3] Bruno described the dissatisfaction of the Saxons to the actions of Gregory VII. The German rebels reproached Gregory VII for not supporting the anti-king Rudolf. The letters to which they refer, which Bruno reproduced in full, were those sent by Gregory in the summer of 1077 to his legates, and to the clergy and people of Germany, setting out the terms by which a judgement might be made between the respective claims of Henry and Rudolf to be the rightful king.[4]


http://dailymedieval.blogspot.com/2014/10/bruno-saxon.html
	This is not to say that Bruno was impartial: in the conflicts between Henry and the papacy (mainly, the Investiture Controversy), Bruno unsurprisingly takes the pope's side. When the excommunication was lifted by Pope Gregory VII, it was conditional upon Henry's good behavior: particularly, he had to forego wearing his regalia for a year to show humility, and avoid the company of the men who has counseled him to overreach himself. Unfortunately,

	    But when he began to exclude these men from his company, they started to make a great fuss, telling him that if he now drove away those by whose wisdom and courage he had up to now held his kingdom, the pope would be able neither to restore it to him nor to obtain another for him. These words and others like them led him to change his mind, and he wickedly returned through their evil counsel to his customary ways. He placed upon his head the diadem of gold and kept in his heart the anathema, stronger than iron. He mixed in communion with the excommunicate, and this wretched man was thrust out from communion with the saints. He now made it clear to all that what he said, that he preferred the kingdom of Heaven to earthly things, was untrue. Had he remained obedient for [even] a little while, he would have held his earthly kingdom in peace, and at some future time would have come into possession of the heavenly and eternal one. But now, for his disobedience, he would not have the one that he loved without great toil, and would never receive the other without a complete change in his way of life. [link]

	Bruno seems to want to give Henry the benefit of the doubt and explain his failings as the evil influence of others.

	Despite obvious biases, however, Bruno provides some valuable history by giving us a taste of life at the time and by including other sources in his Historia, such as letters from Saxon bishops and other original documents.


Bruno wanted to justify the Saxon rebellion and give an account of its causes. He wrote about how Henry was oppresive and wrote on his dispute with pope Gregory VII. He wrote that Henry was disobedient and returned to his "wicked" advisers who Bruno disliked.

The clergy were able to influence the opinion of church-goers. The constant message was that their local priest was their passport to heaven, and apparently many believed this as they would pay tithes and indulgences. Did Bruno's writing reflect what was told to the public? The excerpts of his writing so far emphasize Henry falling out of line with the church and disobedience to the Pope.

Bruno and Saxon rebels apparently cared about what pope said. They were dissapointed that Gregory absolved Henry and Henry was at pains to stress Gregory was acting with support of papal legate.

Did Gregory's excommunication have weight with the Saxon rebels? Henry apparently thought absolving that was important to his survival.


https://books.google.com/books?id=Dw_RnDP6V9UC&pg=PA81&lpg=PA81
	...In his account of the battle, Bruno, the author of the Saxon War and a firm partisan of the rebels, described in some detail the efforts of the clerics on both sides to invoke divine aid. Before the fighting began, priests serving in Henry IV's army sang the Te Deum laudamus, almost certianly in an effort to enlist the support of God for their cause and to lift the spirits of the royal soldiers who were fighting at the fords to forestall a Saxon crossing. But, at the same time as Henry's bishops were praying on his behalf, prelates supporting the Saxon rebels ordered all of the priests serving with them to sing Psalm 82 with great devotion. The ext of this psalm was particularly appropriate for the battlefield in that it calls on God to destroy the enemies of His people. indeed, from the Saxon perspective, King Henry and his supporters were manifestly the enemies of God and the church after having been excommunicated a second time by Pope Gregory VII. It was therefore with evident satisfaction that Bruno emphasized that the intercessory efforts of the royalist prelates had gone for naught. Henry IV's bishops were forced to flee their camp and abandom their heavily laden baggage train. Saxon soldiers captured their costly tents as well as all of the sacred vestments and vessels that they had brought on campaign to celebrate mass and perform the other religious rituals in support of the king's army.

	The service of priests and bishops on both sides of the battle of the Elster river was thoroughly consistent with contemporary theological views about the military-pastoral obligations of the clergy. Burchard, bishop of Worms (1000-1025) ... wrote an episcopal handbook in which he dealt with the duties and obligations of the comtemporary German episcopate. In his role both as a royal advisor and as an imperial bishop, Burchard was thoroughly familiar with the religious needs of soldiers on campaign and with the duties that could be expected of contemporary clerics. ...These texts emphasized that two or three bishops along with their attendant priests could serve with the army in order to carry out a wide variety of religious duties. These included offering blessings to the troops, preaching, reconciling the men with God, hearing confessions, assigning penances, celebrating mass, and giving last rites to the troops.




------


recap so far:


Catholic church became the new dominant power of Europe after the fall of the Roman empire

By the time of Martin Luther, Catholic church had enormous power over population that relied on ignorance and superstition--indoctrinated that the Church was their passport to heaven. Peasants struggled to pay tithe, indulgences, and work on Church land for free a number of days a week. Some had to pay tithe in grain which church collected in "tithe barns."

clergy would generally be political force and involved in secular politics

Charles the Great conquered the Saxons and converted them to Roman catholicism

Charles the Simple made a deal with the Normans to let them settle in exchange for stopping raids and converting to Roman Catholicism

by the 11th century the papacy would "make use of" Normans and other peoples to defend themselves or for conquest. The French, Burgundianns, Normans, Catalans, and Aragonese were called upon by Pope Alexander II for the "Crusade of Barbastro", where these armies murdered, plundered, and raped the city of Barastro which disgusted the Muslims and some of the Christians there. Pope Alexander II also gave a papal banner to Erambald who was involved in large-scale civil unrest in Milan.

Before 11th century papacy began to see English who were loyal to church as their subjects, but English church was disorderly, unorganized, and autonomous compared to Europe continent. They saw pope at top but had close relationship to English King. Rome demanded tribute from England and English Church and Rome had a falling out. This was backdrop for William the Conqueror's papal support.

William the Conqueror was very religious, thought God was on his side, and later convinced himself he was God's chosen leader of England. William sent an emissary to asking pope Alexander II for his blessing to invade England and got approval and a papal banner, with help from Gregory VII according to his letter. Gregory VII wrote in another letter that he thought William was loyal to the church.

Bishop Lanfranc had an "unparalleled" closeness of collaboration with William, whom he mentored. William was said to have "venerated [Lanfranc] as a father, respected him as a teacher, and loved him as a brother or a son. To [Lanfranc] he committed the guidance of his soul". Lanfranc had some "obvious moral defects," such as convincing Waltheof to confess his involvement in a conspiracy to overthrow William to William himself, which lead to his execution in 1076.

Lanfranc founded a school Bec abbey, whose monks ommitted papal support for William's conquest in their writings. At Bec Lanfranc tutored pupils from all over Europe, many of whom later attained high positions in the church, including future Pope Alexander II.

Before the invasion, Lanfranc and monks of Bec said the English church was "corrupt" and needed "reform." Lanfranc opposed the English nobles' practice of "simony," buying off church positions. William was said to share this perception and had Lanfranc in mind to reform it.

After the invasion, Lanfranc was made archbishop of canterbury, where he took an active part in the administration of England. He was in charge of reorganizing church in England. After the revolts of 1068-69, the mass majority of old English church bishops and abbots were deposed. William and Lanfranc were ruthless in replacing the English bishops with bishops from Normandy and the European continent. Some lower English clergy thought Lanfranc's appointments were tyranical and clashed with them, the most famous incident ending in Lanfranc abbot Tousain sending archers to shoot 21 English monks. William sent Tousain back to normandy but Tousain later bough his abbacy back from William II for 500 pounds of silver. The English church was plundered and its spoils sent to Normandy, France and Rome.

In 1071, Pope Alexander II wrote William a letter praising him for his unmistakable evidence for support of the Church and "battle against the forces of simoniacal heresy" and urging William to continue following the advice of Lanfranc.

Later, Alexander's successor Pope Gregory VII would call on William to aid him in his military conflict with Henry IV of Germany. William refused. On his deathbed, William said "I tremble when I reflect on the grievous sins which burden my conscience, and now, about to be summoned before the awful tribunal of God, I know not what I ought to do. I was too fond of war... I was bred to arms from my childhood, and I am stained with the rivers of blood that I have shed."

Around the time of Alexander II and Gregory VII the church started centralizing its power and increasing the power of the pope. Kings would often appoint their own bishops, but Gregory decreed in 1075 that only the church could appoint bishops, who had vast political power. Gregory decreed that papal power was the sole universal power and that deposal of of an emperor was under the sole power of the pope. Henry IV opposed this policy.


Henry had experience with intrigues by clergy and trouble with papacy before 1075. His mother, empress Agnes, helped Gregory consolidate power of the papcy which led to the election of Alexander II, but then refused to support Alexander and supported an opponent. Archbishop Anno II and Otto of Nordheim kidnapped 11-year-old Henry and held him as ransom; Agnes resigned and Anno took the throne along with Siegfried of Mainz and Adalbert of Bremen. Anno would go on to educate Henry. Anno was in power until the rebellion of 1074, where it was reported he sided with William the Conqueror against Henry. Anno put down the rebellion but resigned.

Leading up to 1073, Gregory didn't like Henry's advisors and who they were appointing as bishops, who Gregory said were being manipulated by Henry instead of being loyal to the pope. He accused Henry of simony and admonished him to drop his advisors, who had been excommunicated by Alexander II.

Duke Otto of Nordheim, Bishop Siegfriend of Metz, and Biishop Burchard of Halberstadt helped lead a 1073 Saxon rebellion. After Anno made Burchard a bishop under Agnes, Burchard had turned on her in her opposition to Alexander II and supported Alexander instead. Otto and Siegfried were co-conspirators in Anno's coup. Burchard and a Bishop Werner of Magdesburg were a part of Anno's family who were powerful in Saxony who supported the pope's reform efforts. Burchard had led a holy war for the pope before. At the Saxon rebellion of 1073, they demanded Henry support the Church and promised a holy war against him.

Henry submitted and wrote a penitential letter to Gregory in September 1073 because of the Saxon rebellion, a crisis for Henry where he had to flee.

Henry continued fighting the Saxons and dealt them a major defeat in June 1075. After this, Henry brought back his excommunicated advisors. He released Otto of Nordheim and made him his representative in Saxony.

Around this time, Gregory made his decree that only he could appoint bishops and depose emperors. Henry ignored this decree while Gregory threatened to excommunicate Henry. Henry got some political support against Gregory at the council of Worms in January 1076. At Worms they objected to Gregory disregarding rights of bishops, subjecting bishops to the 'common frenzy' of the mob, and intruding on their jurisdiction against local law. Henry wrote Gregory a letter accusing him of sewing malice and confusion in the Church, laying hands on bishops and treating them like slaves, winning the favor of commoners by crushing them and treating them like the know nothing, using his knowledge for destruction, gaining power by wiles, money, and violence, and disturbing peace by arming subjects against their kings.

Gregory excommunicated Henry in response and said his subjects were released from his command. Gregory wrote a letter to German bishops and princes explaining his excommunication of Henry. In his letter, he said that Henry had once acted with "simoniacal heresy," listening to evil advisors and appointing "wolves instead of shepherds" for bishops, but "meanwhile the cause of the Saxons gained the upper hand against the king ... [a]nd when he saw that the forces and the protectors of the land were ready, for the most part, to abandon him, he once more directed to us a letter, supplicatory and full of all humility." Gregory said in his letter Henry acknowledged his guilt toward the pope and made a promise to repent, but when he defeated the Saxons later he "straightway broke the vows he had made." Gregory said he had been patient after that, but "since we could not recall him by gentleness," we might "lead him back to the way of salvation by severity."

After Henry was excommunicated, Bishop Herman of Metz reacted by releasing Saxon prisoners including Burchard of Halberstadt, who Henry considered the leader of the whole rebellion. This enhearted a growing Saxon rebellion. The pope's excommunication carried weight with the Saxon rebels, and many of the clergy there supported Gregory and helped instigate the rebellion. Henry thought releasing Archbishop Werner of Magdeburg and sending him to Saxony would calm down the rebellion but it only got worse. Otto asked Henry to release more prisoners then rejoined the rebelling Saxons.

Henry didn't do well fighting the Saxons and this emboldened his enemies, which included Altmann of Passau, a pope ally said to have "agitated" against Henry. They met to conspire against him to stop his church activities in August or September 1076.

Henry's support would slip in the course of 1076. One Bishop Henry sent to excommunicate Gregory in response ran away and another, William, who had silenced supporters of the Pope at Worms, died a sudden and painful death. Hugh of Flavany and other pro-Gregory writers wrote that William's death was God's punishment for opposing Gregory and should serve as a reminder. William's death and the arguments of pro-Gregory writers were said to have convinced many Germany bishops to seek papal forgiveness throughout 1076 for the 'sin of disobedience.'

Gregory said Henry might 'come to his senses,' but warned Henry was trying to organize secular and church officials against pope. In 1076 papacy still wanted Henry to get rid of his counselors. Pope sent letters eventually saying September 1070 that if Henry didn't comply they should find a new King.

The bishops and princes forced Henry into concessions in the "Promise of Oppenheim," where Henry promised to dismiss his excommunicated advisers again, repudiate the charges at Worms, and 'preserve due obedience in all things' to the pope. The princes proposed to refer their greivances with him to the pope and Henry agreed. Henry is said to have believed his safety depended on being absolved by Gregory. While Henry was waiting to hear back from Gregory, he decided to walk to Canossa to see him in person. 

Henry walked through the alps during a harsh winter. The pope refused to see Henry at the castle for three days, while Henry was said to have waited and fasted barefoot wearing a hair shirt. Gregory wrote that Henry came "beseeching us with tears to grant him absolution and forgiveness," and after three days Gregory was "moved to compassion at his plight and interceded for him with tears and prayers" and eventually "removed the excommunication from him and received him again into the bosom of the holy mother church." Henry gave an oath promising he would satisfy the grievances of his bishops and princes and not attack or kidnap the pope.

The bishops and princes thought Henry had lost the imperial dignity and continued to move to depose Henry with backing from the pope, plunging the kingdom into civil war.




"...over the next century the church in Rome increased its power and influence. An important change was that it elevated its position from being the head of the western church, to being Christ's representative on earth. The Pope became Christ's vicar (i.e. deputy) on earth. The bishops became the vicars of Christ's apostles. This change gave the Pope a new power, for he and he alone could determine Christ's will on earth. This idea became widespread through the writings of Bernard of Clairvaux and was generally accepted after the new pope Eugenius III declared it in 1153."




Dissenters would be labeled heretics and publicly burned at the stake.

At the time of John Huss, 3 men were beheaded for openly calling indulgences a fraud.

John Huss was tricked into coming to a trial to defend himself, but instead was kidnapped and executed.

Huss called out church for financial abuse, sexual immorality, drunkeness among clergy, swindling public out of money, pope saying he was infallible, and starting wars

The church launched a series of crusades against Huss's followers after his death (the Hussite wars)

reformation led to "decades of rebellions, wars and bloody persecutions." Thirty years war alone cost Germany 40% of population.



...


church cared a lot about having its people in place of influence

had a close advisor to William, who acted like their dupe and conquered for them but wisened up to it later. He threw out the tyranical abbot who shot 21 English monks, refused to help Gregory with Henry, and grieved at the rivers of blood he spilled on his death bed.

The Church cared a lot about Henry's advisors, but Henry might have gotten bad advice anyway (freeing Otto who turned on him, other Saxon prisoners). Maybe the Church expected Henry to want the opposite of what they demanded.

They cared a lot about having their bishops in place and this is what they asked of both William and Henry.

Seemed to care about influencing leaders in 11th century, and support of armies important for that. Henry blamed Gregory for inciting arms against him and this lead him to submit to pope twice.

Support of Norman army obviously important for getting their people in place in England. Normans said to be the pope's troops by then, and maybe the Saxons were too, at least the ones opposing Henry.

The conflict with Henry also hints at using blackmail and attacking Henry's image--the letter Gregory sent to princes and bishops mentioned horrible deeds the pope got news of that Henry didn't repent for, and Bruno the Saxon wrote of Henry's ethical abuses, having too many concubines, as well as oppressing the Saxons.

There are also hints of using assassination to keep influential people in line--William spoke out the most against Gregory at worms, and was sent to excomunicate him, but dead a sudden and painful death. Pro-Gregory writers wrote suggestively that this should be a reminder not to oppose Gregory.


------


other leads on how church kept their power:

https://www.quora.com/What-were-three-reasons-why-the-Catholic-Church-became-so-powerful-in-medieval-Europe
	What were three reasons why the Catholic Church became so powerful in medieval Europe?

	First, almost all the people (except for the occasional Jews and Muslims) believed in the same God, a jealous God, and the Church claimed sole and unique position as intermediary with that God. Without benefit of that intermediary, you were taught from childhood, you faced eternal damnation.

	Second, the Church was the only place that 99% of the people could go to get an education. Therefore, the majority of intellectuals and scholars in the Middle Ages held some sort of position in the Church.

	(Even as recently as Isaac Newton… Newton, to get his chair in Natural Philosophy at Cambridge, was required to pass a theology exam to become a minister in the Church of England; otherwise, he could not be given his position as a Cambridge don.)

	Third, the implicit threat of ex-communication (rarely used but always possible) made even kings, lords, and emperors terrified to go against the will of the Church. If the Church excommunicated a king (for example, Henry VIII) that told Catholics in the country they had no duty to obey that king and could overthrow the king with God’s blessing.


belief church sole intermediary with God, only place to get education (even Issac Newton had to become a minister), threat of excommunication of Kings and overthrow


	...They managed to monopolise the word of God and its interpretation.

	If you want salvation from the horrible medieval life you will end up turning for the church to tell you what to do to get into heaven, that place which everyone tells you its incredibly amazing.  This is because you cannot get this knowledge on your own by reading or even accessing the monopolised physical bibles of which only some kings and the church had hold of.

	After the printed bibles started going out you see hundreds of small divisions of the Catholic faith, like the protestants, thus fragmenting the power of the church and weakening it.


monopoly on Bible and interpretation, saw dissent after Bible translated


	...There are quite a few, actually.

	First, don't overlook the question of talent.  In the 11th, 12th, and 13th centuries, a number of Church leaders were very talented politicians.  This was particularly true of the papacy, where a number of popes - Gregory VII, Urban II, Innocent III - were able to leverage whatever religious authority they had into raw political power.  When used correctly, and backed up through shrewd diplomacy (the alliance between the papacy and the Franks, for instance), it could make a pope, cardinal, or archbishop a formidable opponent.

	Part of the reason they could do this is because the Church was quite wealthy.  People in the Middle Ages, as is still true now, would donate to the Church.  For most people, that meant a few pennies when they went to Mass (which was probably less often than you might think), but it could also mean substantial donations from wealthy individuals.  Think Pepin the Short giving Central Italy to the pope or Herluin of Bec founding his own monastery.  Over time, the various churches and monasteries grew wealthy from the income provided by their lands (or, in the case of monasteries, through various business enterprises, such as breweries and restaurants - or, in the case of the Templars, through international banking) while the money that was being donated kept accumulating.  As a result, the Church was able to finance projects that boosted its own prestige (cathedral building, for instance), and enabled the pope and any archbishops who ruled their own cities to maintain their own armies.  It also enabled them to hire the staff necessary to administer the Church, which was more important than you might think.

	You can't overlook the Church's religious authority either.  While I would argue with Magestican's statement that the Church had a monopoly on religion (the fact that the Byzantines, Muslims, Jews, and pagans were all in Western Europe until at least the high Middle Ages and the appearance of schismatic groups make it more complex than that) and that while the piety of medieval people is usually overstated, it doesn't change the fact that religion is a powerful motivator.  A lot of people did fear for their souls, including some kings, which meant that the threat of excommunication could change someone's minds.  In other cases - and this goes back to the diplomacy I mentioned earlier - it gave the pope the ability to nullify any loyalty oaths taken by the noblemen, which would have put the king in a very precarious situation (this is actually what got Henry IV of Germany to beg forgiveness to Gregory VII).

	Lastly, don't overlook how entwined the Church was with secular power structures either.  There were cities (Salzburg, St. Andrews, Trier, Rome...) that were ruled by their bishop.  There were aristocratic families who attempted to place relatives into bishoprics, in part because of the power it gave them.  The same was true for wealthy merchant families, which partly explains why four different Medicis became pope.  The key here is that these families would work to put their relatives into powerful offices, so that the wealth, prestige, and power from that would benefit the family as a whole.  The thing is, that worked both ways since it meant that a cardinal, archbishop, or pope could usually count on his relatives' support.


Church leaders very talented politicians, could turn religious authority into raw political power

had a lot of money extracted from peasants, donations from wealthy individuals, starting businesses like breweries and restaurants (or Templars getting involved in banking). They could show prestige with cathedrals, buy mercenaries, and hire staff to administer the Church.

Religious piety of medieval people often overstated, and other religions in Europe like Jews and Byzantines, but was a powerful motivator. Some kings believed it.

Church entwined with secular power structure and some bishops ruled cities. Some wealthy families like Medicis bought their way into papacy.


	...fascinating that the answers so far, accurate as they may be within their terms, have not mentioned a huge advantage the church had — it was the principal source of education and literacy during the period, giving it insider access to the ruling families and dynasties formerly part of the Roman empire, and the opportunity to recruit some of the brightest people of the time, whether into the church or as secular collaborators in the aristocracy. consider also the paradoxical status of another religious sect during the middle ages, who were also educated and literate to a higher degree than the commoners — Jews.

	its effectiveness in recruiting and coopting the land owning aristocracy meant that the church would be immensely powerful due to its own wealth and landholding. its propaganda played a significant factor in the consolidation of the eventual kingdom of Spain and its subsequent empire, as well as the Crusades, all of which increased the church’s influence and wealth.

	on our visit to the medieval walled city of Lucca in Tuscany about fifteen years ago, and probably to the present day, one of the cathedrals from the late middle ages still actively used literally shares its property and building with a bank branch.


church had huge advantage in being principal source of education and literacy. Could recruit brightest people of the time. Jews were also paradoxical and educated to higher degree than commoners.

effective in recruiting and coopting land owning artistocracy

propaganda played significant factor in consolidation of kingdom of spain and crusades


	...The source of the power of the Catholic Church resides, at first, in the fact that it was the State religion of the late Western Roman Empire since Constantin in
	Associated with the glory of the Empire and its wealth, the Catholic Church started to gain some prestige in the roman population, generating massives conversions in an empire.
	The end of the Western Roman Empire is characterized by the migration / invasion of the so-called babarian people. Their incorporation inside the Roman Empire was often conditionned to a conversion of the leaders of those "barbarians" people. Those leaders were eager to legitimate their new acquired power / kingdom, and sharing the religion of their new subjects was a very effective way of doing. An easy example is the franc king Clovis, baptised in 498/499. This event helped him to securize its conquests.

	Thus, the Catholic Church was, during the beginning of medieval times, one of the pillars of the new formed kingdom on the ashes of the Roman Empire.


being official religion of Roman empire helped spread Catholicism among Romans, and barbarians being converted helped spread Catholicism


...


http://www.thefinertimes.com/Middle-Ages/church-in-the-middle-ages.html
	The church in the middle ages played a central role in people’s lives as well as the state. The middle ages were a turbulent time marked by wars in which millions of lives were lost. The church played a strong and controversial role during these tumultuous times.

	The church was a universal, all encompassing institution, with the Roman Catholic Church permeating every aspect of societal life.


this seems to be true


https://www.historyextra.com/period/medieval/a-brief-history-of-how-people-communicated-in-the-middle-ages/
	A brief history of how people communicated in the Middle Ages

	In 14th and 15th-century England, as the Hundred Years’ War raged in France, towns and villages heard about events through official speech – primarily through their priests. The church communicated the successes (or setbacks) of their king to the populace: they required masses or procession for thanksgiving in light of a victory, and prayers and invocations for hopes of a success at the start of campaigns. This helped to build public support for wars and the taxes to pay for them.


people got news primarily through priests, church communicated success or setbacks of king to the populace


	...In the second half of the 14th century, England saw great upheaval and challenges: the war with France was going badly, and at home the Black Death, beginning in 1348–9, had killed at least a third of the population. Survivors might have hoped for better conditions, as a smaller work force tried to demand higher wages, but this was stopped by the Ordinance and Statute of Labourers setting wages at the pre-plague level.

	In 1381 this famously erupted into the violence of the Peasants’ Revolt, but in 1377 there were already signs of discontent, manifested in the ‘Great Rumour’. This social movement, spread by word of mouth across southern England, saw rural labourers refusing to work, arguing that Domesday Book granted them exemptions from their feudal services.


sometimes news just spread in giant rumors (and what was going on here)

https://classroom.synonym.com/did-people-communicate-before-printing-press-invented-8169.html
	Town Criers

	Before the invention of the printing press, the town crier yelling "oyez!" and a clanging bell let villagers know to gather to hear important news. Official criers had loud voices and spoke clearly to read pronouncements announcing laws, regulations and official news from authorities. Royal pronouncements typically used a written document posted on the drawbridge, castle door or main bridge into the village, but residents needed the crier to announce the information for those who were unable to read.


secular gov also spread news through town criers


https://www.quora.com/What-was-the-medieval-equivalent-of-reporters-and-journalists
	What was the medieval equivalent of reporters and journalists?

	There weren’t equivalents for most of the period. At best, there were vague analogues.

	From the beginning of organized Christianity, a lot of thought and effort was put into keeping track of the date of Easter and other “moveable feasts,” and at a number of churches and monasteries, these dates were recorded for future reference. The monks and priests keeping these lists began to add mentions of events which they regarded as important. These became a genre now known as chronicles, timelines containing what would have been, at the time, headlines. However, that was just about recording events, not disseminating those records as reporters might.

	The secular world was slow to pick up on the idea of recording and disseminating “news.” Current events and stories of rulers and other notable people popped up from time to time with poets and performers of various kinds, but since their creations were heavily fictionalized, they were more like satirists and makers of biopics than reporters. Think Jon Stewart rather than John Chancellor [1].




https://www.quora.com/What-was-law-enforcement-like-during-the-Medieval-Ages


http://www.thefinertimes.com/Middle-Ages/church-in-the-middle-ages.html
	Evidence: Due to the lack of a professional police or effective evidence preserving techniques, unless someone saw the crime being committed or some other obvious reason to accuse someone, it wasn’t too hard to get away with a crime. That said, most kingdoms had some form of court system (even if only at the village level). In the absence of clear evidence, the verdict frequently came down to who was the more trustworthy out of the accuser and the accused, or the famous Trials.

	Church Law: The catholic church for a long time was just as if not more powerful than the kings of the nations it preached in. In many nations the Church had a separate legal system for clergymen, often with softer punishments than the standard laws of the country. One could be tried as a priest if they could recite a verse from the bible (remember most people are illiterate and the bible is in Latin, which even then no one but the clergy could understand). This verse became known as the neck-verse in fact, because so many used it to get out of being hanged.

	...Law enforcement was incredibly brutal during the Middle Ages.

	An accused person would go through one of 3 ordeals to prove guilt or innocence.

	    Ordeal by fire
	    Ordeal by water Trial by ordeal - Wikipedia
	    Ordeal by combat Trial by combat - Wikipedia

	The premise being if you were truly innocent god would help you through these ordeals to prove your innocence.

	In 1215 The Pope declared that priests could not oversee ordeals so they were replaced by juries.


http://mentalfloss.com/article/50161/history-trial-ordeal
	Originally, however, “trial by fire” was a much more literal term, and was one of the many categories of “trial by ordeal” that permeated the judicial system of Europe, Asia, Africa, and colonial America. The thought behind trial by ordeal was that, during the process, the gods intervene and show a sign that indicates guilt or innocence.

	Of course, the system was far from foolproof; many of the trials were easily manipulated by the administering judges (or priests) to “prove” a verdict that they thought was correct. Still, some authors, such as George Mason University economist Peter Leeson, say that in a society that unflinchingly believes in the efficacy of these trials, the ordeals and ordealists would have resulted in the “correct” verdict more often than not. After all, if a person was guilty, but believed that the trials always showed the truth, they’d be unlikely to be willing to undergo them—the punishment for pleading guilty was almost always far more lenient than the punishment for being “shown” to be guilty under trial by ordeal.


https://www.britannica.com/topic/police/The-history-of-policing-in-the-West

gov in england had a system of night watch, citizen policing, sheriffs, normans changed a bit


https://books.google.com/books?id=m-9pkCF_5NMC&pg=PA29&lpg=PA29
	Summarizing the Medieval Period, it is clear that the bishops were not as preoccupied with secrecy as they are today. Clergy sexual abuse of all kinds was apparently well-known by the public, the clergy, and secular law-enforcement authorities. There was a constant stream of disciplinary legislation from the church but none of it was successful in changing clergy behavior. Despite a millennia of failure, the popes and bishops never gave serious thought to the viability of mandatory celibacy.

clergy doing a bad job not committing sex abuses for thousands of years

did the reforms of enforcing celibacy give the papacy more power over the clergy? the clergy had their own special courts

	
	...The canonical sources give an indication of the extent that church authorities collaborated with civil powers to enforce its own laws. Violations of clerical celibacy were considered a horrific and severely detrimental to the community's social and moral health and were punished regularly by civil authorities from the late twelfth century on. At te beginning of the Gregorian Reform (eleventh century), the church reformers cast aside the more humane due-process procedures prescribed by the early church fathers in favor of the more brutal means of interrogation and punishment brought in by the invading Germanic peoples. THus, according to Richard Fraher, writing in 1989:

		By the 11th century even the Gregorian reformers, self-proclaimed restorers of the virtues of pristine Christianity, seized upon procedures by ordea when they began their campaign to purify the church by stamping out simony and clerical concubinage.


church brought back trial by ordeal by 11th century

noteworthy that in this system it would basically be up to whoever was conducting the trial to decide guilty or innocent with no outside check, so this could increase power of the church

pope got rid of trial by ordeal in 1215--story there?


	...THe notorious Spanish Inquisition (late fifteenth century) was somewhat different in that it was more closely bound up with the secular powers. In addition to prosecuting and punishing heretics, the Spanish Inquisition, which was abolished only in 1834, also dealth with a variety of other crimes including clerical sexual offenses. Chief among these was the infamous crime of sollicitatio, or solicitation of sex in the source of sacramental confession.


constant sexual abuses by clergy also says something about the kind of people they hired


http://www.thefinertimes.com/Middle-Ages/priests-in-the-middle-ages.html
	When compared to the local people, the priesthood was given a higher social standing. This generated widespread resentment and sentiments against the clergy who were seen by the community as seeking self-aggrandizement as opposed to securing the wellbeing of the community. The community bitterly criticized priests who fell from grace; they required that because the priest had a higher social standing and was closer to God, he would not succumb to the shortcomings of the layperson.


http://cdalebrittain.blogspot.com/2015/06/trial-by-ordeal.html
	Medieval people certainly recognized the ambiguities possible in all this.  Everyone knew or had heard of cases where the obviously guilty party got off because he had a better champion to fight for him.  How nicely a wound was healing was certainly a matter of discussion.  Because of this, trials by ordeal were actually fairly rare.  Judges, who could be the local landlord, the local count, the sheriff in England, even the king, would hear witnesses and examine evidence.  But their principal role was not to rule definitively on guilt or innocence but rather to get the disputing parties to come to an agreement.  A major part of all medieval legal cases was having a big discussion.  The only sure way to get a definitive judgment was for one of the parties not to show up.

	Curiously from a modern point of view, often an accused person would request trial by ordeal.  However, trials by ordeal were actually carried out far less frequently than they were proposed.  The accusers seem to have often worried that, if someone was willing to suffer a major burn (the most common kind of trial by ordeal) to demonstrate innocence, he might really be innocent.  More discussions would follow.

	Not only people were tested by fire--so were relics.  If one had acquired a bone and were unsure whether it was a saint's or some old pig bone, one threw it into the fire (after a suitably reverent ritual).  If it hopped out, it was a saint's.  It all made sense.

	To do any of this, of course, one needed to be sure that God was going to be passing the real judgment.  Thus one needed priests and blessings and oaths.  However, in 1215, eight hundred years ago this year, the church officially got out of the ordeal business.  Church lawyers felt that trials by ordeal "tested" God, forcing Him to reveal His judgment, which is actually against the Bible.  Without priests, it was a lot harder to do a decent ordeal.

	More discretion thus went to the judges and, in England, juries.  Originally "juries" had not been those who decided guilt or innocence but rather witnesses.  The word comes from the Latin iurati, those who have sworn to tell the truth.  In fact, originally "trial by jury" was a form of ordeal, getting a dozen friends to all swear on holy relics that you were innocent.  If you weren't, usually about halfway through someone would break and blurt out the truth rather than perjure himself.

	In late medieval England, jury trials started taking on the form they have now in England and the US, local people assembled to help the judge make decisions based on evidence and witnesses.  The main difference is that now we want the jurors to know nothing about the case ahead of time; then, the jurors came in extremely well-informed already.  (By the way, jury trials have nothing to do with Magna Carta, which does not mention them.  I'll discuss Magna Carta another day.)

	Trials by ordeal continued at a low level, as long as one could find a cooperative priest, which became harder and harder.  In late medieval England, some people tried to get out of their obvious guilt by insisting on a trial by ordeal, knowing that that could mean no trial at all.  In response, judges took to making them lie down, putting a board on top of them, and starting to pile on stones, while asking if they had reconsidered what kind of trial they wanted.  At this point, most suddenly wanted a trial by jury.


most medieval people suspicious of trial by ordeal, trial by ordeal rare and was often requested, continued a bit after banned
 


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Benefit_of_clergy
	In English law, the benefit of clergy (Law Latin: privilegium clericale) was originally a provision by which clergymen could claim that they were outside the jurisdiction of the secular courts and be tried instead in an ecclesiastical court under canon law. Various reforms limited the scope of this legal arrangement to prevent its abuse. 

	...Before the 12th century, traditional English law courts had been jointly presided over by a bishop and a local secular magistrate. In 1166, however, Henry II promulgated the Constitutions of Clarendon which established a new system of courts that rendered decisions wholly by royal authority. The Assizes touched off a power struggle between the king and Thomas Becket, Archbishop of Canterbury. Becket asserted that these secular courts had no jurisdiction over clergymen because it was the privilege of clergy not to be accused or tried for crime except before an ecclesiastical court. After four of Henry's knights murdered Becket in 1170, public sentiment turned against the king and he was forced to make amends with the church. As part of the Compromise of Avranches, Henry was purged of any guilt in Becket's murder but he agreed that the secular courts, with few exceptions (high treason being one of them), had no jurisdiction over the clergy.

	...At first, in order to plead the benefit of clergy, one had to appear before the court tonsured and otherwise wearing ecclesiastical dress. Over time, this proof of clergy-hood was replaced by a literacy test: defendants demonstrated their clerical status by reading from the Latin Bible. This opened the door to literate lay defendants also claiming the benefit of clergy. In 1351, under Edward III, this loophole was formalised in statute, and the benefit of clergy was officially extended to all who could read.[1] For example, the English dramatist Ben Jonson avoided hanging by pleading benefit of clergy in 1598 when charged with manslaughter.

	Unofficially, the loophole was even larger, because the Biblical passage traditionally used for the literacy test was, appropriately, Psalm 51 (Psalm 50 according to the Vulgate and Septuagint numbering), Miserere mei, Deus, secundum misericordiam tuam ("O God, have mercy upon me, according to thine heartfelt mercifulness"). Thus, an illiterate person who had memorized the appropriate Psalm could also claim the benefit of clergy, and Psalm 51 became known as the "neck verse" because knowing it could save one's neck by transferring one's case from a secular court, where hanging was a likely sentence, to an ecclesiastical court, where both the methods of trial and the sentences given were more lenient.[1]


church also brought "benefit of clergy" after Norman conquest of England, where people would be tried in a more lenient ecclesiastical court if they could prove they were clergy or could read 


https://www.encyclopedia.com/social-sciences-and-law/law/law/benefit-clergy
	In the ecclesiastical courts the severest sentences usually were degradation and the imposition of penances. Many criminals posed as clerics to obtain benefit of clergy. In England the privilege was soon extended to all clerks, i.e., literate persons. The ecclesiastical courts lost all jurisdiction over criminal acts in 1576, and thereafter clerics were tried by the secular courts and, under statute law, were either discharged or sentenced to a year's imprisonment. Early in the 18th cent. the reading test was abolished and all persons were allowed to claim this privilege for the first conviction of felony; later the privilege was extended generally to peers and women. Benefit of clergy thus mitigated the severities of English criminal law, which imposed the death penalty for many offenses now deemed trivial.



http://www.thefinertimes.com/Middle-Ages/priests-in-the-middle-ages.html
	In the middle ages, the clergy and the Church in general were very influential. The kings and local lords appointed members of the clergy including the bishops and priests, and in return, the clergy would play a great role in establishing the rules of the land. Nevertheless, priests in the middle Ages were not as influential as the bishops and archbishops who came from rich families.

	The Role of Priests in the Middle Ages

	The priests in the middle ages were exempted from paying taxes because their work was considered noble. They provided care for the members of the community and conducted Mass in the parishes. The priest had a special place in society. He presided over baptisms and wedding and he usually was the sole source of education. The priest was in charge of ensuring that the religious occasions and events were observed and he performed the final rites to the dying.

	Other roles that the priest played include offering spiritual guidance and absolving the sins of his parishioners. The priests were also in charge of overseeing the manor and passing on messages to the community, from the Pope or bishops.

	One of the most important roles played by the priest was establishing and running a local school. This was particularly vital when the kings realized the importance of education in the development of a country and in winning battles. The clergy was charged with the role of educating the local population, even though what they taught was meager and very basic. The educated priests only taught selected students how to read and write in Latin. They also taught religious studies, philosophy and rhetoric.


...


can see why pope and kings would want their people in place in clergy and why this would be important

church would control who was educated and how, and have influence over the news people would hear and how the law was enforced.

with a monopoly on education, history, science, any important advances would happen through church: https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Carolingian_Renaissance

the clerics would be the ones chronicling things and writing history too since they were the only ones who could read and write

some bishops would be in administrative positions and rule cities

church was said to be the center of town community where everybody would meet regularly. Sermons would be conducted in vernacular and by some accounts ("Life in a Medieval City") would be lively, engaging, tell a story that would impact people.

Since the church had a lot of political power and their followers believed they were really speaking for god, they'd have a lot of opportunities to gain credibility with the public based on this belief. They could plot e.g. the assassination of a king, then tell parish "god told me king is going to die please pray for him," then when king actually dies some people might believe they really were speaking for god. Same trick with protocols of zion, tanaka memorial. Superstitious people in particular easy to manipulate like that.

if decrees like "pope's word is word of god" and "pope can depose kings" were to have any weight with the populace, it would have to be through intodctrination in the church (and they'd have to learn this from somewhere in the first place)



------

Saxon rebellions look like an instance where influence of clergy on peasant populace would be important




https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Saxons#Christianity
	The continental Saxons were evangelised largely by English missionaries in the late 7th and early 8th centuries. Around 695, two early English missionaries, Hewald the White and Hewald the Black, were martyred by the vicani, that is, villagers.[42] Throughout the century that followed, villagers and other peasants proved to be the greatest opponents of Christianisation, while missionaries often received the support of the edhilingui and other noblemen.


Historically Saxons in europe continent opposed nobles and bishops trying to convert them


https://books.google.com/books?id=QP8fNo5UNIYC&pg=PA151&lpg=PA151
	Bishop Herman of Metz’s reaction to the news of the king’s excommunication was to release the prisoners entrusted to his care after the defeat of the Saxons in 1075. 47 The return of the prisoners- of-war to Saxony rekindled the spirit of resistance stifled by Henry’s victory. The Saxons were especially heartened by the escape of Burchard of Halberstadt in June. Burchard, regarded by the king as ‘the leader of the whole Saxon rebellion’

	...nevertheless the king’s action confirmed the Saxon view of Henry as a lawless tyrant.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Saxon_Rebellion
	As a result, on 27 January 1074, Henry stood at the head of what was only a small army compared to the much larger Saxon one at Hersfeld. Both sides were afraid to join in battle, but for different reasons. Henry probably because of his obvious inferiority. The Saxon leaders, by contrast, were aware that a victory by their army, consisting mainly of peasants, would have strengthened the position of the latter, something they were not in favour of. So it happened that on 2 February 1074 peace negotiations in Gerstungen took place


https://books.google.com/books/about/Henry_IV_of_Germany_1056_1106.html?id=QP8fNo5UNIYC
	Henry moved at once to hinder this dangerous manoeuvre. He stationed on the Neckar an army of 12,000 Franconian peasants to bar the advance of Welf and Berthold


https://en.wikisource.org/wiki/Catholic_Encyclopedia_(1913)/Bruno_the_Saxon
	He was apparently a Saxon monk belonging to the household of Archbishop Werner, of Magdeburg, who was a vigorous opponent of Henry IV and one of the leaders of the Saxon uprising against the emperor. After the death of the archbishop in 1078 at the hands of peasants, Bruno attached himself to Werner, Bishop of Merseburg


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Anno_II
	This resulted in bitter feuds between the bishops and the city, which lasted for two centuries with varying fortunes. The first uprising occurred under Anno II, at Easter of the year 1074. The citizens rose against the archbishop, but were defeated within three days, and severely punished.[4]


peasants and public opinion important in rebellion




https://books.google.com/books/about/Henry_IV_of_Germany_1056_1106.html?id=QP8fNo5UNIYC
	Lampert’s account of the rising introduces an impor- tant theme of the Saxon rebellions: the grievances of the Thuringians. Dedi ‘held frequent talks with the Thuringians to draw them into a military alli- ance. For he hoped that the king had lost their sympathy by the support which he had given to the archbishop [of Mainz] in his demand for tithes.’ Dedi tried to broaden the scope of his rebellion by exploiting the contentious issue of Thuringian tithes. During the 1060s Archbishop Siegfried of Mainz sought to reimpose the payment of tithes to his church by the laity of Thuringia. He aimed to bring to an end the ‘Thuringian freedom from tithes’: the exemp- tion enjoyed since the ninth century by all the nobility and peasantry of Thuringia, except for those holding land directly from the king, the arch- bishop or the abbeys of Fulda and Hersfeld. Siegfried easily enlisted the support of Pope Alexander II, since the reform papacy was dedicated to restor- ing the ancient rights of churches and to eradicating such ‘evil customs’ as the ninth-century tithes exemption. Siegfried’s first opportunity to demand his rights had occurred in 1062, when Otto of Meissen succeeded to the office of his brother, Margrave William. Many of the lands of the late margrave were benefices held of the archbishop of Mainz. He could be enfeoffed with these ‘only by promising to pay tithes of his possessions in Thuringia and to force the rest of the Thuringians to do the same’.

	...According to Lampert (whose abbey of Hersfeld had the keenest interest in Siegfried’s proceedings), ‘all the Thuringians . . . declared that they preferred to die rather than to lose the rights of their forefathers’. The archbishop there- fore secured the support of Henry IV for his claims. The scene was apparently set for a Thuringian rebellion. Instead, however, the Thuringians offered the king their help against Dedi, if in return he would protect their rights. Henry (according to Lampert) promised his protection and so gained a free hand to deal with the rebels. The king led an army into Thuringia and captured Dedi’s castles of Beichlingen and Burgscheidungen, leaving the rebels no choice but to submit. Dedi was ‘held for some time in prison’ and ‘deprived of no small part of his possessions and revenues’.


https://books.google.com/books/about/Henry_IV_of_Germany_1056_1106.html?id=QP8fNo5UNIYC
	...Otto, the Northeim family and their vassals regarded the king’s proceedings not as the execution of a judicial sentence but as unprovoked aggression. In such a case the house of Northeim considered itself justified in pursuing a vendetta against the crown. Otto raised a formidable army with which he attacked the crown lands in Thuringia, distributing the plunder among his knights and the peasants from his estates, who had been reduced to poverty by the recent depredations of the king’s army. 


https://books.google.com/books/about/Henry_IV_of_Germany_1056_1106.html?id=QP8fNo5UNIYC
	The rebellion of 1073, however, amounted to more than the collective revenge of prominent princes for their personal grievances. The leading rebels were in most cases bound together by ties of family and territorial interest, but they also saw themselves as defenders of a political cause in common with the rest of the east Saxon and Thuringian nobility. At Hoetensleben the east Saxons ‘swore an oath, one by one . . . that they would not give up their freedom or permit anyone’ (meaning specifically the king) ‘henceforward to attack and plunder their land’. At Tretenburg the Thuringians bound them- selves by oath to their cause. The rebellion was a sworn confederation (coniu- ratio), a movement of political protest against the royal government. For the protesters’ objections to the king’s methods of governing their region we are again dependent on the information of Bruno and Lampert. There is a difference of emphasis in the two accounts. Bruno, writing in the entourage of the bishop of Merseburg, saw the rebellion as the struggle of ‘the Saxons’ against tyranny, while Lampert, writing in the abbey of Hersfeld, represented the rebellion as the joint struggle of ‘the Saxons and Thuringians’. Henry’s objective was ‘to reduce all Saxons and Thuringians to slavery and add their estates to the crown lands’: hence the appeal of the east Saxons to the Thuringians at Tretenburg ‘to take up arms for the sake of their freedom and because of the frequent insults that had been inflicted on them’. 39 Lampert identified one ‘insult’ in particular: the efforts of Archbishop Siegfried of Mainz to compel the Thuringian nobility to pay tithes to his church. Siegfried’s campaign to end the ‘Thuringian freedom from tithes’ culminated in the synod of Erfurt (10 March 1073), which ruled in his favour. Lampert detected the secret influence of Henry IV behind this decision. ‘In order to cloak his impiety with the appearance of devotion’ the king had instigated Siegfried’s demand for tithes, promising his help in enforcing payment in return for a percentage of Siegfried’s gains. Henry then put pressure on the synod of Erfurt to secure a favourable decision. The outbreak of the rebellion, however, prevented the exaction of the tithes. ‘The Thuringians rejoiced that they had found an opportunity to defend the rights handed down by their ancestors, while the king grieved for the fact that his greed for tithes had almost lost him his kingdom and his life.’ All the other evidence suggests that it was Siegfried of Mainz, not the king, who forced the issue of the Thuringian tithes in 1073 . The value of Lampert’s account is that it records the suspicions of the Thuringians themselves, whose belief that Henry IV was responsible for the imposition of the tithes influenced their decision to join the rebellion. 40


Thurungians though Henry was imposing tithes on them although it turned out this was Seigfried of Mainz, who was in the Kidnapping plot against Henry:


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Agnes_of_Poitou
	Agnes resigned, as ransom, from the throne, and Anno together with the archbishops Siegfried of Mainz and Adalbert of Bremen took her place.[1]


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Lambert_of_Hersfeld
	Lambert was a convinced opponent of the German king Henry IV. In 1077, during the rising conflict with Pope Gregory VII, he moved from Hersfeld to the canon monastery of Hasungen at the instigation of Henry's enemy Archbishop Siegfried I of Mainz. 


Saxons thought Henry was plundering their lands. Is this why they got angry after him after he went down to Saxony to fight the Wettins? It doesn't make sense to be angry at him for fighting a foreign invasion, but if they thought he was there to plunder them it would make sense.


apparently they used that before:


https://books.google.com/books/about/Henry_IV_of_Germany_1056_1106.html?id=QP8fNo5UNIYC
	...Some princes replied that ‘since they had come armed and ready for the expedition against the Poles, he should lead the army immediately into Saxony’ to suppress the rebellion. Others, however, argued that their forces were insufficient for this purpose and this argument carried the day. It was presumably this proposal of  August that prompted Lampert’s rumour that Henry’s army was intended from the outset for use against the Saxons. 


	...	This was the process to which Lampert of Hersfeld and Bruno of Merseburg referred when they described Henry’s castle-building in Saxony and Thuringia and his seizure of the lands of the nobility.

	...He permitted the garrisons to extort their provisions from the nearby villages, as if they were con- querors in hostile territory, and to use the forced labour not only of the peasantry but even of ‘very many men of noble birth’. Henry’s ultimate purpose was ‘to exterminate the Saxons and establish in their place the race of the Swabians. For this race was most agreeable to him and he had raised very many of them, men sprung from obscure or almost non-existent ancestry, to the highest honours.’ 55 The reality behind this polemical statement can be deduced from two incidental details in Bruno’s account of the Saxons’ grie- vances: firstly, that the garrison of one of the controversial fortresses, Lüneburg, consisted of Swabians, ‘seventy of his most trusted men’, and, sec- ondly, that the king gave Saxon noblewomen in marriage to his household ser- vants and thus ‘dishonoured the noblewomen of this country with shameful marriages’. 

	This information has assumed great significance in modern studies of the administration of the crown lands and the ministeriales, the unfree royal ser- vants entrusted with their supervision in Henry IV’s reign. On the basis of the evidence of Lampert and Bruno, it has been suggested that the garrisons placed by Henry in his Saxon and Thuringian castles were composed of Swabian ministeriales, who were perceived by the local inhabitants as foreign invaders.

	...According to Lampert and Bruno, the rebels’ most important demand was the destruction of the royal castles in Saxony and Thuringia.

	...Despite their defensive purpose, however, the royal castles had two features that convinced the nobility that they were intended to serve as an instrument of tyranny: their novel appearance and their Swabian garrisons. Lampert regarded the castles as ‘very strongly fortified’. Bruno described the Harzburg, ‘the first and greatest’ of the castles, as ‘fortified without with a strong wall, towers and gates’.

	...The king’s severity, however, was regarded by many Saxons as a threat to their own tenure, so that they were ready to respond to Otto of Northeim’s call at Hoetensleben. ‘Awake, if you wish to bequeath to your chil- dren the inheritances left to you by your parents: lest through your negligence and lethargy you allow yourselves and your children to become the slaves of foreigners.’


Lamport and Bruno the Saxon said Henry's castles were there to exterminate the Saxons and that was one of their demands to get rid of the castles

is this what they told the public too?

Its a theme where whenever Henry does something military related in Saxony they think its against them: the Polish campaign, the castles, and esp. bringing army to attack the Wettins which helped kick off the rebellion that ended with walk to Canossa.

pg 85 interesting goes on about Henry vs Bishops and the advisors they attacked. Benno was the one with the idea of the castles

pg 92 Lambert saying they wanted to depose Henry in 1073. Lambert made this sound like public knowledge but it wasn't reported by any other chronicler.



https://books.google.com/books/about/Henry_IV_of_Germany_1056_1106.html?id=QP8fNo5UNIYC
	The Saxon rebellion broke out at a time of discontent with the royal government throughout the kingdom. When the king celebrated Easter (8 April) in Utrecht in 1072, ‘the people shouted at him, complaining about the injuries and misfortunes with which the innocent were oppressed everywhere in the kingdom’ and their complaints were corroborated by ‘all the princes of the kingdom’. Henry’s response was to reinstate Archbishop Anno of Cologne as his adviser, his task being to reconcile the king with his opponents. His work was far from complete, however, when after less than a year advanced age and growing weakness forced Anno to retire from the court. 104 The king’s critics in the Rhineland and southern Germany saw in the Saxons’ grievances an extreme version of their own complaints and in the Saxon rebellion a pos- sible model for their own future conduct. Their sympathy encouraged the rebels to intensify the siege of the Harzburg and Hasenburg. The royal garri- sons faced starvation but the king was powerless to help them. Since early December he had been confined to his bed in Ladenburg (an estate of the church of Worms). His illness was so severe that his enemies had high hopes that the political crisis would be resolved by his death. 105 Henry disappointed them by recovering sufficiently to proceed to the city of Worms, where he dis- covered his most enthusiastic supporters. Bishop Adalbert of Worms, an opponent of the king, wished to close the city gates against him, but the citi- zens rebelled against their bishop, defeated his knights and would have thrown him into prison, had he not fled. The citizens received Henry ‘with great pomp’, offered him military service and took an oath to contribute to the costs of his wars. ‘Thus the king obtained a strongly fortified city,’ wrote Lampert, ‘and henceforward this was to be his military headquarters, the citadel of the kingdom and a most secure refuge, whatever might befall.’ 


there was disocntent throughout the kingdom against the king and 'all the princes of the kingdom' corroborated their complaints.

that's one way a prince or bishop could influence public opinion too, just stand in the middle of town and shout or send an emissary

how did they get the idea that Henry was imposing tithes or building castles to exerminate them in the first place?

in another city henry just had to show up and the citizens threw out their bishop

Anno probably not a good choice to mediate since the citizens tried to throw him out in cologne later

did they see some of these bishops as working for Henry? he was accused of simony a lot. Apparently saw Siegfried as working for Henry, and would be easy to see e.g. Anno as working for him since Henry appointed him. If the pope and church were all yelling at Henry for buying off bishops their actions could get pinned on him, which happened at least for Siegfried.


could go like this:

Henry distrusts papacy basically entire life

starts trying to replace bishops with his own people in 1069

church start accusing him of simony, buying off clergy, spread rumor

have clergy start signing praises of Henry more than usual

pay some swabian from henry castle to tip over peasant cart

in church be like "that never happened henry is great"

people start freaking out

pope sends emissary "I detect some simony here"

peasants like "please save us pope from henry and his horrible simony!"


this would work especially if peasants already pre-disposed to hate many of the clergy, and the attacks on some bishops (Anno, Siegfried, Adalbert) suggest this was so

on the other hand many of the bishops were leading the rebellion. I guess they'd hate some bishops and not others.


	...The citizens of Worms wished to free themselves from the jurisdiction of their lord, Bishop Adalbert, and saw their opportunity in his conflict with the king. Lampert deplored the effect of their ‘most evil example’ on other cities, notably Cologne, where the citizens rebelled against Archbishop Anno in April 1074, only to suffer a dis- astrous defeat. 110 


opposition to bishop in Worms said to have spread to opposition to Anno by Lampert

why didn't Bishop Adalbert side with the king when he showed up?


	...The more impartial evidence of the royal diplomas for January 1074 shows that the king was attended by a group of prelates – the archbishops of Bremen and Trier and the bishops of Naumburg, Verdun, Bamberg, Basel, Eichstätt, Metz, Freising and Augsburg – most of whom served him faithfully in the following years. 113 With the help of his episcopal supporters and the men of Worms, Henry assembled an army for an expedition against the rebels.


these are bishops who sided with Henry, though some switched later


	...The duchy of Bavaria was to be restored to Otto of Northeim. Finally, Siegfried of Mainz, Anno of Cologne, Rudolf of Swabia and other princes were not to be punished for their sympathy with the rebel- lion. 116


if they hated Siegfried why make deal for him? public opinion had role in rebellion, but maybe not as much on demands



	...The peace caused a serious division in the Saxon ranks. ‘All the lesser folk (plebs) raged against the princes’, wishing to inflict a crushing defeat on the king, now that they had him at a disadvantage. ‘They loudly insisted that Duke Otto should rule over them as king and lead them in the coming strug- gle.’ 122 Bruno’s account of the peace settlement of 2 February distinguishes between the Saxon leadership, who were satisfied with the king’s concessions, and the rank-and-file, who were not. ‘Duke Otto and the others to whom great promises had been made, persuaded the rest to accept’ Henry as king and to make peace. Far from accepting the settlement, the rank-and-file broke the peace as soon as Henry withdrew from Saxony and travelled back to Worms at the end of March. ‘The common people (vulgus) of Saxony and especially those who lived in the villages near the castle of Harzburg’ were too impatient to wait for the king’s servants to dismantle the fortifications, accord- ing to the terms of the peace. Instead they attacked the Harzburg, ‘the source of all the misfortunes that they had suffered’, and reduced it to rubble. Both Lampert and Bruno emphasised that the peasantry acted ‘without the know- ledge and counsel of the princes’. 123 With the destruction of the Harzburg in 1074 ‘the common people’ assume the central role in the narratives of the Saxon resistance to the government of Henry IV. It is clear from the accounts of both Lampert and Bruno that the plebsor vulgus(Lampert’s terms) or rustici (Bruno’s term) had served in the rebel army in 1073. According to Bruno, they were present in the Saxon army in such numbers that Henry could describe the rebels as ‘rustic men unskilled in war’. Lampert wrote that the Saxon army was dismissed by its opponents as ‘an absurd crowd of commoners, more used to farming than fighting, who had come to war because of fear of the princes rather than military valour’. 124 The details given by the chroniclers suggest that the rebellious ‘common people’ were the peasantry living in the neigh- bourhood of the royal castles. They had undoubtedly suffered most from the depredations of the king’s Swabian garrisons and desired a more thorough revenge than that contained in the peace terms of February 1074. 

	The aspect of the revenge of the Saxon vulgus that most shocked contem- poraries was the sacrilege involved in the destruction of the Harzburg. They burned and plundered the church that Henry had built inside the castle and broke up its altars. ‘Finally, so that the king would have no reason for restor- ing the castle, they exhumed his son and his brother, whom he had caused to be buried there to make the place more acceptable to the people.’ 126 The graves of these Salian princes who had died in infancy – Conrad, Henry IV’s younger brother, who had died in , and Henry, his first-born son, who died in 1071 – were intended (to judge from Lampert’s account) to be objects of reverence to the local population. Evidently royal graves were regarded as possessing some of that sacral character that distinguished the living monarch. 127 The desecration of the royal graves in the Harzburg was the turning point in the Saxon rebellion of 1073-5. Lampert wrote that the peasants’ action ‘struck theprinces of Saxony with the greatest dread, lest the king . . . hold them guilty of having violated the treaty, seize upon this as a just occasion for renewing the war and arouse the entire strength of the kingdom against them’. 128 The anger provoked by the sacrilege, together with alarm at the spectacle of the peasantry acting ‘without the knowledge and counsel of the princes’, created widespread sympathy for the king among the nobility and ended his political isolation. At Easter (20 April) 1074 the royal court at Bamberg was attended by the suspected rebel of the previous year, Berthold of Carinthia, by Siegfried of Mainz and ‘very many others who had fallen away from [the king] during the Saxon war’. 129 The rallying of the south German dukes to the king was complete when, in November, Henry came to Regensburg and the court was attended by Welf IV of Bavaria, the intended victim of the peace of Gerstungen. 130 It is fair to assume that this readiness of the south German dukes for reconciliation was not solely the result of outrage at the desecration of the royal graves. Threatened by the prospect of Otto of Northeim’s return to royal favour, the dukes must have welcomed the breach of the peace of Gerstungen, since it would end the king’s rapprochement with their Saxon rival. Henry indeed held the Saxon princes responsible for the fate of the Harzburg, despite their attempts at exculpation and offers to make whatever reparation he demanded. Henry rejected their envoys’ explanations and made it clear that he considered the peace of Gerstungen to have been violated. 131

	...Evidence of the Saxon efforts to avert the royal expedition is found in a letter of Werner of Magdeburg to Siegfried of Mainz. He proclaimed the princes’ innocence of the crime of desecrating the graves in the Harzburg, which was the work of ‘the peasants with the characteristic ignorance of the peasantry’. The princes had responded to the outrage by sub- mitting themselves ‘like humble slaves’ to the judgement of the king and their fellow princes, but had met only with rebuffs. Werner therefore begged Siegfried ‘to mitigate the anger of our lord the king’ and ‘persuade him to think of us as human beings, lest he wish to destroy us, innocent as we are, and so imperil his soul’.


always happy to let someone else die for them...


	...Noble casualties were few on the Saxon side because ‘their knowledge of the ground, the darkness of the air [caused by the dust-cloud] and the swiftness of their horses’ assisted the nobles’ flight. The ‘common foot soldiers’ could not escape so easily and many were slaugh- tered. 140 The fate of the foot soldiers at the battle of Homburg aggravated the tension among the rebels which had first become evident early in 1074. During the summer of 1075, wrote Lampert, ‘the Saxons and Thuringians held frequent assemblies in which the common people (plebs) raged against the princes and the princes against the commoners’. The nobles were denounced for abandoning the plebs to be slaughtered like cattle. Not surprisingly, after 9 June the commoners declined to serve as foot soldiers in the rebel army: a refusal that explains the military collapse of the Saxons the following autumn. The princes’ fear that the plebs might decide to hand them over to the king to secure pardon for themselves contributed to their growing demoralisation. 141


	...The south German dukes, whose military support had been crucial six months before, remained aloof. The defeated Saxons would not easily forget the humiliation of Spier and the king now depended principally on Otto of Northeim to contain their resentment. At Christmastide 1075, therefore, Henry IV was both victorious and vulnerable. He owed his current success to the mutual hostility of the greatest princes rather than to their loyalty to the crown. Even as he celebrated his triumph, a new storm was already brewing, more danger- ous than the crisis of 1073. Henry would soon face a conspiracy of princes bent on deposing him and electing Rudolf of Swabia as king, the most powerful member of the conspiracy being Rudolf’s old enemy, Otto of Northeim. In the middle of 1076 the Saxon war broke out afresh. It raged for thirteen years, during which Saxony served as the power base of Henry’s enemies and Goslar as the residence of the anti-kings who aimed at Henry’s throne. In 1088 Henry suffered his last defeat in Saxony and withdrew, never to return. It was in eastern Saxony, therefore, that the king encountered his most implacable enemies. No less important, it was here that he first acquired that reputation for tyranny that he could never afterwards shake off.


Otto switched sides a lot while Bruno and Lampert gave him cover

the castles and fight with Saxons (and other things?) gave Henry a reputation for tyranny that he couldn't shake off


	...‘The royal and the priestly dignity . . . are bound together in the Christian people by a reciprocal treaty. Each must make use of the other . . . For the king is girded with the sword so that he may be armed to resist the enemies of the Church and the priest devotes himself to prayers and vigils so as to make God well-disposed towards king and people.’ So Cardinal Peter Damian of Ostia described the mutual dependence of the ecclesiastical and the secular power in his letter of 1065 to Henry IV, exhorting the king to defend the Roman church against the attacks of the antipope. 1 He had stressed the same theme three years earlier, when exhorting the German court to recognise Alexander II as lawful pope. 2 This theory derived from the teaching of Pope Gelasius I (492-6) concerning ‘the sacred authority of bishops and the royal power’. ‘Christ . . . separated the offices of both powers according to their proper activ- ities and their special dignities . . . so that Christian emperors would have need of bishops in order to attain eternal life and bishops would have recourse to imperial direction in the conduct of imperial affairs.’ 3 This Gelasian idea remained the basis of the papacy’s political thought at the beginning of the pontificate of Gregory VII.


pope apparently trying to recruit kings to fight for him in exchange for protection from church

what did "prayers and vigils so as to make God well-disposed towards king and people" mean to Henry?


 	...It was possibly no coincidence that in this same year of 1069 the king’s brother-in-law, Duke Rudolf of Swabia, sought a divorce from his second wife, Adelaide, sister of Queen Bertha. The duke ‘falsely accused [Adelaide] of not preserving her chastity’, but was subsequently reconciled to her when she cleared herself of the accusation in the presence of Pope Alexander II. 15 This episode seems to have done nothing to diminish the high esteem in which Rudolf was held in ecclesiastical reforming circles, whereas the king’s attempt to obtain a divorce resulted in censure from the Church.  	

 	...The cardinal’s letter of 1065 had contained a prophetic warning. ‘A king must be revered while he obeys the Creator, but when a king opposes the divine commands he is rightly held in contempt by his subjects.’ 25 In 1069 Peter Damian actually threatened Henry with ‘the power of the Church’ if he continued to demand a divorce. According to Lampert, Alexander II achieved Henry’s submission by using the sanction of withholding imperial coronation, the same sanction that Gregory VII seems to have used six years later. The pope felt compelled to intervene directly in Henry’s affairs ‘lest the poison of so wicked an example, beginning with the king, should stain the whole Christian people and he who ought to be the punisher of crimes should himself become the author and standardbearer of wickedness’. 26


Pope didn't want Harry to divorce his Italian wife for some reason and threatened him with "power of the church"

pope apparently thought disobedience would set bad example

church had sent Henry warnings before that going against "divine commands" would lead to "contempt by his subjects"


	...Perhaps the most important aspect of the divorce proceedings of 1069 was their long-term effect on the king’s reputation. The polemics of his enemies in the 1070s and 1080s revealed that his fame had been permanently scarred by the rumours that circulated as a consequence of the attempted divorce. Two distinct polemical accounts of Henry IV’s sexual depravity are apparent: one associated with the Saxon rebellion of 1073 and a more elaborate account con- nected with the polemical activity in the imperial territories following the death of Gregory VII in 1085. The demands of the Saxon rebels in 1073 included the requirement that the king should abandon his concubines and live with his wife. 31 The charges in the polemical literature of circa 1085 are that Henry fathered illegitimate children and was guilty of incest and pede- rasty. 32 These allegations of sexual misconduct were intended to support the argument of the Saxon rebels and, a decade later, of the pro-papal polemicists, that Henry deserved to be deposed because he was a tyrant. The definition of tyranny which Henry’s enemies knew best, that of the seventh-century ency- clopaedist, Isidore of Seville, described tyrants as ‘very wicked and shameless kings’. 33 Henry IV’s alleged sexual misconduct consequently provided his opponents with a useful polemical weapon. The importance of the allegations of misconduct was that they undoubtedly influenced the attitude towards Henry IV both of the papacy and of reforming circles in the empire.


after divorce scandal Henry accused of sexual depravity and this aided his subjects hating him

mass media of 1080's doesn't seem that different from 21st century...

Pope letters also mentioned "horrible misdeeds" (paraphrasing) of Henry, and clerics wrote of his misdeeds in their accounts.


	According to the anonymous Life of Emperor Henry IV Henry’s political opponents used the rumours of the king’s evil life to poison the pope’s mind against Henry and to gain the papacy as an ally. Similarly the polemicist Wido of Ferrara wrote that the allegations of sexual misconduct ‘were disclosed by letters and testimony of many men and reached the ears of Hildebrand’, who admonished the king ‘by means of frequent legations, commands and letters to change his life for the better’. 34 Gregory VII himself attested that he had received ‘an evil and most shameful report of the king’s behaviour’, prompt- ing him to admonish the king ‘by letters and envoys to cease from his wicked- ness’. 35 Allegations of sexual misconduct were particularly lethal to the reputation of a king because of his central role in Christian society, as defender of the Church, of the faith and of the laws. ‘How is he to be a punisher of crime, an avenger of sin, when he himself is in the toils of the same errors? Under what covenant will he preserve the law for others, when he has destroyed the rule of justice in himself?’ 36 An important factor in the conflict between Gregory VII and Henry IV in the years 1076-85 was the pope’s belief that the king, despite his warnings, had failed ‘to order his conduct as befitted a king and (if God granted it) a future emperor’. 37


some sources say allegations came to Gregory instead of other way around


	Gregory gave three reasons for his decision to excommunicate Henry in 1076: he failed to do penance ‘for the guilty acts of his life’; he had associated with simoniacs; he had caused schism in the Church. Gregory’s most serious charge was that, on the advice of his familiars, ‘he had polluted bishoprics and many monasteries with the simoniac heresy by introducing, for a price, wolves instead of shepherds’. 38 It was to this offence that Henry himself referred in the penitential letter of September 1073 through which he sought reconcilia- tion with the new pope. ‘Not only have we laid hold of ecclesiastical property, but we have even sold the churches themselves to unworthy men, embittered by the gall of simony.’ 39 Simony, trafficking in holy things and in particular receiving money from candidates for ecclesiastical office, was the offence most detested by the eleventh-century reform movement. The reformers regarded ‘simoniacal heresy’ as the earliest and most destructive of the heresies of the Christian Church. Henry IV’s alleged simony contrasted sharply with the conduct of his father, whose reforming sympathies were celebrated in the writ- ings of the most distinguished reformers of the mid-eleventh century. 40


Henry also accused of simony by pope and admitted to this in his letter

how much did this mattered to public opinion?


	Critics detected a deterioration in the episcopal appointments of the first two decades of Henry IV’s reign: a deterioration that had begun before Henry assumed the personal direction of the government. During the regency of Agnes there was no apparent change in the nature of appointments (despite Cardinal Humbert’s grave apprehensions about female governance of the Church). 49 Soon after the empress was driven from power in 1062, however, episcopal appointments began to fall below the high standard of Henry III’s reign. The first appointments to provoke criticism were in fact those of the regime of Anno of Cologne, ally of the reform papacy during the schism of Cadalus and patron of monastic reform. Two of the appointments for which he was responsible in 1063-4 to the archbishopric of Magdeburg and the bish- opric of Münster, were clearly dictated not by reforming but by political con- siderations. 50 According to the hostile Adam of Bremen, Anno, ‘notorious for his avarice’, ‘raised up his kinsmen, friends and chaplains, heaping the fore- most dignities and honours upon them’. 51 Lampert of Hersfeld, a fervent admirer of Anno, remained silent about his conduct towards the imperial Church, but accused his rival, Adalbert of Bremen, of selling bishoprics and abbeys. 52 Three controversial appointments were made during Adalbert’s ascendancy in 1065: Werner II of Strasbourg, Adalbero of Worms and Herman I of Bamberg. 53 The last and most disastrous of the appointments of the first decade of the reign was made after the fall of Adalbert of Bremen and the res- toration of Anno of Cologne to court. In May 1066 Anno secured the investi- ture to the vacant archbishopric of Trier of a kinsman, his nephew Conrad of Pfullingen, provost of the cathedral chapter in Cologne, against the will of the clergy and people of Trier. It was a bold attempt both to consolidate Anno’s authority and to settle the long struggle for precedence between the great Lotharingian churches of Cologne and Trier, which ended, however, in disas- ter for the candidate. Conrad was abducted by Theoderic, advocate of Trier and burgrave of the city, who subsequently ordered four of his vassals to murder the new archbishop. Neither Anno nor the king was able to punish the perpe- trators of this murder, nor could they prevent the clergy and people of Trier from electing a canon of their cathedral, Udo of Nellenburg, as archbishop. Anno denounced Udo to the pope as an intruder, but his appeal was unavail- ing. Anno’s attempt to exploit the royal right of investiture had resulted in a victory for the principle of the free election of a prelate by clergy and people. 


while being accused of simony Henry's bishop appointments would go out and murder people


	In the decade following Henry IV’s assumption of power in 1066, episco- pal appointments began once more to conform to the pattern of the previous reign. In a sharp reaction against the trend of 1063-6 the candidates invested in the late 1060s and 1070s were drawn from the same institutions as Henry III’s bishops: the imperial chapel, Henry III’s foundation of SS. Simon and Jude in Goslar and cathedral chapters with close links with the imperial chapel, Liège, Bamberg and Speyer. Of the sixteen bishops invested in the years 1066-76, eight or nine were members of the imperial chapel and ten belonged to SS. Simon and Jude. 55 The response of the new regime to the con- troversial appointments of 1063-6 was to accentuate loyal service and proxim- ity to the king as the essential qualifications for episcopal office. There was one important lesson, however, that the royal government had failed to learn from the experience of 1063-6: the necessity of appointing bishops who were acceptable to their clergy and people. Resistance to the royal appointee is recorded in the cases of Speyer, Constance, Worms, Toul, Bamberg and Cologne. Henry of Speyer, canon of SS. Simon and Jude in Goslar, was under the canonical age when he was appointed in 1067, which together with his conduct as bishop eventually provoked a complaint to Rome. 56 In Worms the unsatisfactory Adalbero was succeeded by Adalbert, whom the citizens expelled in 1073. 57 The king’s candidate for the bishopric of Toul, his former chaplain and chancellor, Pibo (1069), was denounced to the pope in 1074 as guilty of simony and unchastity by a clerk of Toul. 58 In Bamberg the investi- ture of the royal confidant Rupert, provost of SS. Simon and Jude in Goslar (1075), was deeply resented. 59 In the case of Cologne in 1076, the chronicles record the extreme reluctance of the clergy and people to accept the king’s can- didate, Hildolf, chaplain and canon of SS. Simon and Jude. When the dele- gation from Cologne, in the king’s presence for the election of their archbishop, rejected the royal candidate, Henry dismissed them, saying ‘that as long as he lived, they should have either him or no one for their bishop’. 60

	The best-documented case of resistance to a royal episcopal appointment is that of Constance (1070-1). The clergy and people of Constance wished to elect Siegfried, a canon of their cathedral, trusting that his being an imperial chaplain would recommend him to the king. Henry, however, invested Charles, canon of Magdeburg and provost of the church in the Harzburg, ‘because of the very many services which he had very frequently and most opportunely rendered, particularly in personal matters’. Opposition from the clergy soon took the form of accusations of simony and theft of ecclesiastical property that so perturbed the metropolitan, Siegfried of Mainz, that he refused to consecrate Charles. Both parties appealed to Rome, the cathedral clergy desiring the deposition of the ‘simoniac’, the king and his bishop requesting a papal investigation and exoneration of Charles. Alexander II referred the case to the decision of Archbishop Siegfried, who summoned the rival parties to a synod in Mainz (15-18 August 1071). The Constance clergy repeated their accusations; the king denied involvement in simoniacal trans- actions, although he did not exclude the possibility that his ‘servants and familiars’ had received money from Charles without his knowledge. On 18 August Charles brought the proceedings to an end by resigning his episcopal ring and staff into the king’s hands. 61 He declared that his election had vio- lated the canon law principle expressed in the decretal of Pope Celestine I: ‘no bishop is to be given to unwilling [subjects]’. 62 Charles’s resignation on these grounds prevented his being found guilty of simony, which would have been damaging for the king.

	The synod of Mainz revealed how much the harmonious relationship of monarch and episcopate, characteristic of the regime of Henry III, had been injured by Henry IV’s episcopal appointments. Although the participants included some of the king’s closest collaborators among the bishops (Henry of Speyer, Werner of Strasbourg, Herman of Bamberg and Benno of Osnabrück), the synod compelled the resignation of Henry’s candidate for Constance. 


Henry made a series of Bishop appointments that upset the clergy and faced public opposition. In one instance he was accused of taking money from one of the bishops.

public might have agreed with pope and "reformist" bishops in opposing Henry and his simony

goes on to describe some clergy personnel changes in Henry's Kingdom leading up to investiture controversy


	...The problem that dominated the king’s relations with the papacy in 1073 was that of Milan, the foremost city of northern Italy in economic and polit- ical terms and the metropolitan see of the eighteen dioceses of Lombardy. The royal government and the papacy were involved on opposing sides in the conflict between the reforming party of the Pataria and the Milanese estab- lishment in the shape of the senior clergy and the ‘captains’ (the greater aris- tocracy), hostile alike to ecclesiastical reform and political change. When the original leaders of the Pataria, the deacon Ariald and the priest Landulf, cam-paigned against simony and clerical marriage (circa 1057-1066), the Milanese populace seems to have supported them. Similarly, when in 1071 the Pataria opposed Archbishop Godfrey, whom the king had invested with his office without consulting the Milanese, the populace again joined the reformers in barring Godfrey from their city. Some later eleventh-century chronicles present the Milanese disturbances as a conflict between archbishop and nobil- ity on the one hand and Pataria and populus on the other, virtually equating the Pataria and the common people. The reality in the years 1057-75 was that two small factions, that of the archbishop, the senior clergy and their allies and that of the Pataria, competed with each other for the support of the populace and for control of the city. 75 Beneath the apparent alliance of the Patarini and the Milanese populus there were fundamentally different attitudes and objec- tives. The Milanese resistance to Archbishop Godfrey in 1071 signified a wish to be consulted in the matter of an archiepiscopal election, not a criticism of the practice of royal investiture of bishops. The Patarini in 1071 were pursu- ing the totally different objective of replacing an archbishop invested by the king with a candidate who would be obedient to the pope.

	Like other local reform movements, the Pataria during the 1060s increas- ingly felt the centripetal attraction of the reform papacy and sought the help of the Roman church in the campaign against simony and clerical marriage. The devout lay nobleman Herlembald Cotta, who assumed the leadership of the Pataria in 1066, became the confidant of the Roman archdeacon Hildebrand, principal adviser of Alexander II. This friendship transformed the papacy into the uncritical ally of the Pataria, regarding Herlembald as the leader in a holy war to reform the Milanese church and appoint an archbishop obedient to the holy see. 76 The fundamental weakness in the position of the Patarini was their willingness to sacrifice the ecclesiastical independence of Milan to the principle of the papal primacy. Their critics accused them of injuring ‘the honour of St Ambrose’, the patron saint of Milan. The expres- sion, ‘the honour’ or ‘the integrity of St Ambrose’, summed up the Milanese sense of the city’s ancient independence. It served as a rallying cry against the Patarini when they attempted to enforce conformity with Rome, notably by replacing the traditional Ambrosian liturgy with that of the Roman church. 77 Herlembald and his knights gained a precarious ascendancy over the city in the early 1070s, thanks to the absence of the archbishop and the disarray of the clerical faction, but he was ultimately defeated by the slogan ‘the honour of St Ambrose’. In 1075 Herlembald used the Easter festivities to stage a dem- onstration of Patarine determination to subordinate Milan to the papal primacy. This provocation enabled his enemies to persuade ‘a great part of the common people’ to swear an oath to uphold ‘justice and the honour of St Ambrose and to accept a bishop given by the king’. This sudden shift of the populus to the support of the anti-Patarine faction deprived Herlembald of control of the city. His opponents were able to kill him as a public enemy and disturber of the peace (5 April) and to expel his adherents from the city, a defeat from which the Pataria never recovered. 78 The Patarine attempts to exploit Milanese political divisions in the interests of the papacy failed because they underestimated the unifying character of the cult of St Ambrose.


pope also doing some divide and conquer thing to grab power in Milan, conflict there about "reform" and "simony" too. Two groups of bishops were vying for public opinion and control over the city.

Is this why they gave out that other papal banner in 1066?


	...The new wave of monastic reform in Germany is reported in Lampert’s annal for 1071 (the year in which Rudolf made his first benefaction to St Blasien). As a result of recent scandals in the monasteries, caused by the ambi- tion and simony of ‘pseudo-monks’ (Lampert was thinking in particular of Reichenau) ‘the princes of the kingdom summoned monks from beyond the Alps to create a school of divine service’ in Germany. 92 It was hardly a coin- cidence that all the prominent figures associated with Rudolf in the crisis of 1072 – not only the empress but also the archbishops of Cologne and Mainz and the duke of Carinthia (like Rudolf, suspected of treachery by the king) – were also associated with monastic reform.


pope sent over wave of "reforming" monks in 1071 and guy the princes and bishops supported, Rudolph, was also a support of "monasatic reform" like them


	...While Gregory refused to compromise on the issue of the royal advisers, he nevertheless assured correspondents during the summer of 1073 that he bore the king no ill will and desired only ‘that priesthood and empire be joined in the unity of harmony’. Already he was looking forward to the imperial coro- nation. In a letter to the empress’s adviser, Bishop Rainald of Como, Gregory (using the language of the ‘royal clause’ of the Papal Election Decree) described Henry as ‘the head of the laity . . . king and, if God wills, future emperor in Rome’. There was no objection to crowning Henry as emperor, provided that he was willing to discharge the imperial duties – ‘to love reli- gion’, ‘to increase and defend the property of the churches’ – and provided that ‘he avoids the counsels of wicked men like poison’.


Gregory promised Henry he could be emperor if he would just submit to the church (this shit could be an episode of game of thrones)


	...In late September Gregory received from the king a letter ‘full of sweetness and obedience . . . such as we recall neither he nor his predecessors have sent to Roman pontiffs’. This was the ‘suppliant letter’ in which Henry confessed that, led astray by his advisers, he had ‘sold the churches to unworthy men, embittered by the gall of simony’. He begged the pope to correct whatever was amiss, especially the situation of the Milanese church, ‘which through our fault is in error’. 109 The letter reflects the theme of the papal correspondence of the previous summer: unity (‘the kingship and the priesthood . . . always need each other’s help’) and the impe- rial coronation.

	...The outbreak of the Saxon rebellion prompted Henry to turn for help to that powerful group of princes whose enthusiasm for reform had been demonstrated at the assembly of Worms in July 1072. Their advice was, predictably, that he should make his peace with the pope. 116 Gregory’s welcome response to the king’s appeal for ‘counsel and help’ was a letter to the Saxons, exhorting them to suspend their hostilities against ‘King Henry, [their] lord’ and announcing the arrival of papal legates to negotiate peace (20 December 1073). This papal intervention probably con- tributed to the making of the peace of Gerstungen on 2 February 1074 (which was completed, however, before the legates’ arrival). 117



after losing to Saxons in 1073, Henry turned to princes who recommended he make peace with the pope, sends "suppliant" letter to pope, then pope sends letter to Saxons telling them to stop hostilities.

According to this https://books.google.com/books?id=D9SG3pEWGfkC&pg=PA96&lpg=PA96 Gregory sent the letter to Archbishop Werner of Magdeburg, Bishop Burchard of Halberstadt, Magrave Dedi and "other princes of Saxony"

gregory would go on to send letters to Henry telling him how to do his "reforms," how to handle Milan, and to do this with different advisors


Gregory apparently thought he could start and stop Saxon rebellion, tell Henry what to do

pg 136 says doubtful Gregory prohibition of lay investiture in 1075 Synod the primary source of the conflict

why are historians all over the place on this? especially wikipedia

why do "modern comentators" always paint Henry as wily and unscrupulous? even the walk to Canossa was attacked this way as a ploy by Henry (although his humiliation there might be exaggerated and there are hints Henry threatened the pope), and same for his "suppliant" letter to Gregory. It seems easy to sympathize with Henry having to deal with Gregory fomenting unrest in Milan and with the Saxons and inserting himself in German politics, acting tyranical and trying to get Henry to bow to his wishes, but a lot of "modern commentators" take the opposite view of Henry

pg 147 Henry's ally in Lotharingia Godfrey III was also murdered


	...It was in Utrecht that Henry issued the first royal polemics intended to influence ‘public opinion’ (that is, of the bishops and higher clergy and perhaps also of the secular princes) in the German kingdom. These royal polemics were provoked by Gregory VII’s first attempt to promote the rebel- lion against the king which he had authorised in the Lenten synod. Gregory’s letter of February 1076 addressed ‘to all who desire to be counted among the sheep which Christ committed to St Peter’, citing in full the papal sentence of deposition and excommunication, denounced Henry and his supporters as schismatics and heretics. 36


Gregory and Henry were vying for public opinion, Gregory addressing "all who desire to be counted among the sheep which Christ committed to St Peter" and calling Henry and his supporters heretics

understanding this would be important to understanding how papal power worked--did the pope branding Henry a "heretic" carry weight with enough members of the public to turn them against him and join the rebellion?


	...The king sought to refute papal claims in two letters composed in Utrecht: a new version of the letter to ‘Hildebrand’ report- ing the decisions of the council of Worms (never sent to the pope) and a letter summoning the bishops to a council in Worms at Whitsun (15 May) to take further measures against Hildebrand. 37 These two letters were composed by the royal chaplain Gottschalk (later provost of St Mary in Aachen and monk of Klingenmünster). He became Henry’s mouthpiece in the conflict with Gregory VII, clothing the ideas of the king – who may have played an active role in the composition of the polemics – with biblical and theological argu- ments that had a lasting influence on the controversial literature of the late eleventh century. 38


Henry's counter-argument appealed in part to religion (a lot of the letter was actually trashing Gregory for being evil), which points to him believing religion was an important motivator for people in the rebellion.

author says the St Peter cathedral burning down and death of William of Ultrecht seemed to negate Henry's counter-argument

Hugh of Flavingy wrote that these events happened at the same time, cathedral struck by lighting and William died there from holy fire descending from the heavens while recanting his wicked ways--would this have weight with the public? it would be easy to do presuming the public were superstitious and the church had a lot of influence with them this way, but haven't found a record of this being used to tell public at large that God was against Henry.


is this the letter "address to all who consider themselves sheep of St Peter"? http://avalon.law.yale.edu/medieval/inv04.asp

he calls Henry working for gates of hell with religious rhetoric, says christian people should obey him, and forbids people from obeying Henry as king

I guess in context with Henry having a sex scandal, Saxons pissed at him already from castles and rebellion, Henry's bishop appointments being unpopular, this could do more harm to henry than good, basically saying the pope agrees with the rebels.

The letter says says "the Christian people who have been especially committed to thee, should obey me" which you'd think would piss people off. How would the public react to this? I guess people then were used to following some fuedal lord anyway. Apparently Gregory didn't think it would cause him problems.


"Inventing The Public Sphere: The Public Debate During The Investiture Controversy" says public opinion important in the conflict too:


https://books.google.com/books?id=kRebpe6kng8C&pg=PA201&lpg=PA201
	The quantitative upsurge in polemics in 1076 is closely linked to the excommunication of the king at the Lenten synod of February 1076. Hence, it can be argued that 1076 is the most important single year for understanding the structural changes in the public sphere: the elitist public sphere and its secret rules of the game were undermined at the very moment the offical powers started to address public opinion and thus established a new source of political power.

	...The royal letters 10-13 were dispatched at the same time, probably in the first half o 1076, and have been called the beginning of official propaganda. The two letters, 12 and 13, that initiate the first part of the literary struggle with Pope Gregory VII are generally regarded as the most important and will therefore be discussed in length. The remaining two letters, 10 and 11, are first and foremost important for the public diffusion of the message. Letter 12 is a clear example of propagandistic discourse; it contains no administrative provisions, it is well crafted, and it combines a powerful antithetical rhetoric with the deductive approach.


goes on to analyze the letter and propaganda from Henry

a little weird that author spends several pages analyzing Henry's letter calling Gregory a "false monk" as manipulative--wasn't that letter backed up by facts?

he's right that the appeal to religious authority of the king was manipulative

author paints this like it was the birth of official propaganda, but iirc things like this were done before in e.g. the Roman empire

goes over propaganda by church too

	
	...While the royal chancery took the propagandistic initiative by addressing Hildebrand, the German bishops and the Roman clergy and people with one stroke of the pen,


this was after Henry's divorce scandal, unrest in Milan, simony scandal, tithes getting blamed on Henry among Thurungians, clerics and princes telling public that Henry's military was there to exterminate the Saxons

	
	the papacy struck back hard in the summer of 1076. In an attempt to justify the excommunication of the king in the face of public opinion, the papacy instigated a two-pronged campaign; the first directed at the people of Germany and the other in the form of the first polemical letter to Hermann of Metz dated 25 August 1076. In the period following the excommunication of King Henry, the German episcopacy was forced to take a stand in the conflict and Hermann was one of those who had to be convinced of the justness of the papal cause. The letter, a sure indicator of the importance of appealing to public opinion, has been regarded as a reply to the royal propaganda campaign in the wake of the synod of Worms in 1076.


goes on to describe this letter:

https://blogs.uoregon.edu/rel322w16drreis/2016/01/23/team-4-henry-iv-and-gregory-vii-investiture-controversy/
	Gregory writes a letter to Hermann of Metz, a Frankish bishop who had opposed Henry IV’s denouncement of Gregory. In this document, Gregory provides Metz with evidence for the excommunication of the king, so as to draw additional bishops away from supporting the Henry IV. Firstly, Gregory recalls when Pope Zachary utilized his power to appoint Pepin III king many years prior, and in doing so, deposed of the existing Frankish king. Gregory’s actions are simply another example of this scenario. He goes on to say, “When a man denies that he can be bound by the chain of the church…altogether separates himself from Christ” (Rosenwein, 261). As for the bishops who have associated with the excommunicated king, they have committed a heinous crime by proudly resisting the apostolic see, and will be treated with excommunication as well (Rosenwein, 261).


this looks like letter in Latin: https://books.google.com/books?id=UJdBAAAAcAAJ&pg=PA165&lpg=PA165

who did Gregory have in mind when addressing these letters? only clerics and some nobility could read, but town criers could read the letters to public too

there are hints of a schism among clergly with some for and some against Gregory's "reforms":


http://oll.libertyfund.org/titles/2277#Thatcher_1508_403
	Letter of the Bishops to Gregory VII, January 24, 1076.

	Siegfried, archbishop of Mainz, Udo, bishop of Trier, William, bishop of Utrecht, etc. [a list of names of bishops, twenty-six in all], to brother Hildebrand.

	At first when you made yourself pope we thought it better to ignore the illegality of your action and to submit to your rule, in the hope that you would redeem your bad beginning by a just and righteous government of the church, although we realized even then the enormity of the sin which you had committed. But now the lamentable condition of the whole church shows us only too well how we were deceived in you; your violent entrance into office was but the first in a series of wicked deeds and unjust decrees. 


noteworthy that Siegfried was involved in Henry kidnapping and would flip-flop through course of the conflict

	
speaks directly of church schism and blames on Gregory:


	...you have made a schism in the church and offended its members, who before your time were living together in peace and charity. Your mad acts have kindled the flame of discord which now rages in the churches of Italy, Germany, France, and Spain.


this part is telling:


	...Who among men is not filled with astonishment and indignation at your claims to sole authority, by which you would deprive your fellow-bishops of their coördinate rights and powers? For you assert that you have the authority to try any one of our parishioners for any sin which may have reached your ears even by chance report, and that no one of us has the power to loose or to bind such a sinner, but that it belongs to you alone or to your legate. Who that knows the scriptures does not perceive the madness of this claim?


one of Gregory's "reforms" was clerical celibacy, and the clergy had their own courts who would turn clergy over to public opinion

under presumption that just about all clergy broke celibacy rules, this would give the papacy a lot of leverage over clergy. Other hints pointing to hostile takeover of clergy include unusual death of William of Ultrecht which was said to have convinced clergy to fall in line. Henry in his letter also spoke of papal abuse of bishops:


http://avalon.law.yale.edu/medieval/inv02.asp
	not only hast thou not feared to lay hands upon the rulers of the holy church, the anointed of the Lord- the archbishops, namely, bishops and priests-but thou hast trodden them under foot like slaves ignorant of what their master is doing.

	...And from the throne of peace thou hast disturbed peace, inasmuch as thou hast armed subjects against those in authority over them; inasmuch as thou, who wert not called, hast taught that our bishops called of God are to be despised; inasmuch an thou hast usurped for laymen the ministry over their priests, allowing them to depose or condemn those whom they themselves had received as teachers from the hand of God through the laying on of hands of the bishops.

	...I Henry, king by the grace of God, do say unto thee, together with all our bishops: Descend, descend to be damned throughout the ages. 


Gregory's letter explaining excommunication wasn't in response to this but a letter asking questions from Hermann of Metz

during course of summer 1076 more bishops started siding with Gregory, including some who had sided with Henry at Worms, and then Henry made his walk to Canossa.


Gregory's letter does sound like it was meant for public, at least some parts:


http://avalon.law.yale.edu/medieval/inv06.asp
	Bishop Gregory, servant of the servants of God, to all the bishops, dukes, counts and other loyal defenders of the Christian faith in the land of the Germans, greeting and apostolic benediction.

	We have heard that certain among you utter complaints and are doubtful, concerning the excommunication which we have passed against the king, whether he has justly been excommunicated and whether our sentence has proceeded from the authority of a censure that is permissible, and with due deliberation. Therefore, as best we could, our conscience bearing witness, we have taken care to lay before the eyes and intellects of all how we were led to excommunicate him; not so much in order to throw before the public, with our Glamour as it were, the separate causes -which, alas, are too well known-as to satisfy the doubts of those who think that we have seized the spiritual sword rashly, and through a sudden impulse of our mind, rather than through fear of God and zeal of justice.


Gregory says the "spearate causes" of excommunication were "too well known" before the public--I guess a reference to his sex scandal, simony, charges of tyranny?

apparently there were people concerned Gregory was acting with political expediency and this was his reply saying he was acting out of godliness

next 3 paragraphs mention "dark and disgraceful" reports of King's actions, "evil" reccomended to him by his advisors and ignoring pope's warnings, and Henry appointing "wolves" to clergy.

this refers to two public scandals Henry had in past: sex scandal and appointing unpopular bishops (like one involved in murder, another said to be paying off Henry). Not sure if his advisors were a public issue. Noteworthy that this gives Henry an out by blaming his conduct on his advisors; at the same time Gregory would keep saying there might be hope for Henry to "return to bossom of church."

Gregory says at beginning he's not here to lay out causes of excommunication but kindof does or hints at it anyway.


	...Moreover we sent to him three men of the clergy, his own faithful followers, warning him through them in secret that he should do penance for his climes -which are indeed horrible to speak of, known moreover unto many and divulged in many places; and, on account of them, the authority of divine and human laws sanctions and orders that he should not only be excommunicated until he renders suitable satisfaction, but that he should be deprived of all honour in his kingdom without hope of regaining it. 


another reference to public opinion: his crimes "horrible to speak of" and "divulged in many places"


	...We, therefore, seeing his iniquity advance to a climax, for these causes:-first, namely, that he was unwilling to abstain from intercourse with those who had been excommunicated for sacrilege and for the sin of simoniacal heresy; then because, for the criminal acts of his life, he was not willing-I will not say to undergo-but even to promise penance, that repentance which he had promised before our legates having been feigned; finally because he has not flinched at rending the unity of the holy church, which is the body of Christ:-for these faults, I say, we have excommunicated him


wraps up 3 reasons: kept his excommunicated advisors, not willing to promise penance for his criminal acts, and didn't stop "rending unity of the holy church"


letter described by Melve was addressed to member of clergy and discussed a lot of theological theory, something public wouldn't even know since all the sermons were in latin:

https://books.google.com/books?id=kRebpe6kng8C&pg=PA201&lpg=PA201
	...The last part of the fourth narratio concludes with a functional notion of Christian unity in which kings are among the sheep because of their need for salvation: 'And if the holy Apostolic See, deciding based on the preeminent power that is divinely conferred upon it, settles spiritual matters, whoy not also secular matters?'


gist of letter was apparently justification why King should submit to pope couched in theological rhetoric

	
	...the question of whether the letter to Hermann was intended for wider circulation as propaganda needs to be addressed. In favour of this view is the form of the letter, which treats the excommunication as the most contested event of the Investiture Contest. Furthermore, some general phrases addressing the loyal and disloyal bishops in the fourth narratio could easily be viewed as appealing to a wider audience consisting of priests and prominent laymen. however, there is alsom a lot that contradicts such a conslusion. First, the letter is primarily a personal reply to Hermann. Second, on four occasions the letter seem to call for an ability to read, in contrast to open letters which were meant for oral proulgation. Third, the theme of the letter is the loyalty of the bishops, and no other social groups, either clerical or lay, are addressed. Fourth, the last two adminsitrative instructions are intended for Hermann in person and this administrative section does not make sense if the letter was meant to be an open letter. In sum, this is a letter intended for a clerical audience consisting of German bishops.


seems like they would send different messages to different groups of people, one to public and one to clerics, like this sketchy letter where Gregory reasons William is loyal to them and instructs his clerics to deal more leniently with him: https://books.google.com/books?id=EgRbpkgRSZAC&pg=PA182&lpg=PA182#v=onepage&q&f=false

what did the term "the Lord's sheep" mean to members of the clergy?

would help to be able to read Latin...

	
	...The papacy's early contribution to the public discussion was mainly intended for clerical audiences, save for the encounter with King Henry IV. These polemical letters attest to the gradual acknowledgement of the importance of employing the public as a political tribunal. In addition, they indicated an increased communicative awareness as the discourse of the correspondence is adapted to suit a given audience. The propaganda campaign addressed to the German people from 1076 onward represents something new. In the face of the need to justify the excommunication of the king, it marks the redefinition of the political public to include wider segments of the populace. The campaign also needs to be understood in terms of the Saxon problem. The Saxons were defeated in 1075, but when the conflict with the pope escalated in 1076 many bishops deserted the excommunicated king for the Saxon opposition. The Saxons' fight for freedom had an intellectual dimension too, which is outlined in Bruno's book on the Saxon war (1081). Bruno states that the entire population participated in the complaints, and outlines the communication network of the opposition, which consisted of epistolary channels among the opposition, Sigfried of Mainz, Weinher of Magdeburg and Gebhard of Salzburg, the king and the papacy.


pope had overt propaganda campaign targetting public starting 1076, Saxon rebellion according to Bruno had entire population participating in political complaints and a communication network including some bishops, the king (?) and the papacy


	The first of these polemical letters is an EV from the summer of 1076 addressed to all bishops, dukes, counts, and other faithul in regno Theutonicorum. Extensive manuscript attestation in a wide variety of sources indicates that it circulated widely.


pope letter explaining excommunication circulated widely

goes on to analyze the letter as propaganda, says letter to Hermann and this letter used different arguments

next letter he talks about is addressed to clergy, trashes king and less balanced than previous letter, uses religious rhetoric to call them against "our ancient enemy"


found another "ancient enemy" reference here in Gregory letter in 1082:

https://books.google.com/books?id=EgRbpkgRSZAC&pg=PA189&lpg=PA189

adressed to clergy and "laymen who are loyal to the Apostolic See"

seems like a pep talk

should read up on investiture conflict conclusion and come back to this later to understand it, but gist is seems like a pep talk, a little creepy, and maybe would aid in understanding what church was thinking


...


https://books.google.com/books?id=EgRbpkgRSZAC&pg=PA65&lpg=PA65
	...Jan. 22, 1075

	...Gregory . . . to Hugo, abbot of Cluny, greeting . . .


	...because we ought to use either hand as a right hand in crushing the savagery of the wicked, it becomes our duty, when there is no prince to care for such matters, to keep watch over the lives of religious me. We enjoin upon you in brotherly love that, so far as you are able, you lend your aid with watchful zeal, warning, urging and exhorting those who love S. Peter, that if they really wish to be his sons and his soldiers they do not prefer the princess of this world to him. For these can yield them only what is wretched and transient, while he promises eternal blessings, abolving them from all their sins and leading them into their heavenly home by the power committing to him.

	I desire to know more clearly than the day who are really faithful to S. Peter an who are no less devoted to that heavenly prince for the sake of their heavenly glory than to those to whom they are subject for temporal and miserable rewards.


is Gregory asking Hugo to spy on the opposition?


https://english.religion.info/2003/01/29/vatican-the-best-intelligence-service-in-the-world-interview-with-david-alvarez/	Vatican: the best intelligence service in the world? – Interview with David Alvarez

	...This new book, Spies in the Vatican, offers a history of Papacy and intelligence from Napoleon to the Second World War. The result is a fascinating and well-documented work, a balanced assessment, based on diplomatic and intelligence records in Britain, France, Italy, Spain, the United States, and the Vatican.


vatican was documented in espionage later

Cluny was an important stronghold for Henry supporters according to Robinson:

	...This breach of his oath of safe conduct lost
	Henry the sympathy of many churchmen, including his godfather, the abbot
	of Cluny. 86 The king must have calculated that, having lost his most impor-
	tant foothold in Rome,


this says Henry called on Hugo for help several times at desparate points but Hugo was loyal to the papacy: https://books.google.com/books?id=BVakCfeWmtkC&pg=PA343&lpg=PA343


...


another letter:


https://books.google.com/books?id=EgRbpkgRSZAC&pg=PA62&lpg=PA62
	To Rudolf of Swabia and Berthold of Carinthia, Against Simony and Concubinage

	...Jan 11, 1075.

	Gregory ... to Rudolf, duke of Swabia, and Berthold, duke of Carinthia, greeting . . .

	We are aware that you are giving intelligent consideration to the wretched desolation of the religion of Christ, which in these days has, for our sins, been brought so low that no man living has ever seen a more unhappy time, nor can such be found recorded since the days of our blessed father Silvester. But the chief and primary cause of these alamities is in us, who have been raised to govern the people or have been called and established as bishops for the welfare of their souls.


is that how Gregory saw the church? "raised to govern the people."

apparently Gregory cared about the church as he saw it persisting and wanted Rudolf to too


	...Wherefore we now turn to you and to all in whose loyalt and devotion we have confidence, begging you and directing you by apostolic authority, no matter what bishops may say or not say, not to recognize those whom eyou call prove to have been promoted or ordained simoniacally or to be under the charge of fornication. These orders you are to publish and urge at the king's court and elsewhere in assemblies of the kingdom, and you are to prevent such persons, to the best of your ability, even by force if that be necessary, from serving at the sacred mysteries.


asks him not to recognize bishops ordained "simonicially" or "charged with fornication" "by force if necessary"

	
	...we have every confidence that you earnestly desire that spirit of religion about which you have asked our advice, and we will suggest what seems to us the most appropriate form of satisfication: whatever money you can remember recieving for the appointment of clergymen in a church, apply this either to the needs of that same church if possible, or to the support of the poor, to the end that you may be freed from every stain of guilt and may deserve to be numbered among the chosen citizens of the kingdom of Heaven.


is he trying to make a deal with Rudolf? like "appoint our bishops and we'll forget that you took money for appointments"


...


on the follow-up letter sent to clergy after the "wideley dissimenated" letter addressing public:

https://books.google.com/books?id=kRebpe6kng8C&pg=PA238&lpg=PA238
	...The second letter of the campaign is from 25 July. The letter displays a different discourse, both compared to the first German letter and to the first polemical letter to Hermann of Metz ...The wide range of addressees--including bishops, abbots, priests, dukes, princes, knights, and all other faithful (Reg 4, 1, 289)--already indicates a different communicative intent. The term 'brethren' (fraters) is used twice and 'fellow priests' (consacerdotes) once to address a wide audience. The letter is also much shorter, lacks the careful formal construction, and contains numerous scriptural allusions and quotes. However, there are several thematic similarities between the two letters. ...but with a heavier use of rhetoric, thereby eschewing th emediative approach of the first letter. Rather, reference is made to the 'unheard-of wickedness and manifold wrongdoing of the king...our ancient enemy.'


found the letter:

https://books.google.com/books?id=9-KE2vdL1HkC&pg=PA560&lpg=PA560
	To All in Authority in Germany, Urging Their Support in His Struggle with Henry IV ...(july 25, 1076)

	Gregory ... to all his brethren in Christ, bishops, abbots and priests, dukes, princes and knights, all swellers in the Romon Empire who truly love the Christian faith and the honor of St Peter, greeting...


	...You know, beloved brethren, that in this time of peril when Antichrist is busy everywhere by means of his members, scarce one is to be found who truly loves God and his honor, or who prefers his commands rather than earthly profit and the favor of the princes of this world.


seems to be reminding them of their enemies, presumably Henry

goes on to ask them to side with church instead of princes

	...So doing you will not pass over with deaf ears that saying of the prince of the apostles, "Ye are a choen generation, a royal priesthood," and also, "We ought to obey God rather than men."


seem to think highly of themselves


	You well know, my brethren, for how long a time our Holy Church has had to bear the unheard-of wickedness and manifold wrongdoing of the king--would that I could call him Christian or [truly] your king--and what misfortunes it has suffered at his hands under the lead of our ancient enemy.


reminds them they've had to put up with Henry and that he's "under the lead of our ancient enemy" (who do they think is their ancient enemy?)


	Already during our diaconate we sent him words of warning out of our affection for him and our devotion to his parents, and after we came to the priestly office--unworthy as we are--frequently and earnestly have we strive, with the help of pious men, to bring him to his senses.


goes on to ask them to try to bring back Henry to church and not associate with clergy who sided with him


https://books.google.com/books?id=kRebpe6kng8C&pg=PA201&lpg=PA201


goes on about the letter where Gregory said maybe a new king should be found


	...Other signs of the perceived importance of public opinion are the numerous direct and indirect references to the royal propaganda: the two cancheries are fighting for public hegemony and both show the same ability to adapt the discourse according to the audience addressed. Thus, while it is true taht Gregory never got personally involved in Saxon affairs, as he did in his encounter with Erlembald, the leader of the Pataria, Blumenthal understimates the importance of appealing to public opinion, when claiming that Gregory only showed a faint interest in the Saxons. The atmosphere established by the anonymous author of the Carmen de bello Saxonico--depicting a people who 'complained incessently' and were 'ready for war'--made the time ripe for the papcy to play a more active part in the German problem, by means of propaganda.


why do so many authors act like it's ridiculous that Gregory could be involved in Saxon plot?

bishop Burchard called "leader of the whole rebellion" was loyal to the pope and got his job from Anno, clergy had been fucking with Henry his entire life with Anno literally kidnapping him then Seigfriend of Mainz getting in on the coup, Siegried later imposing tithes on Thurungians and somehow getting them to blame henry for it and switching sides a few times (and later getting special deal with rebels not to be punished along with Anno), Otto acting sleazy and switching sides multiple times too (and involved in kidnapping coup), Henry depsarate appeals to Hugo of Culny ignored while Gregory asks him to spy on Henry supporters, leaders of the rebellion supported Gregory's papal reforms, leaders corroborated peasents grievences with Henry then rallied them into an army and let them get slaughtered, Rudolf of Swabia made exact same sins as Henry (simony and trying to divorce wife) but pope let it slide, Rudolf supported papal reforms and Saxon rebellion rallied around him to replace Henry. Henry supporters would drop dead while pro-gregory writers would write suggestively that this should be a lesson not to oppose Gregory.

papacy was able to get normans to fight for them in england and later against Henry and get Erlembald to fight for him in Milan, both with official papal approval. General trend seems clear--Alexander II and Gregory VII wanted to increase powers of papcacy through reforms and get loyal people in place, and did it through conquest and intrigue in England, Milan, and elsehwere. Why is it so hard to believe the same happened in Germany?

there's the same pattern of historians confusing this with Catherine Morton's paper on papal support for the norman conquest of England: https://www.jstor.org/stable/41533253?read-now=1&refreqid=excelsior%3A4586973f454d10ec1ac209640cbaa2e7&seq=1#page_scan_tab_contents

one of the main reasons she cites is that clerics from Bec Abbey didn't mention this support, but its clear some of these clerics had their own bias (founded by Lanfranc and pushing idea that English church corrupt and needed "papal reform," despite an investigation uncovering no corruption earlier)

Same problem with wikipedia: after the 1073 Saxon rebellion, Henry turned to the princes who told him to appeal to the pope, supposedly wrote that "suppliant" letter, then pope wrote letter back to rebel leaders to suspend hostilities. Wikipedia article on rebellion has no mention of the pope's involement in the rebellion or the backdrop of Henry's conflict with the pope: https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Saxon_Rebellion

It's not like they don't have a source pinning it on Gregory--Henry himself said it was gregory inciting people to take up arms against rulers and hatching schemes in the Clergy, and this is backed up by the events that actually happened since Henry started opposing the church (said to be 1069, at least when he started openly although probably distrusted them earlier as demonstrated by jumping out of the boat when Anno kidnapped him).







------




what was going on between the Normans and the papacy?


https://www.realmofhistory.com/2015/09/12/8-surprising-facts-about-the-normans-and-their-warfare/
	Afflicted by such military actions, Charles III (also called ‘the Simple’) – the King of West Franks, invited Rollo and his followers to settle on the eastern side of Normandy (Upper Normandy) in 911 AD, in return for nominal allegiance and possibly Rollo’s conversion to Christianity.

	...As history has proven, the Treaty of Saint-Clair-sur-Epte was a masterstroke by Charles III – if not for himself, but for future generations of French rulers and church officials after 10th century AD. To that end, the early Normans clearly demonstrated their Viking military heritage by operating in a similar manner – that entailed fast movements and decisive actions, all pinched with the element of sheer ruthlessness. But the Gens Normannorum showcased another evolving nature that was seldom found in their Northmen predecessors – the nature of adaptability. This societal force soon allowed them to wholesomely adopt the ‘foreign’ Carolingian culture and feudalism, thus transforming the Normans into an European entity that combined the viciousness of the Vikings and the acumen of more ‘advanced’ factions.

	One major effect of this scope of adaptability was the large scale adoption of Christianity by the primarily pagan Normans (under Rollo). Their future generations turned out to be the ‘sword arm’ of Christianity, with Norman conquests and influence reaching the far-flung corners of Europe and even Levant. Interestingly, the Normans also established a long-standing yet transparent relationship with the Papacy, as is evident from William the Conqueror’s alliance with the Vatican. In that regard, many of the ecclesiastical leaders of the church came from the Norman aristocracy, while secular Norman lords quite freely founded medieval monasteries in their realms. Many of these ‘church lands’ owed military service to their Norman overlords, and as such the first knights were probably related to such resource-rich abbeys.

	...Yet another feather in the cap of the Normans was the conquest of a land even further than Sicily. We are taking about the ‘Holy Land’ in Levant, and how the Normans played an active role in the First Crusade by establishing their state around the ancient city of Antioch (that encompassed parts of modern-day Turkey and Syria). Keeping up with their reputation as the ‘sword arm’ of Christianity, the so-called Principality of Antioch was initially formed by the Normans (mostly from Italy) as a buffer state that would guard the Kingdom of Jerusalem from the northern passages.


converted to Roman Catholicism under Rollo, became "sword-arm of Chrsitianity"